Title
Review for Contact (1997)
Number of Reviews
51

Author
Randy Turgeon
Summary 
        Eight year old Ellie Arroway (Jena Malone) and her father, Ted (David
Morse), are very close. Her mother died while giving berth to her and her
father never remarried, bringing up Ellie on his own. She is a very
intelligent girl and her hobbies include such things as short wave radio
and telescopes, hobbies she shares closely with her dad. Tragedy strikes
her life when her dad dies that year.
        Flash forward to present time where Ellie (Jodie Foster) has pursued a
scientific career, becoming an astronomer. She listens intently to sounds
emitted by the universe, hoping to make contact with other intelligent
life.  She has a bumpy road ahead as her boss, Dr. Drumlin (Tom Skerritt)
informs her that her department is getting shut down. She refuses to give
up, and successfully interviews for an investor to back her project on her
own.
        Ellie's dreams come true when she eventually hears what she believes is an
intelligent signal from outer space. It is indeed confirmed to be so, and
the signal is decoded to reveal a shocking image. It is video footage of
Hitler giving his speech before the 1936 Olympics. That is not all. It also
appears that the signal contains thousands of pages of text, which turn out
to be blueprints for a machine. What exactly the machine will do is a
mystery, although it appears like it will act as a transport.
        Ellie finds that her troubles have only begun. She now has to deal with
many problems, including 
a brash, unfriendly military advisor (James Woods), her former boss who
returns to stake his claim, her lover (Matthew McConaughey) who questions
her non-religious motives, the overall media frenzy that the machine
causes, and bizarre dealings with the mysterious S.R. Hadden (John Hurt),
the owner of the company backing her project. 
All is not lost for Ellie, as she is eventually chosen to be the sole
person who will "pilot" the machine for its incredible journey into the
unknown, a journey into history.
Commentary
        I read many reviews for this film when it came out last summer and found
that people either loved it or hated it. There was no in between. I can
honestly say I fall in the "in between" category. 
        I liked some of the plot threads, such as the accurate depiction of the
media frenzy and radical religious groups. There are some good
performances, most notably William Fichtner who, I thought, had been
typecast to play psychotic killers, John Hurt as the eccentric millionaire,
and Angela Bassett as the White House Aide. Jodie Foster does her usual
fine job also.
        What I did not care for was the relationship between Foster and
McConaughey. They did not have much chemistry together, and I felt their
relationship was predictable. I could accurately guess every time the
McConaughey character was due to pop up in Ellie's life again, and I knew I
should have bet the farm on whether or not he would betray her at some
critical point during her quest. If anything, I felt Ellie had more
chemistry with John Hurt (of all people), considering both of them were
outcasts and a bit eccentric.
        There has been much talk about the ending to Contact, and this is where
most critics are divided. I felt that the ending was a major letdown.
Without giving away too much, lets just say that I felt that there could
have a been a lot more done with Ellie's destination and who she sees when
she gets there. The special effects are nothing special either.
        I have seen some good films with sub-par endings before ("Swimming With
Sharks" and the alternate ending to "Clerks" come to mind), and some of
them can be forgiven because the overall effect of the movie escapes
unscathed. But because the entire point of Contact relies on its ending,
and that ending is so poorly done, I cannot recommend the film.
Directed by Robert Zemeckis.
Ellie Arroway...................Jodie Foster
Ted Arroway.....................David Morse
Michael Kitz.....................James Woods
Kent Clark.......................William Fichtner
David Drumlin..................Tom Skerritt
Palmer Joss.......................Matthew McConaughey
Rachael Constantine............Angela Bassett

Author
Tony Tellado
Contact (review by Tony Tellado - Sci-Fi Talk)
CONTACT is by far the best movie of the summer. It's also probably the
most engaging SF film of the decade. Jodie Foster just can't seem to give
anything less than an Oscar worthy performance and her scientist Ellie
Arroway is no exception. The movie deals with her relationship with her
father who nurtured her interest in astronomy. David Morse plays a father
that is nurturing and supportive in a wonderful father-daughter
relationship. But the crux of the film deals with the long awaited answer
from outer space that we are not alone. The film follows her trials and
tribulations as she attempts to fund a project that listens for the signals
via radio telescopes and fights to keep her share of the credit. Matthew
McConaughey is impressive as the man in her life a religious man of faith
who conflicts with scientist Arroway's just the facts attitude. This is one
of the wonderful themes of CONTACT, the balance between science and faith.
It seems that we all need a little of both to venture out in space. The
cast includes James Woods as a wonderfully obnoxious Government official
and the seldom used Angela Bassett who shines. Tom Skerritt and John Hurt
of ALIEN fame add their talents to this ensemble, playing a cut throat
scientist and eccentric billionaire, respectively. Director Robert Zemeckis
of Forrest Gump fame has a reputation as a technical director, but handles
his actors very well here blending special effects nicely. They enhance the
story not dominate it. CONTACT is a story of exploration maybe not so much
of outer space but humanity, and our reaction to this type of even. The
film is dedicated to Carl Sagan who wrote the book along with his wife.
This is a wonderful legacy to a man who tried to make science fun for us
all, and shared his wonder of the universe

Author
Marty Mapes
***1/2 (out of 4) Jodie Foster is great, and Zemeckis knows how to use
film technology without compromising a story's humanity, but the real
star of CONTACT is its author, Carl Sagan. 
CONTACT is a smart movie. It is a science fiction movie without being an
action movie. Instead of laser blasts, chases and grunting, it offers
questions, dilemmas, and discussion. It is science fiction from the
perspective of a scientist, not from that of a studio with too much
money and gunpowder. 
Foster plays Ellie Arroway, a Sagan-like scientist working for SETI (the
Search for Extra-Terrestrial Intelligence). Faced with a government
bureaucracy unwilling to pay for pure research, it is Ellie's
determination alone that keeps her in her job. 
Her determination pays off when she hears a repeating signal coming from
a nearby star. As Ellie starts decoding the cryptic message, the world
watches, frets, and prays. As the message becomes clearer and clearer to
Ellie, the world's reaction becomes more and more muddled. Ellie learns
that the message is a blueprint for a kind of spaceship, while humanity
argues over the aliens' intentions, legitimacy, and divinity. 
The blueprints are ultimately realized through the funding of a
worldwide coalition of nations, and a representative is chosen to be the
first ambassador to our new neighbors. 
Contact is a great tribute to Sagan. Ellie has all of Sagan's curiosity,
morality, and rationality. She repeats a probabilistic argument for the
existence of extraterrestrial intelligence that Sagan used in his
COSMOS. Ellie is a rational athiest who's interested in religious
discussion, like Sagan. And when she says "billion" you can almost hear
his voice.  
Beyond the character of Ellie, the movie itself honors Sagan. It asks
relevant questions about religion and science without taking sides, it
recognizes the humanity of even the bad guys (though James Woods'
portrayal was a little prickly). Most of all, it values human curiosity
- that inexplicable force that makes scientists like Ellie and Sagan so
determined. 
Zemeckis proves his ability right from the start. The opening shot of
the movie is absolutely beautiful, and the richly layered soundtrack
gives meaning to that beauty (kudos to supervising sound editor Phil
Benson). The second sequence of shots foreshadows Ellie's future: young
Ellie makes radio contact with distant life forms from a thousand miles
away. 
Zemeckis doesn't condescend to his audience; he gives us credit for
being able to understand science and to appreciate the discussion of
religion. Even in such mundane tasks as introducing characters, Zemeckis
does not insult our intelligence. A blind man is introduced without
anyone saying "Meet Fisher, he's blind;" a reclusive benefactor is
revealed with a glance, not a grand, James Bond-like introduction. 
Finally, Zemeckis and editor Arthur Schmidt really heap on the tension
when, toward the end, our ambassador is ready to be sent. Lately, movie
tension has been less than subtle: consider the bus-over-the-cliff scene
in THE LOST WORLD or the paranoia of homocidal prisoners in CON AIR. In
CONTACT, the tension is just as taut, but more complex. There is a
chance for death, but other factors gnaw at the characters and at the
audience: the anticipation of meeting an alien race, the uncertainty of
using technology we don't understand, the fear of aborting a mission so
close to comletion. 
Still, all of this talent could have been spent on a less deserving
story. It is a tribute to the producers (other than Sagan and Ann
Druyan, his wife) and Zemeckis that they took a chance on a smart, human
science fiction movie, instead of buying explosions and space battles.
(c) 1997 Marty Mapes
Check out more current movie reviews at http://www.indra.com/~mmapes/

Author
Dennis Schwartz

CONTACT (director: Robert Zemeckis; screenwriters: Jim V, Hart/Michael
Goldenberg; cinematographer: Don Burgess; cast: Jodie Foster (Ellie
Arroway), Matthew McConaughey (Palmer Joss), James Woods (Michael Kitz),
Tom Skerritt (David Drumlin), William Fichtner (Kent), Angela Bassett
(Rachel Constantine), John Hurt (S.R. Hadden), Rob Lowe (Richard Rank),
David Morse (Ted Arroway), Jena Malone (Little Ellie), 1997)
This film, based on Carl Sagan's novel, is a mixture of sci-fi, romance,
sentimentality, and drama, brought to screen by the director of Forreset
Gump. It relies on its ideas and its mild convictions to sustain its
powerful but soppy story, rather than its special effects, contrary to
many modern films that have just become special effect vehicles. The
Ellie Arroway (Jodie) role as a child of 8, is played by Jena Malone,
who is being raised by her father with tender loving care (her mother
died at childbirth) and with respect for her ability to learn, as he
encourages her interest in astronomy. Unfortunately, he dies of a heart
attack when she is just ten.
At last, we see Ellie, grown-up as an independent, intelligent young
lady, working for the National Science Foundation on a project of
cutting-edge technology. Jodie Foster is feisty, vulnerable, appealing,
self-righteous, and obsessed with seeking scientific truths. She is the
alter-ego for Sagan, challenging the scientific and religious dogmas of
the day, championing a call for poetry and vision in our lives.
Her boss, Palmer Joss (Matthew), feels her research is futile and of no
utilitarian value. He stops her alien contact project and is pictured as
the perfect bureaucrat. Governments seem to trust this type and like to
put them in charge of things.
Ellie falls for a spiritual popularizer of worldly causes ( Tom
Skeritt), who left divinity school because he didn't want to remain
celibate.The attraction between them is overshadowed by idealogical
differences, and nothing can get in the way of Ellie's belief in
evolution, not even this hunk who is a ridiculously loopy caricature of
a religious zealot, one of those religious Johnny-come-lately types.
S.R. Hadden (John Hurt) comes to her rescue as an eccentric, wealthy
scientist, on the lookout for adventurious scientists; his foundation
privately sponsors her research. Ellie succeeds in making contact with
some sort of life in outer space; and, the government, with Michael Kitz
(James Woods) in charge of security, co-opts her project for national
security reasons. Here the story turns melodramatic and goes off on too
many different tangents to adequately keep its focus on its primary
aim-- that there is life in outer space. For these scenes, the film
should have used the dictum from Occam's Razor: The simplest way to do
something is the best way.
As a sci-fi'er, with a good storyline that tends to get too schmaltzy,
this film is up to par with those STAR WARS films, but is outclassed by
2001. Sagan would have been proud of the accuracy and content of this
work had he lived to see the film through to its conclusion, but I don't
think he would have been to happy with the elementary-school theological
debate between the space pioneer and the government officials. The main
argument in the film, is when Jodi is asked by that government panel
whether she believes in the God of the Bible. It is an embarrassing
scene, as she waivers, not trying to answer the question directly,
because if she said she didn't believe in God, they wouldn't let her go
up in space. I think the best answer a scientist could give in this
scenario, was not given by Jodi...but, then again, she got to go up in
space. A Steven Hawkings might have said that it is through these
scientific machines that we will come closest to reading the mind of
God. Albert Einstein might have said that the God of order created this
beautiful world we live in, and that the other kind of God, the one of
prayer and the one of interpretation by man and interjection, is a
speculative one. That the world had to be created out of the first
concept of God; the world is not a result of an accident. It is a thing
of great beauty. At least, this is what my science friends tell me is
the more typical attitude toward God in their community.
Dennis Schwartz: "Ozus' World Movie Reviews"
Š ALL RIGHTS RESERVED   DENNIS SCHWARTZ

Author
Choo Eng Aun, Jack
When I first heard of CONTACT, the hype was building it up as a sci-fi
blockbuster. Now, with that in mind, coupled with the knowledge of Jodie
Foster's involvement in the project, I thought "What in the world is Foster
doing in a sci-fi blockbuster???". As it turned out, my expectations were
completely nullified and turned topsy-turvy. Robert Zemeckis, back from the
euphoria created by his last film, FORREST GUMP, once again proves his
mastery in fusing tales of adventure with along the endearing lines of
human spirit. 
Don't get me wrong, CONTACT is sci-fibut with a definite difference. Based
on the late Carl Sagan novel of the same name, the story delves itself in
questions on science and god; fact and faith. Allie (Foster) is a radio
astronomer. She spends her time listening to the stars, via ultra-huge
communication dishes in search of intelligent life beyond the Solar System.
Her passion for `long-distance communication' is the result of her younger
days being spent avidly in front of a ham-radio system (a hobbyist radio
communication device) which her late-father bought for her. A scene which
particularly strengthens the audiences' view of the passion is when she
asked her father whether she could contact her late-mother through the
ham-radio system in which her father replied "Not even the most powerful
radio in the world can do that, now".
Allie's research is based on the SETI project (Search for Extra Terrestrial
Intelligence), in which she listens to radio emissions from other galaxies
in the hope of finding one which would suggest intelligent manipulation.
Her work has never been off the scrutiny of the US government, which
considers it a waste of taxpayer's money and politically unviable, her
supervisor (Tom Skerritt) pulls the plug on SETI. Undaunted, Allie managed
to gather a loyal group of `believers' and eventually found funding from a
large private corporation. The following months were treacherous to their
hopes and research as they are contantly pressured by the government but
all that changed when one day, she caught an emission of a seemingly
intelligent repeating sound-wave. The news of her find attracted hordes of
alien believers, cultist, the media and of course, the government. The
situation became intense upon her discovery of pictorial plans on building
a form of transport which were embedded within the repeating sound
emission.
As the world join forces to build this transport, Allie is desperate to be
the one to go. She enrols herself among a few hopefuls, to represent the
world when the transport is ready for operation. Her eligibility for the
spot failed when she is questioned on her beliefs in the existence of god
by the President's spiritual advisor (McConaughey); Allie, being an
atheist, a result of her belief in fact and science, refuses to budge upon
questioning. At this point the movie plot thickens considerably as she is
romantically involved with the President's spiritual advisor. 
A strong point which propelled the movie is the depth of its main
characters played by Foster and McConaughey. From the very first meeting
scene, it is obvious that the two of them was sort of kindred spirits but
they were worlds apart in almost all aspects, Foster being a person drawn
to science and facts and McConaughey being one who believes in faith, hope
and the power of the unseen. The meeting of their worlds, added with the
situation which they are put into makes the entire storytelling process
near flawless. Many people who read the synopsis of this film would find it
a tad too ridiculous, but by actually immersing yourself in it, gives you
an entirely different perspective; one which is free from bias and
pre-conceptions. Zemeckis and his team of screen writers have done a
remarkable job in telling this tale through film. 
CONTACT works by NOT delving in controversy but rather, touches the
thinking audience, urging them to ponder upon the questions raised in the
film concerning fact and faith; whether one can actually find compromise
within. I consider CONTACT as one of the must-sees for this year. 

Author
Cheng-Jih Chen
I've gone and reacquainted myself with "Contact" on DVD.  A wonderful
film, but I don't think it's a great film.  It has Spielbergian awe and
wonder, and a strong performance by Jodie Foster: conflicted, but stoic
and determined, with a touch of weepiness at all the right moments
(though she sits at the edge of the bed looking pensive a few too many
times).  And, perhaps most importantly, "Contact" addresses a Big Issue
-- Science versus Religion -- in a way that Americans can feel good
about.  Spirituality is affirmed, Scientists are redeemed, and we
therefore have an Intelligent Movie (tm).
I do recommend this movie (I do, I do), but I want to make it clear
that it's a Hollywood film, and that the reviewer who called it the
"Best Film of the Decade" has either only seen Van Damme movies for the
past 7 years, or is the same one who called "Batman" the "Movie of the
decade" back in 1991.  The Big Issue is addressed in typical fashion:
religion is presented in either its full Southern Baptist moral
rigidity caricature, or it is somewhat soft peddled, used more to
highlight the spiritual hole in Foster's heart than to express its own
tenets.  This soft-peddled, comforting spirituality is there to provide
background and meaning to her affirmations, and to launch her on a
climatic leap of faith.  The Big Issue is not explored beyond this.
In any case, the gist of the film is that, perhaps like Helen Hunt's
tornado chaser in "Twister", Jodie Foster's character is determined to
make contact with intelligent life in far away places.  There are
childhood scenes, where she plays with the short wave, and makes
contact with Pensacola, FL.  While her father wasn't sucked up by a F-5
twister (nor was her sister abducted by the Cancer Man), Foster's drive
is similarly made flinty by the death of her father.  
In later life, declining tenure-track teaching posts, she goes down the
path of "fringe science" and spends her time searching the skies using
the big radio telescopes your tax dollars have made possible.  This
search is ridiculed, it's funding cut off; the National Science
Foundation director thinks the whole thing is hokum.  Eventually, after
scrounging for funds, she's able to continue her research, and is on
hand to find a radio signal from the star Vega.  The signal is clearly
artificial and of intelligent design: it beats out the prime numbers,
speaking in the universal language of mathematics.  When the signal is
clearly established and monitored, it increases the quantity of
information by mimicking our television broadcasts (no, ET doesn't send
back the O.J. Trial, with the caption "He did it," stenciled in the
image).
We get a blueprint for making a vessel capable of sending one human on
a journey (proving that ET has watched "This Old House").  We go out
and build the thing (please note that $300 billion is a good 4% of
American GDP, and apt to be missed somewhere).  Jodie, of course, takes
the trip, and echoing David Bowman in "2001", we experience awe and
wonder, and she is marvelous expressing this awe and wonder.
The meat of this film is the intertwining of Science and Spirituality.
The Science of the film is presented as a cold atheism whose
practitioners demand hard facts to justify belief.  Belief without
facts is discounted.  But such Science is an spiritual desert:  Foster
is emotionally incomplete until she has a "religious" experience in
traveling to the center of the galaxy.  Science, in this film, is
presented as out of touch with 95% of the people on earth, despite,
say, the real life example of Einstein, who believed in both god and
relativity, without the exclusion of the other, and in complement of
each other.  As said, there is a reconciliation of Science and
Spirituality at the end, but this reconciliation feels a little like a
capitulation of rationality and hard thinking.  (Note:  I'm under the
impression that the book goes into more detail about god.  Apparently,
the book talks about "circles in pi" as evidence for the existence of
god, the creator of the universe basically putting his signature into
the fundamental fabric of the cosmos.  Arguably, if there were images
embedded into transcendental numbers or into Planck's Constant, it'd
say, "Intel Inside" or "Win95 Compatible".  Note that "circles in pi"
would not constitute proof of god.  It would be a non-sequitor, and not
evidence of design.)
I'm being nitpicky, but sending along the instructions for building a
vehicle is not sufficient for us to construct such a thing.  The
technology may not exist to make, say, steel of sufficient strength and
lightness.  People of the 1850s may comprehend the architectural schema
of the Empire State building, but they would not be able to execute
it.  Also, I'd argue that being able to build a vehicle of this scale
would to a fair degree tell us how it works.  This isn't quite
assembly:  we're required to manufacture the bits and pieces first.
And, as said, $300 billion is a whopping big piece of change.
The aliens are much like the Vulcans of the Star Trek Borg movie.
They're benign, mainly interested in telling us that We Are Not Alone
in person (though, arguably, sending the primes in a radio transmission
would be sufficient to prove intelligence), and to help us in our next
step in development.  Perhaps, like in Star Trek, we're redeemed by the
knowledge of a universe teeming with life, enlightened and willing to
put aside our petty squabbles, though that is only a hint at the end.
And it's a relief to see aliens who aren't not out to blow up New York,
only to get creamed by a well-placed Macintosh virus and an American
President ready and able to kick some ass.
The popular butchering of Occam's Razor continues.  The first mention
of the Razor in this film was acceptable, if not quite correct; more
than anything else, the Razor is just a statement favoring parsimony in
explanations, an exhortion not to multiply entities. (Though I was
surprised that a seminary student, interested in the interaction of
science and religion, would not have heard of it.  But then, he was
trying to pick up Jodie at a party, so I guess he was thinking, "I'll
just sit here and nod.")  The second mention was just damn stupid: we
are to accept that a conspiracy theory conforms better to the Razor
because such a theory would preclude contact with extraterrestrial
intelligence.  But, as presented in the film, contact is a far more
parsimonious explanation.  I suppose that in the film maker's mind, the
Razor always excludes ETs.  True, it's used to demolish "UFOs did it"
arguments in real life (as well as any number of conspiracy theories,
for that matter), but that's because there are better explanations than
ETs for pretty much all UFO sightings (e.g., "I was drunk").  (Crop
circles are a wonderful example: which is a more parsimonious
explanation, aliens came down and traipsed around in a wheat field, or
a bunch of drunk frat boys decided to play a prank?)  A string of prime
numbers being transmitted on the frequency of pi times a fundamental
property of hydrogen, and coming from 26 light years out (and this
distance cannot be faked because of parallax) can only lead to one
sensible conclusion.
One last thing I found interesting: at one point in the film, Foster is
required to have faith, to believe despite evidence to the contrary.
We, as an audience, are in a small way also required to have a moment
of faith, to believe or not.  But, for us, this is a Hollywood test
of faith: it is an easy test, and, to top it off, we are given proof.
It would have been more interesting if we had to choose between equally
sympathetic points of view, and if our choice had not been validated at
the end.  That proof and faith may be contradictory apparently escaped
the film's notice.
(This review isn't as good as I'd like it to be, but I'm not sure how
to fix it.  The interaction of science and religion is something I've
given some brain power to, so this film _did_ wander into old dark
corners of my intellectual attic.  I lean towards the harder Martin
Gardener style of skepticism, and believe that there are arguments that
can be dismissed out of hand.  But I do not preclude the existence of
god or any such; that simply is a question that cannot be addressed by
science.  More, if there is a god, then either god is embodied in
physical law, or that you must subscribe to the Church of Last Thursday
(i.e., the universe was created last Thursday, with an appearance of
looking 15 billion years old).  I think in the end, I was hoping for a
more rigorous argument in the film.  Oh, whatever.  You have the
review.)

Author
Justin K. Siegel
As a devout Atheist and an avowed believer in aliens, I have some idea
of how Ellie Aroway (Jodie Foster) feels. But because my reasons for
not partaking in religion are different than hers, I can't say that I
do exactly. Her reason is that she needs solid proof: there is no
proof that God existed, so therefor she does not believe.
Ellie also believes in aliens, and has spent most of her life trying
to prove they exist. How can she say she doesn't believe in God
because of the lack of proof, and then say she believes in aliens,
which are gereally less believed in than God without sounding like a
hypocrite? That's the Catch-22.
When aliens from the star Vega fax her some plans for a device to
transport someone to them (Okay, well, they didn't really *fax*
them...) Ellie wants to be the one to go, but because of her Atheism
she is denied the position. How dumb is that? She discovers the
transmitions, then she isn't allowed to go.
Well, because of a bomb and a psychopath (Jake Busey), she *does* end
up going, but not in the way that we would've thought.
CONTACT is based on a novel by Carl Sagan, who died during the
filmmaking. It is the best alien movie since CLOSE ENCOUNTERS OF THE
3RD KIND, and will end up being the best film of the year. Its views
of science and religion will no doubt aggrivate some, but will
stimulate more. I'm glad at least one movie of the '90s can portray
aliens in a psitive light, rather than a bunch of slimey beasts who
will eat your insides and then put on your body.

Author
Paul McElligott
Contact is a nobly intentioned but ultimately unsatisfying adaptation of
Carl Sagan's only novel.  It details the circumstances surrounding the
first clear sign of intelligent life in outer space and their effects on
the life of a young and idealistic radio astronomer named Ellie Arroway
(Jodie Foster).
We first meet Ellie at a giant radio telescope in Puerto Rico, where she
is part of the SETI (Search for Extraterrestrial Intelligence) project.
Her research is quickly killed, however, by her highly political David
Drumlin (Tom Skerrit), who disdains "pure research" in favor of science
with "commercial applications.
She goes in search of private funding and is turned down at every step
until she pitches her project to a corporation run by the mysterious
S.R. Hadden (John Hurt).  Then, with that money just about to finally
dry up, Ellie is sitting out in the desert near the Very Large Array in
New Mexico when she hears over her headphones a very powerful pulsing
radio signal.  In the movie's most exciting and believable sequence,
Ellie and her coworkers determine that the signal has to be coming from
the star Vega.
At first the signal appears to be just sequences of prime numbers, then
it turns out to be a TV signal of the Berlin Olympics bounced back to
Earth from 50 years before.  Further decoding, with Hadden's help,
reveals another layer to message, containing detailed plans for a
massive and complex machine.
It appears that the machine is a transport that will allow one person to
travel to the aliens' home world.  Of course, the big question becomes
"Who gets to ride it?" (right after "Who's gonna pay for this thing?").
To boil it down, Ellie gets denied the seat in the machine because she
bluntly acknowledges her atheism, while Drumlin gets to go because he
rather insincerely professes his deep religious faith.
Drumlin is killed and the machine destroyed when religious fanatics bomb
the launch platform (apparently to keep "godless science" from talking
to god, or something like that).
Then Hadden reappears with startling news.  He has secretly constructed
a second machine off the coast of Japan and has reserved the ride for
Ellie, in whom he has taken a rather paternal interest.
Ellie boards the machine and is transported through some kind of
wormhole to a dream-like place that looks a lot like Waikiki Beach
before they built the hotels, where she meets the aliens who take the
form of her late father (David Morse).
When she returns home, no one believes her.  She was not even gone for
one second, they say, even though she remembers being gone for 18 hours.
Her story is officially discredited, although believed by a large
segment of the public (who don't even have to know that her computer
records of the trip contain nothing but static . . . eighteen hours
worth of static).
There is a lot to like about Contact so I will highlight those points
first.  Ellie Arroway is a well-rounded character portrayed by one of
the best actresses currently working.  Neither the character nor the
performance has the same depth as Clarice Starling in Silence of the
Lambs, but that's a tough standard to meet.
Ellie is interesting in that she is woman defined by a strange array of
father figures.  Her real father is an idealized movie Dad who does
nothing in the film but love his daughter unconditionally.  Drumlin
comes across as a distant stepfather to whom Ellie is like an irritating
teenager who wants to use his toys to get into trouble.  Hadden
obviously has affection for Ellie, but in the end he seems to see her as
his creation, nothing more than his favorite piece on the chess board.
Even Palmer Joss (Matthew McConaughey), Ellie's love interest, takes a
paternalistic interest in Ellie, seeing her as a misguided person who
needs protection from her own impulses.
The film is technically impressive, especially in the scenes where the
message is first received and during the destruction of the first
machine.  The part of the film dealing with the message has the best
presentation of real science in a film since The Andromeda Strain.
The film falls apart when dealing with its central theme, the dichotomy
between science and religion.  This is a very real debate but Contact
boils it down to a simplistic level that never really touches on the
actual issues involved.
The film presents science pretty well (until the end) so the real
problem stems from it presentation of religious faith.  Religious people
are presented as shallow caricatures.  Rob Lowe plays a Ralph Reed clone
named Richard Rank (very subtle, guys), the voice of the religious
right.  Another religious figure is the fanatic who blows up the first
machine (Jake Busey).
The only really fleshed-out religious person, Palmer Joss, is supposed
to be a minister of some sort, but his actual faith is left pretty
vague.  I can't even say for certain that he was supposed to be a
Christian.  All we know is that he dropped out of the seminary and
obviously has no qualms about pre-marital sex.  
The film drops the science ball at the very end, when Ellie appears to
assert that there are some things even scientists must take on faith. 
In a day and age when the theory of evolution is denounced by the
religion right as an atheist "religious" doctrine, this is exactly the
wrong message to send.  In a movie dealing with issues of science and
faith, the last thing you want your scientist character to do is abandon
the principle of scientific skepticism.
What Ellie should have said was, "You shouldn't believe me.  Not without
evidence, and I don't have the evidence.  I know what happened but you
shouldn't take my word alone."  That is the voice of science speaking.
The character of David Drumlin is another problem with this film.  His
attitudes toward pure research project seem out of place for a person in
his position.  Also, his profession of "faith" before the selection
committee is so nakedly and transparently insincere that only a pack of
idiots should have fallen for it.
The last big problem is with the use of real personalities in various
roles.  The media figures, such as Bernard Shaw and Jay Leno aren't so
bad, in as much as their participation was voluntary.  The use of Bill
Clinton, however, should give anyone pause.  First of all, lifting the
image of a sitting head of state and inserting him into a fictional
story line, thus using his words outside of the context in which they
were spoken, is just plain creepy.  Also, using the real president
places this film between 1993 and 2001, forever dating it.  People
watching this film in the future will say, "Hey, this never took place
during Clinton's term."  This bit of unreality will jar people out of
their suspension of disbelief.  Also, the level of technology portrayed
in the film is too advanced to take place before the first decade of the
next century.  Better to have had a fictitious president played by an
actor or no president at all.
The film does raise an interesting question, although it never develops
it in a satisfying way.  
If we were picking an emissary to send to an alien culture, would an
atheist be automatically disqualified just because ninety percent of the
population of the world professes a belief in God, or at least some form
of supernatural creator?
Personally, I would hope not, since religion is basically an opinion, a
form of ideology.  I would not want any form of ideological test for
such an import task.

Author
Paul John Barnette Jr
I have been reading the postings on the new film Contact in this
newsgroup over the past few days. They sparked my curiosity to such an
extent that I decided to see the film. When I heard some comparing
Contact with 2001: A Space Odyssey I knew that I would without a doubt
be in the theater on opening night. I've just returned home after
seeing it and decided to sit down at my computer and give my own
thoughts on the subject. 
One thing that surprised me was the audience's reaction to Contact.
For the entire two and one half hours it was so quiet that you could
almost hear a pin drop. I had not witnessed such a reaction in a
packed house since I saw Oliver Stone's JFK in a theater a few years
ago. Regardless of what the rest of the audience thought of the film
after it was over, I know for a fact that it held their undivided
attention for its entire running time, which is no small
accomplishment in this day and age.
My personal reaction to the film is very positive overall. It is not
the science fiction masterpiece that 2001 is (then again, what is?),
but it is an intelligent hardcore science fiction film. In this
post-Star Wars age of fantasy science fiction, it is very refreshing
to see a well made hard science fiction film. I would place Contact on
the same level as the original Planet of the Apes or perhaps The
Andromeda Strain for example. None of these films are cinematic
masterpieces, but they are all significant films in the genre of hard
science fiction, and this is how I feel Contact will ultimately be
viewed when all is said and done. For those who need a rating scale, I
give it a seven out of a possible ten.
One of the criticisms I read before seeing the film was that many
characters in the movie were one dimensional cardboard cutouts, pure
types rather than actual people. This is indeed true. I do not wish to
argue the aesthetic worth of such characterizations, but I do believe
that they are in the story to make certain points. Points I believe
that Carl Sagan was trying to get across in his original novel. The
actor Tom Skerritt plays the role of David Drumlin, the head of the
National Science Foundation. He is Jodie Foster's chief scientific
nemesis. He cuts Foster's government funding, forcing her character to
turn to private business to continue her research, but when the signal
does arrive from space, he jumps into the public spotlight to take all
of the glory. This character illustrates the sad fact that many
scientists are backstabbing egotistical assholes. Just as any human
institution, the scientific community can be just as petty and power
hungry as any other group. As a professional scientist myself I can
attest to the reality of Skerritt's character , as I am sure Sagan
could have as well. James Woods's character, Michael Kitz, plays the
same type of role in the form of a National Security advisor. Woods's
character illustrates the negative aspects of world governments, just
as Skerritt's character illustrates the negative aspects of the
scientific community. 
Jodie Foster herself does a good job in her role as Eleanor Arroway.
She doesn't give a great performance, but it's not a bad performance
either. It's pretty much typical Jodie Foster. I can definitely see
why she was attracted to the role. Her character is the heart of the
film and is in nearly every single scene. Her character is also a
strong willed and determined woman, which seems to be Ms Foster's
particular cup of tea judging from her roles of late. Matthew
McConaughey, however, does not come off nearly as well. He plays
Foster's love interest Palmer Joss, and this character also turns into
a nationally known new age religious leader in the course of the film.
I do not think that Mr McConaughery ever really got a hold of his
character because I never believed his performance for a second.
McConaughery is an attractive rising male star, and that is probably
the chief reason he got the role. This is the one typical Hollywood
mistake in a film that is otherwise devoid of such errors and clichés.
Far and away my favorite character in the film is S.R. Hadden, played
by John Hurt. I have been a fan of Hurt ever since he burst upon the
scene playing Caligula in PBS's version of I Claudius back in the
1970's, and it has been awhile since I've seen him used as effectively
as he is in this film. Hadden is an extremely wealthy international
businessman, a former engineer who is now the head of a world wide
telecommunication corporation. He is a rich eccentric who brings to
mind images of Howard Hughes and (should I dare say) Charles Foster
Kane. He is introduced in the film in a very ominous manner, and one
is led to believe that he is another villain on the same order of
Skerritt's and Woods's characters, but in the end he turns out to be
sort of a Daddy Warbucks to Jodie Foster's Annie. It is Hadden who
continues to fund Foster's research after government funding is
pulled, and he is also responsible for Foster's character being the
one chosen to be the first person to make contact with another
intelligent life form. Hurt plays his character to the hilt and steals
every scene he is in. I only wish there had been more of them.
The climax of the film, where Jodie Foster's character actually
travels "to the infinite and beyond" is, as would naturally be
expected, very reminiscent of the ending to 2001. Not to give too much
away, both films have basically the same idea. If one were to have
contact with a superior intelligence, that intelligence will try to
communicate to us in a manner it hopes we will understand.
Contact takes the same tact as 2001 in this regard, but the chief
difference here is that Contact's vision of first contact is much more
literal than Stanley's vision was, which is one of the main reasons
why 2001 is a masterpiece and Contact is merely a good science fiction
film.
I find it very refreshing to see a summer Hollywood film that does not
insult the intelligence of its audience. Instead of explosions, car
chases and mind numbing soundtracks here is a film that focuses on
human interaction and demands as much from the audience as it gives.
Unfortunately this will also be its undoing. Too many of today's film
goers expect sensation over substance and are usually extremely upset
when asked to think while seeing a movie. Word of mouth will probably
kill Contact's ticket sales as the summer weeks progress. A film that
quotes Ockham's razor twice is just asking for poor box office. This
is a real shame because Contact does have a very important message
that it is trying to say.
What exactly is Contact's message? On a superficial level the film
does deal with the religion versus science debate, but to me the
meaning of the film lies much deeper. Ultimately I believe that the
true message of Contact is a pessimistic one. Two scenes resonate in
my mind after seeing the film. The first shows Foster returning to her
radio tracking station in New Mexico after the word has got out that a
signal has been received. She drives through miles of tourists,
crackpots and thrill seekers who have arrived at the station as
thought it were a shrine, just like we have seen in Roswell New Mexico
over that past few weeks. The other scene occurs near the end of the
film. Foster's character is leaving Congress and she sees hundreds of
"fans" on the capital lawn. Along the steps on either side of her path
to the car are people in wheel chairs lined up to touch her in the
hopes of being miraculously healed. Since her return from her trip to
the stars a cult has begun to grow around her possible powers. These
two scenes, along with the negative way in which politics and the
politics of science are portrayed, suggest that mankind is not really
mature enough as yet to enter the intergalactic Parthenon. With all
our pettiness, fears, and superstitions mankind is still not quite
ready to make contact.


Author
Mark R. Leeper
     Jodi Foster has obviously gotten a little more sanguine on science
for gifted children since she directed and starred in LITTLE MAN TATE.
That was the film in which she had a budding scientific prodigy saying
"I am working on an experiment involving sulfuric acid, lasers, and
butterflies."  In CONTACT she plays one of those prodigies grown up in
a film considerably more positive on science.  This is the story of the
career of the fictional Dr. Eleanor Arroway (Foster) who at an early
age was bitten by the astronomy bug.  Her mother died giving birth to
her and her father, Ted (David Morse of THE CROSSING GUARD) instilled
in her the love of science to devote her career to SETI, the search for
extra-terrestrial life.  The SETI project turns out to be professional
suicide in the field of astronomy.  But she feels compelled to listen
to the sky and to search for signs of intelligent life.  The career
choice earns her no respect from her colleagues, and it makes life a
constant set of battles for even minimal funding.  Her chief nemesis
and occasional boss David Drumlin (Tom Skerritt), National Science
Advisor to the President, who one way or another betrays her at every
opportunity.  A one-time lover and sometimes adversary is Palmer Joss
(Matthew McConaughey), a failed priest who becomes a sort of Billy
Graham figure.  When funding has run out and Drumlin is forcing her off
the Very Large Array, the huge radio telescope made of twenty-three
dish antennae, in the desert of New Mexico, suddenly she hears a signal
that can mean only an intelligent alien broadcast.  This is a scene we
have seen recently in INDEPENDENCE DAY and THE ARRIVAL, but never with
the scientific verisimilitude that we have here.  Arroway announces to
the world that contact has been made and nothing is ever the same
again.
     And now the film takes off and continues as a high pace until the
end.  We start with a very believable picture of just what would happen
if such an announcement were made.  The National Security Advisor
Michael Kitz (James Woods) struggles to take control of any information
received from the aliens, so does Drumlin, each trying to get the ear
of the President.  (My credits list has Sidney Portier playing the
President, but apparently in a last minute substitution they have
William Clinton in the role.  The film is, after all, directed by
Robert Zemeckis who had several Presidents appearing in FORREST GUMP.
It is sure to be a controversial piece of casting, but I think Clinton
does a fine job as the President.)  CONTACT is not just a political
drama about the after-effects of contacting alien life in space.  This
is a long film that keeps going and going--almost three hours long--and
if you have seen the trailer you will find that the science fiction
content is certainly there if you wait for it.  If you have read the
book, you may be a bit disappointed, since there is far more science
fiction content in the original story, but the film does not exactly
remain earthbound either.
     The opening sequence demonstrating for us how far into the galaxy
our radio broadcasts have reached is both breath-taking and
scientifically informative.  The film is almost worth seeing just for
that sequence.  Other scenes are technically impressive, but a little
nonsensical.  In one tracking shot the camera leads Arroway running up
a flight of stairs and into a bathroom and in the end we see we are
seeing her in the medicine cabinet mirror and have been through the
scene.  There is enough good in CONTACT to make a film I would give
very high marks to, and enough that is irritating for me to really
down-rate it.  Generally when that happens I try to excuse the faults.
So while I thought there was much that was dishonest about CONTACT,
overall I would have to give it a low +3 on the -4 to +4 scale.
     Visually you could not ask for a lot more from the film, with one
major exception.  While it is not chock full of special effects and the
mattes of the Transporter seen from a distance are not convincing, the
design of the Transporter is just about as believable as an
interstellar transporter could be.  The scenes of the Transporter
running were stunning, and the journey was terrific though perhaps a
little derivative of 2001:  A SPACE ODYSSEY.  Then she plops down at
the far end and it is the "Oh, shoot!" experience.  What a failure of
imagination!  It was like watching THE BLACK HOLE II.
     There is so much that is right with this film and so much that is
wrong, it is hard to know where to begin to evaluate the ideas.  The
film I would have liked to see is the one this would have been if Carl
Sagan had not died during the production.  I cannot be positive it
would be different, but aspects of this film seem to run very counter
to what I understand as Sagan's philosophy.  Places where the book took
chances and had some engaging thoughts about religion and faith have
been reframed to change their meaning.  Certainly false information
would never have been added to the arguments in the film.  (The film
claims that 95% of the world's population believes in a Supreme Being.
Actually about 21% of the world is atheist or non- religious and while
there may be some who believe in a Supreme Being among the non-
religious, there are certainly also atheists and agnostics who at least
nominally belong to religions.  This also makes the dubious assumption
that Confucians and Shintoists believe in a Supreme Being.  The 95%
figure used in the film is wildly inaccurate.)
     What I did find surprising was people in the audience getting
angry because the "hero" of the film implied that she was either an
atheist or an agnostic.  She never tries to convince anyone to agree
with her, she simply explains why she believes what she does.  Other
people punish her for her belief and nobody in the audience got
(audibly) upset about that.  Apparently with everything else this film
does, it gets people agitated at its ideas.  The novel actually had a
nice piece looking at what could be a proof of the existence of God,
while the film turns into an affirmation of religious faith in its
final scenes.  And Arroway complains that Drumlin tells the people what
they want to hear about his views on religion!

Author
Serdar Yegulalp
CAPSULE: Intelligent, passionate, and utterly gripping exploration of the
idea of interstellar contact. Makes CLOSE ENCOUNTERS OF THE THIRD KIND look
like a very bad episode of STAR TREK.
The opening shots of CONTACT are so audacious that they stun an audience
into complete submission. In a simple, elegant series of images and sounds,
we are shown the vastness of the universe and the tininess of man's earth
against it. By the time the story proper started, the audience was already
reeling under the impact of being SHOWN where they stood, cosmically
speaking. They were all ready.
CONTACT is about that sense of astonishment and wonder -- about emotions as
well as ideas, and about how those emotions are played out in the real
world. It is, next to 2001, the single best movie I've seen that really
conveys a sense of WONDER about the universe: What if there's life out
there? How would we get in touch? What would we say after hello?
Jodie Foster plays a radio astronomer who has always been fascinated by the
lure of such questions. After a series of thankless jobs for SETI, which
apparently is tantamount to professional suicide, she works with her
companions to secure funding from a giant multinational corporation to hunt
for signals from space.The realities of getting corporate funding for
scientific research aren't pretty: you have to basically whore yourself, but
Foster's character, named Arroway, winds up working for a man (played by
John Hurt with a mixture of greasy charm and grandfatherly intelligence) who
seems to be as much in love with the idea of contact as she is.
Then one day everything comes together: they find a signal. A whopping huge
signal. Someone out there has been listening, and sends us back a message
with a format we understand perfectly -- TV transmissions. There is also
something else encoded in the transmissions -- something which requires the
scientists to think non-linearly. And when they do...
I will not go any further into the plot. One of the beauties of the movie is
in the way its surprises unfold, and since I'm hellbent on getting people to
see this one, I won't ruin a thing. What I will say is that the implications
of the signal alone are dealt with intelligence and verve -- much more so
than in many, many other movies. In CE3K, for instance, there was the effect
on one man, and not a very stable man at that; in CONTACT, the social and
moral effects are examined.
The film also touches on the issue of faith versus science, and has enough
courage to suggest that the two are not dichotomous, that we need both to
guide us forward into the universe. Arroway does not think religious people
are deluded, and many of the people of faith in the movie do not think that
science is a sterile inhuman business. But they are surrounded by people who
are more fanatical, and some of their actions have tragic consequences.
CONTACT is a daring movie in many ways. It tells a strong, human story
without violence or easy answers, and tries to get us to see beyond the
provincialism of our lives. To see the cosmic scale of things. The closing
credits dedicate the movie "to Carl", and I think he would have been elated.
For those who knew the man, this is very much an encapsulation of his
aspirations and dreams.

Author
E. Benjamin Kelsey
CONTACT is the 1997 movie I've seen the most - five times to be exact. Four of
those times were on the big screen, but even on a TV, it's a very impressive
film. The same can't be said for films like INDEPENDANCE DAY, but that's
because CONTACT is a rare example in sci-fi filmmaking where the story is
treated more importantly than the special effects, and all of us know looking
back that ID4 didn't offer much outside of some one-time delightful eye candy.
CONTACT's wonderfully presented story deals with Ellie Arroway (Jodie Foster),
a radio astronomer whose preference of study involves the outdated technique
of "merely listening" to sounds out in space. Her interest in the field of
astronomy developed at a very young age, encouraged by her loving father, Ted
(David Morse), who let Ellie use a small ham radio to pick up on frequencies
and communicate with people as far away as Pensacola, FL (that was, of course,
before the days of Internet chat rooms). While everyone else uses modern
technologies to aid them in the search for extra-terrestrial intelligence (of
which the program SETI is an acronym for), Ellie prefers to pop on a pair of
headphones and see what she can pick up on, keeping the youthful magic and
intrigue strongly alive.
Ellie's strong scientific basis essentially makes her an atheist, a belief
likely influenced by the death of her father while she was still quite young.
In Puerto Rico, she meets Palmer Joss (Matthew McConaughey), a writer
examining the effects of technology on the world's overall happiness; a one-
time seminary student who describes himself as "a man of the cloth, without
the cloth". Despite the vast differences in opinion regarding a "supreme
being", Ellie and Palmer hit it off, and even take the time to sleep together.
It's a weak and hurried relationship, but director Zemeckis needs it to add to
the plot later on. Meanwhile, Dr. David Drumlin (Tom Skerritt), who has
authority over SETI but finds the program a frivolous waste of time and money,
is ready to pull the plug on any and all SETI funding. This leaves the
passionate Ellie searching for new sponsors, eventually finding a setup in New
Mexico and leaving Palmer with no explanation, and only a one night stand to
remember.
It is in this NM city where, several months later, Ellie finally picks up on a
strong signal from outer space, perhaps the most profound discovery in the
history of science. When the signal is closely examined, many new developments
spring up, and before long, Drumlin is stepping in to take over the operation
he once scoffed at. Eventually, it is concluded that information in the signal
may be blueprints for a transportation device used to teleport an Earthling to
Vega (where the signal seems to have originated). The media swarms, fanatics
go further off the deep end, scientists clamor for new information,
politicians huddle in discussion of appropriate actions to take, and
presidents are morphed into a celluloid reality (remember when Zemeckis
couldn't get enough of this in FORREST GUMP?). As if that weren't enough,
Ellie's discovery leads her to the nation's capital where she again runs into
Palmer.
CONTACT is based on the novel by Carl Sagan and deals heavily with the subject
of science vs. religion. The impressive thing is how well both aspects are
presented, with no signs of bias. Arguments for both sides are intelligent,
solid, and thought-provoking. When Palmer joins a selection committee to
choose an ambassador to Vega (of which Ellie is a leading candidate), personal
convictions play a more important role than love interests. The question is,
can a person who doesn't believe in God truly be the best representative of
Earth when 90% of the planet *does* believe in a higher power? Even when the
film wraps up, it's uncertain whether it's meant to play as an advocate for
religion, science, both, or even neither, and in our modern day society where
"right and wrong" is only opinion (at least speaking "politically correctly"),
the ambiguity is an incentive.
Don't get me wrong. As much as it sounds like it, CONTACT isn't merely a
theology class rolled into a reel of film. It's a *highly* enjoyable two and a
half hours. Despite its seemingly heavy issues, it's not a tedious undertaking
to watch this film. The special effects are outstanding, though (warning!)
highly depreciated on the small screen. Even so, some of the subtle visual
effects (that will likely go unnoticed by many) are even more impressive than
ones more recognizable as "sci-fi". The storytelling is rich and complete, and
although there are moments in the film that feel quite pretentious (and at
times, even hokey), it's easily one of the best 1997 films, and one of the
best sci-fi films I've ever seen. This is Zemeckis' best since BACK TO THE
FUTURE, and for those of us who actually know that FORREST GUMP was
astronomically overrated, Zemeckis now has real reason to boast.

Author
Andrew Hicks
        There have been so many movies in recent years about 
aliens that if any extraterrestrials ever do show up it will certainly be 
an anti-climax. CONTACT seems the exception -- no alien 
intervention could possibly be as anti-climactic as the last half-hour 
of CONTACT, a slow-moving film that builds up to a promising 
close encounter of the third kind and gives us an incredibly hokey 
dream-like sequence instead.
        It's a shame, too, because I really admired CONTACT 
up to that point. It's one of the only intelligent dealings with the 
ramifications of searching for alien life and the inevitable conflicts 
that will arise between the elements of religion and science and the 
representatives thereof. This Carl Sagan adaptation takes the high 
road all through the lengthy setup, providing us with a protagonist 
in which we invest a lot of emotion.
        We meet Ellie Airway, played by Jodie Foster (in her best 
performance since SILENCE OF THE LAMBS), at the tender age of 
8, already initiating contact via short-wave radio with people in far 
off places and looking through telescopes at the stars above. It's the 
nurturing of her loving father that makes it all possible and, like any 
other movie in which one parent figures large, we see the death of 
the father. The young Ellie doesn't buy the priest's explanation that 
it was part of God's undecipherable master plan, setting up a lifetime 
(and a movietime) of conflict between Ellie's rational agnostic mind 
and people of faith.
        The most interesting thing about CONTACT is this 
dichotomy and I'm sure it's by no personal bias of Sagan that the 
agnostic astronomer seems the most moral and emotional person in 
this diegetic universe. With a cast of one-notes like Tom Skeritt (the 
bastard-in-power who first cuts Ellie's funding then takes all the 
credit once contact with aliens is made), Angela Basset (skeptical 
White House female security agent) and James Woods (skeptical 
White House male security agent), that's hardly a surprise.
        Then there's Matthew McConaughey, the sympathetic 
religious figure who also serves as the movie's love interest. The 
word "religious" in CONTACT denotes a person who believes in 
faith over science -- as McConaughey's pontificating hippie points 
out, some people _need_ to believe in God rather than resign 
themselves to the loneliness felt when they realize they're so small 
and minute. Ellie's flip-side view is that science is the universal 
language and the existence of aliens would allow humans to be part 
of a much more unifying cosmic force.
        Lest the movie bog itself down too much beneath these 
sentiments, director Robert Zemeckis intersperses the same kind 
of media tricks that made FORREST GUMP seem in places like an 
important documentary. As Ellie receives a message from the great 
beyond, with visual instructions hidden behind images of Hitler 
(quite a unifying cosmic force his own self), the world takes notice. 
We see every CNN anchor ever hired pondering the ramifications of 
this contact, along with deftly-edited footage of President Clinton 
saying that this ground-breaking new discovery may alter the course 
of history. The real-life speech was about the advent of the Arch 
Deluxe burger, but a snip here and a morph there and suddenly he's 
talking about aliens.
        To which degree you will like CONTACT depends on your 
interest of the topic. We've seen alien intervention treated a hundred 
different ways in the movies, but rarely has it seemed so real and 
possible than in CONTACT. Rarely also has it been flushed down 
the cosmic crapper by such a New Age ending that looks like a 
Shirley MacLaine music video than a Hollywood finale. CONTACT 
is miles removed from MEN IN BLACK but with about 100 extra IQ 
points and a refusal to give the audience what they crave.
Visit the Movie Critic at LARGE homepage at
http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html
Serving America For Nearly 1/25th of a Century!

Author
Ryan McGinnis
  After seeing the Contact sneek preview bundled with Batman and Robin, I
can honestly say that I've never had such a wonderfully bittersweet night
at the movies.  
  First off, Contact; this is a movie that I'm sure quite a few of you are
wondering about.  My abridged impression?  It's the first intelligent,
nonpandering -- hell, it's the BEST SciFi to come out in a long long time.
I always say that good SciFi is a SciFi that presents things in an exciting
fashion that one has never seen before.  Well, Contact most certainly did
that.
  The intro was incredible; in fact, had the movie kept the feel and pace
of the intro, it could have been another 2001 all over again.  However, the
movie went and did it's own thing -- which isn't a bad thing, as it did it
well.
  Funny I should mention 2001.  This movie would, I think, appeal to the
same people who are fans of 2001.  It doesn't pander, it expexts you to
simply get lost in the film.
  After the intro, there is a lul period of about 20 minutes where you
think "Damn, this movie is pretty so-so"... and then it takes off, and
never slows down until the end.  I'm not talking about senseless action or
cheesy plot devices (remember, Batman and Robin comes later), I'm talking
about an incredibly engrossing story, wonderfully magestic and powerfull
visuals, and cinematography/lighting/feel that at times _takes your breath
away_.  The whole movie feels _real_, not like a reencation.  There isn't
much suspension of disbelief, because there isn't much disbelief to suspend
-- everything occurs so naturally, that you wouldn't be surprised to see it
happening on CNN tommorow.  You literally get lost in the movie's universe,
something I haven't felt since Aliens.
  Oddly enough, there enough newsperson cameos in the film to make you
wonder how they arranged it; it seems the entire CNN crew was in it at one
point or another.
  However, the movie needs some serious editing.  It's sad, but true; even
though they didn't get all of the story into Contact (the ending leaves off
before the books ending; less things are explained), the movie is too long
at over 2 1/2 hours.  Of course, for the last hour and a half it's nothing
but building -- so (if you're a sci-fi fan) you won't be bored.  The ending
also needs to change (though I know it won't), as it seemed to be very,
very unconclusive and a sort of.. well, how do you put it.. you realize
that the movie could have ended 25 minutes earlier without any real
signifigant loss.  The film _needs_ editing.
  Still, don't get me wrong -- this film has a few bumps, but there is
still time for some last minute editing; _and_ even if nothing is changed,
it's still very, very, very much worth seeing.  But _only_ if you like
serious scifi -- if you're looking for Independance Day or Men in Black..
then this film isn't for you.  :)  It's not escapism.
  On that note, let me say that the CGI and effects in Contact were WITHOUT
A DOUBT the best I've *EVER* seen.  That's no joke -- some of it was eerie.
At no point could one tell that a CGI effect was a CGI effect.  There were
some parts of the film where I simply sank back into my chair and kinda
went "Oh my god.."; it was that good, it was that real.  It all was
seamlessley blended in; and the greatest part?  No effect was squandered.
Nothing was there simply to be there -- everything served a purpose in
advancing the plot or conveying a feeling.  It was the best integration,
and the best CGI I've ever had the pleasure of seeing.  :)  I noticed
(among other companies) that ILM was listed in the credits.. all I can say
is that if this is how far CGI has come, I'm very excited about the future.
:)
  Contact -- wow.  :)  If they can just shorten it a bit, and fix the
ending..   :)
  Honestly, I haven't seen a film this bad in.. well, years.  It's really,
really, really bad.  It's not even good escapism.  It's not even
entertaining.  Yeesh, if this was what I wanted to see, I've popped in a
Power Rangers tape.  Talk about raping a comic book icon.  :P  
  Effects were bad, plot was horrible, dialouge seemed to comprise of "Did
we get 'em!" and "FREEEZE, AhahAHAHAHAHA, FREEEEEZE!"  When we were
introduced to a bunch of hockeyplaying baddies in the first 2 minutes of
the film, I knew it'd be bad.  But honest to god, I never would have stayed
around to see B&R if I knew it was going to be that bad -- even though it
was a freebie.  
  I almost spit up my Coke when, in a scene where Robin was supposed to be
struggling for air as a plant pulled him underwater, the camera simply
tracked him coming up, looking around, and then _backed up_ (yes,
physically rewound) to make it appear he was being pulled back down.  It
wasn't even that way for style, it was just a shotcut.  :P
  It was nice to see a Kubrick homage in there (I noticed a few people
dressed up in the exact same clothes as Alex and the Droogs, complete with
cane), but it's almost an insult.
  George Clooney as Batman?  I can think of some _extras_ that would have
done a better job.  Shumacher should be tied to the ceiling and pelted with
mortar shells.  
  I can't really emphasize how bad this film was.  :P  I'd sooner gouge my
eyes out with hot flaming pokers than go and sit through that again.  I'd
sooner rip my arm off and beat myself into submission.  I bet Burton is
loading up his semi-auto as we speak.  The ghost of Ed Wood is rising from
his grave to personally give Shumacher hell for "wasting so much damned
money."  By the end I would have personally killed Alfred with a spork if
it would have just ended the damned film.  

Author
Matt Petras
        This movie is one of the better ones that I have seen in a
long time, although I have not read the book by Carl Sagan I am fairly
sure that this movie does the book justice in every respect. The
acting in this movie is just superb and casting for the parts could
not have been done better I think. Although I think this movie is
something along the lines of perfect I did find a few small flaws...
There is a scene that kind of makes you think whoa this is not
happening this is too cheesy.. well that scene makes sense if you
think about it but it kind of struck me as being dumb at first. A few
other small things would be that I noticed that in one scene they were
panning in on a building and it was cloudy and foggy and really
rainy.. but when the scenes shifted to inside the building it was
already sunny through the windows.
        As mentioned above the acting in this movie is superb.. Jodie
Foster produces another stellar performance and in my opinion it is
her best to date. She shows emotion beautifully and fills the shoes of
a very demanding role as if the role had been made for her. Not one
moment in this movie did Jodie Foster seem like she was out of her
element. In my humble opinion her performance in this movie should at
least get her an Oscar nomination if not the prestigious award itself.
Matthew McConaughey also delivers a grand performance in the movie..
although the movie centers around Jodie and her character all the
other actors in the movie gave great performances. The sheer magnitude
of some of the scenes was spectacular.. to bring together such large
crowds for certain scenes and knowing when to use spectacular effects
shows a certain genius from the point of the director Robert Zemeckis.
        Although there are parts in this movie that are predictable
and the movie itself is rather lengthy neither of these things makes
much of a disturbance. Mind you if your bladder can't take a large
sized drink for more then 2.5 hours.. you might want to consider a
medium. hehe... I highly recommend this movie and it is one of the
better ones that have been released this year... it might not make the
millions of JP2 but I would have to say that this movie should be one
of the best of the year and maybe one of the better movies that have
been made recently. Go see it if you have the chance.

Author
Dean Thomas Sebastian Carrano
CONTACT
Starring Jodie Foster, Matthew McConaughey, James Woods, Tom Skerritt,
Angela Bassett
Viewed July 5, 1997 at advance screening in Forest Hills, NY
Capsule Review: Slow-moving tale lacks promised payoff.  But some good
moments along the way.  5 out of 10.
At my viewing of this film, I sat next to THE KIDS YOU DON'T WANT TO SIT
NEXT TO. They seemed to be expecting "Contact" to be along the lines of
"Independence Day".  "I better see some aliens!" they demanded of the
screen many times, and emphatically urged the story onward at every turn. 
I didn't share their impatience, but you gotta admit, this movie was LONG. 
It was about two and a half hours long, and seemed longer (unlike,
say, "The Godfather", which is a three hour movie that seems like two
hours max.)
For me, the pacing worked fine at first.  The movie begins with an epic
sequence.  The camera begins with a view of earth, and then pulls farther
and farther back, taking us past each planet in the solar system.  As we
leave earth behind, its sounds - radio and TV broadcasts which meander
randomly through space - fade out until we hear dead silence. "We get the
point already!" cried the kids, but the camera kept going and silence
otherwise reigned.  The spectacle, especially the dramatic use of total
silence, was reminiscent of 2001: A SPACE ODYSSEY, and the scene lived up
to that high standard. 
All these celestial wonders, we are meant to understand, have long been
contemplated by our heroine, Dr. Eleanor Arroway (Jodie Foster).  Since
the thrill of this movie is anticipation, I have to be pretty careful
here.  Suffice it to say that "Ellie" has devoted her life to listening
for signs of extraterrestrial intelligence via the use of massively
high-powered radio equipment that I couldn't even begin to explain.  This
is far from fictional, and indeed, a mark of the film throughout is that
it takes great pains to set itself in the real world and to avoid asking
the audience to suspend disbelief.  The Search for Extraterrestrial
Intelligence (SETI) government project is going on as we speak.  It's
based in New Mexico, and uses the famous Very Large Array to listen for
sounds of alien life. After some setbacks, Ellie is able to use the SETI
equipment for her research.  Needless to say, everyone thinks she's a
flake and the government, represented by the grandstanding science advisor
David Drumlin (Tom Skerritt), wants to cut her funding and use the money
for more "practical" applications.  Ellie's research is about to be
terminated when...she hears something.  A message that could only be
produced by an intelligent life form.  From then on, we watch the biggest
news story in history develop through the eyes of Ellie, its central
figure. 
This movie reminded me very strongly of two other films.  One was 2001,
mentioned above.  The other is THE ABYSS.  2001, THE ABYSS, and CONTACT
are all epics dealing with the first meeting of humanity and an alien
race.  2001 is the longest film of the three.  However, I would submit
that it has the most "payoff."  Even though we can argue for hours about
what "really happens" in that famous final scene, we accept it as a
fitting conclusion.  It fits in with the mythos that the story has
created. It is sufficiently dramatic.  We may not feel totally satisfied,
but we take this as a sign that some mystery is still retained, rather
than as a flaw in the storywriting. 
By contrast, THE ABYSS does not deliver that tremendous kick.  And CONTACT
is much, much worse in this regard.  If I were the aliens, I wouldn't even
bother to call us collect with the information they impart, much less go
through all the trouble they did.  It is a supreme disappointment.  At the
one moment where the movie needs inspired dialogue (or monologue), the
script fails.
One aspect of what Ellie learns from the aliens is brought out by her
relationship with Palmer Joss (Matthew McConaughey).  Ellie is an atheist; 
she sees no scientific evidence of God and thus cannot believe.  Palmer is
an ex-priest and best-selling spiritual author who believes that science
and technology are separating us from ourselves.  The relationship
reminded me of AGNES OF GOD, where Jane Fonda and Anne Bancroft might as
well have had "REASON" and "FAITH" stamped on their foreheads.  If you're
going to go this route, at least make it a little more subtle.  Palmer
doesn't have to be the spiritual leader of the country; he could just be a
guy that Ellie likes who has strong beliefs. 
As it was, these scenes were very unsubtle.  Moreover, they were wrongly
motivated. The movie assumes that science and religion are
irreconciliable.  This is just not true.  Many scientists believe that the
order they study - the beauty of the rules - could only have been created
by a supreme being.  This is a perfectly self-consistent viewpoint.  The
dichotomy - the assumption that one must choose between either science and
reason, or religion and faith - simply does not exist. However, since the
movie does set up this dichotomy, it is to its credit that Ellie does not
become a religious convert. 
One cannot help but be impressed by the plausibility of the "science" 
scenes.  I suppose this is what happens when you have Carl Sagan working
on your movie; the late, great astronomer not only wrote the novel on
which the movie is based, but co-wrote the screenplay and served as
co-producer.  The news coverage of the event, and the reactions of the
masses, are also very realistically portrayed.  As I said, the movie sets
out to make us believe that this could happen in our world tomorrow.
However, that impression is undermined by the final scenes.  At a
Congressional hearing, Ellie is grilled by another nasty government guy,
Michael Kitz (James Woods).  Ellie is supposed to be the smartest person
in the room, and there are any number of ways in which she could have
answered the questioning so as to make Kitz look absolutely ridiculous. 
Instead, she is made into another victim of the supposed reason/faith
dichotomy.  The last half hour of this movie needs serious editing.  So
does the first half hour, which does not contribute enough to the story to
pull its weight. 
To sum up: The special effects are spectacular.  (Although everyone in the
theater laughed at the computer-enhanced appearances of Bill Clinton as
himself. I know FORREST GUMP director Robert Zemeckis likes to do this,
but it was really gimmicky and detracted from the mood here.)  The story,
although it moves slowly, gets you excited when it does move.  You'll
believe in the story, and you'll be on the edge of your seat as the film
moves towards its climax.  And then you'll say, "Yeah...and?" 
Movie review by Dean Carrano - dcarrano@wesleyan.edu
(This is my first review.  Please send comments!)

Author
Walter Frith
     In a summer being bombarded with 100 million dollar spectacles and
action pictures with little or no room to leave an audience breathing, it is
truly refreshing to have a big budget Hollywood film arrive in theatres that
is skillfully presented, monumental in its vision (and visuals) and most
importantly one that will stir emotion in audiences familiar with the
Hollywood style of artful filmmaking.
     That film is 'Contact'.  Based on the novel by Carl Sagan, it's from
Oscar winning director Robert Zemeckis ('Forrest Gump'), who is a master at
combining technology and academics in film so brilliantly and tells the story
of an astronomer (Jodie Foster) driven by passion and intelligent belief that
Earthlings are probably not the only ones in the known universe with
intelligent life.  Her mission in life started when she was very young.
 Before she was ten years old she displayed stunning characteristics in
achieving greatness through the field of science and mathematics and saw her
way through to become a very important research technician, teacher and
pioneer in her chosen field.  Her greatness is not realized at first as her
low profile is eventually brought to the surface one evening as she receives
radio transmissions from outer space thought to be the first contact with
alien life.
     The world soon learns of this historic communication and there is a
frenzy of panic and protest which develops between the government, religious
groups, various world organizations and people in general as philosophy tries
to make sense of this seemingly impossible event.
     Transmissions begin filtering through the universe and eventually arrive
on Earth that categorize a blueprint of some sort which will enable the
people of our planet to build a machine of transportation to touch the
unthinkable if someone is willing to make the journey.  Politics and
competitive acts make their way through the system and a man (Tom Skerritt)
is finally chosen as the one who will make the journey.  He is someone with
whom Foster has had great conflicts with many times in her career and his
choice is a frustrating one for her to swallow.  That is as far as I will go
in telling you anything more about this modern masterpiece as many more
events unfold which lead to an eventual conclusion that will leave audiences
debating long after they leave the theatre.
     Jodie Foster is moving and head strong as the protagonist in this film
in a performance that is the best so far in 1997 and she could find herself
nominated for an Oscar next spring.  1997 has been lacking in great roles for
women so far and Foster's is the best one given since Frances McDormand's
Oscar winning, breakthrough and noticable performance in 1996's 'Fargo'.
 Other members of the cast include James Woods as a doubting and borderline
villain in the role of a national security agent, Angela Bassett as a White
House aide, John Hurt in a dark and fascinating performance as a man of
undisclosed wealth aiding Foster in her journey and Matthew McConaugheyas a
writer in a role that is somewhat under written and that is the film's only
weakness.
     I am tempted to make comparisons to other classic science fiction films
but somehow 'Contact' manages to escape comparisons because while it is
certanly influenced by achievements of the past, it's presentation is totally
original, intelligent and without pretention.

Author
Rick Pali
Ellie Arroway is a radio astronomer that's taken the professionally
dangerous specialisation of searching for extraterrestrial life. She's been
interested in radio since learning about her father's ham radio as a child.
Her old teacher David Drumlin (Tom Skerritt), as gruff as he is, thinks she
should change to a more respectable field within radio astronomy. When she
refuses, he manages to get the funding for her project pulled.
She manages to find funding from the enigmatic mega-rich recluse S.R.
Hadden (John Hurt) and continues the search. Later, she's given notice that
this search is to be cancelled, but not before she finds a signal from an
extra-terrestrial civilisation. The U.S. Government, in the guise of
Micheal Kitz (James Woods) moves right in and tries to limit the
information leaking out to the public.
Despite all the interference, they discover that there's a television
signal in the transmission and there are coded plans that seem to be for
some sort of machine. Should they build it? It clearly shows that there's a
seat for someone inside. Of course it's built, but what will it do when
activated?
I haven't revealed any more than the trailer or television commercials but
I think they even have gone a bit far. I don't even know where to begin
this review because there's so much I want to say.
Firstly the story. It's a faithful rendering of Carl Sagan's 1985
best-selling novel Contact. Of course, books change in their translation to
the screen and this one is no exception. I think that the story is very
strong and can easily hold the interested viewer for the two-and-a-half
hour length of this film. The shares the qualities of the best science
fiction. That is, the story is about people rather than effects or gadgets,
and it always makes you re-examine things that you normally accept without
thought. The film pays off in spades in both of these departments.
Jodie Foster has to have been the perfect choice to play Ellie. She's a
very strong character, but has weaknesses that Foster made the audience
believe. Every film I've seen Foster in has increased my respect for her
work and Contact has probably best displayed her flexibility as an actress
to date. The film was so much about Ellie, that very few other characters
had major roles. Notably though, most other characters without bit-parts
were given opportunities to show some development or different sides. I
rarely got the impression that they were one-dimensional cutouts.
The effects were excellent, but as I mentioned earlier, they serve only to
support the story. If you're expecting Independence Day, you'll get the
same quality effects, but they are attached to a very different type of
film. Particularly notable were the effects during the first test of the
machine. I distinctly recall that the whole theatre was completely silent.
And that wasn't the only time that the film had the crowd completely in its
thrall. But make no mistake, this isn't a film for everyone. If you're
looking for entertainment to be handed to you pre-digested, you're in the
wrong theatre. This is a film that requires you to think and pay attention.
Like any good piece of art, the onus is as much on the viewer as it is on
the artist and every viewer will take something different away from it. I
suspect that it shares that quality with 2001: A Space Odyssey but it's not
nearly as abstract. It's not an ID4 type of film and for that reason, I
very much doubt that it will be a runaway success. People seem not to want
to give anything to be entertained, despite the rewards. But because of
that, this film will be remembered for a very long time after ID4 is
forgotten.
I understand that Sagan was intimately involved with the film in an effort
to keep it true to the spirit of his work and to make sure that the science
was right. There he has succeeded brilliantly. No where will you find that
the filmmaker has bent the laws of physics for the purposes of the story.
How refreshing. And indeed that should never be necessary if it's taken
into account right from the start. Contact is one of the few examples of
hard SF that's ever made it to the screen intact. And that attention to
detail must've been contagious because it appears everywhere in the film.
The effect is so convincingly complete, that it's easy to forget you're
watching a completely fictional film. 
Sadly, Sagan died during the production and never got to see the finished
product. He's given a touching tribute at the end with all the love and
respect he so richly deserved. I thought to myself that dedication was a
nice offering to his memory, but realised the whole film is largely a gift
from him to us. And what a gift.
Contact is easily the best science fiction film in a decade but it
transcends what Hollywood means when it says science fiction. It's a story
about humanity, not aliens. Don't under any circumstances miss this one.

Author
Kevin Patterson
Film review (C) 1997 by Kevin Patterson
Contact (PG, 1997)
Directed by Robert Zemeckis. 
Starring Jodie Foster, Matthew McConaughey, Tom Skerritt.
        Contact  is a film that tries to do several different things. It is
intended to present a realistic picture of what alien contact might be like,
to restore a sense of wonder and mystery to the issue of extraterrestrial
life, to raise questions about science and faith and how they would be
relevant in such a situation, and to tell a personal story of a romance
between the astronomer Dr. Ellie Arroway (Jodie Foster) and the religious
spokesman Palmer Joss (Matthew McConaughey).
The film succeeds wonderfully at its first two goals. The portrayal of
the communication from an alien world is much more reasonable (albeit less
immediately engaging) than, say, the cold-blooded destructiveness of the
invaders in Independence Day   or even the complex process of abductions and
genetic hybridization that forms the ongoing plot line of TV's The X-Files. 
The aliens in Contact  seem to be like us-they are more curious than anything
else. They know we exist, they want us to know that they exist, and they would
like to make the next step and communicate in person. The film wisely refrains
from showing us the aliens directly, and between the characters' ongoing
speculation about the extraterrestrials and the outstanding visuals in the
climactic yet enigmatic scene when Arroway arrives on the alien world, that
sense of wonder and mystery comes through with a force rarely seen since
Stanley Kubrick's 2001: A Space Odyssey. 
Most of the film, however, takes place on Earth, where there is an
extended public debate on how to respond to these aliens. Scientists are
enthusiastic, ultraconservative religious leaders are wary, and government
officials are caught somewhere in between. The debate is fueled largely by Dr.
Arroway's atheism; she seems the obvious choice to pilot the spacecraft for
which the aliens have provided blueprints, but many are wary of sending an
atheist as humankind's representative to another species. The film is partly
successful in raising and exploring these questions, especially when it
reaches a conclusion that suggests that the two approaches - science and faith
- could be viewed as complementary rather than diametrically opposed.
Still, the film falls a little short in its representation of this
conflict as it exists in American society. The two "sides" are represented
primarily by Arroway and by far-right fundamentalists, but in reality probably
80% of Americans are neither atheists nor far-right fundamentalists. Palmer
Joss occupies something of a middle ground, but he ultimately becomes
distracted by personal motives and comes across as a less-than-ideal spokesman
for any ideology. Then again, the film does concentrate mostly on public
debate, which does, after all, tend to be dominated by extremists, rather than
on dinner-table or college-dormitory discussions. Contact  is accurate in its
portrayal of these issues, then, but only within the narrow scope to which it
confines itself.
The film's one clear failure is in the portrayal of the romance
between Arroway and Joss. For one thing, it resorts to the tired movie clich*
that two attractive people will immediately fall in love as soon as they
appear on the screen together, as there does not seem to be any other reason
for their instant mutual attraction. The romance rarely, if ever, sheds any
light on the characters, although it occasionally tries and fails - Joss's
explanation that he quit the priesthood because of the celibacy requirement
("I guess you could say I'm a man of the cloth, but without the cloth"), for
example, is more like a punchline to a joke than character development.
Instead, the romance mostly seems to exist for the sake of later plot
developments. Granted, this is a plot- and idea-driven film and the characters
are secondary, but this just seemed like laziness on the writers' part more
than anything else.
The successes of Contact,  however, far outweigh its failures. Even if
the social commentary had fizzled altogether (which it didn't), the simple yet
mysterious story of alien communication still would have made it a memorable
film. Contact  doesn't quite cover all the bases, but it covers about as much
as one could hope for in a two-hour film, and its rejection of big-budget
theatrics for a more realistic story is certainly admirable. And I would not
be surprised if, ten years from now, Contact  is mentioned in the same breath
as 2001 and Blade Runner  as one of the finest examples of sophisticated and
intellectually relevant science fiction.
Grade: A

Author
Kathy Glaser
What do you picture in your mind when you hear the words "movie" and
"aliens" together? With the 1996 blockbuster Independence Day you could be
forgiven for associating a movie about aliens with squid-like creatures
that terrorize our planet. But once in a while Hollywood manages to release
a thought-provoking film like Contact, which is about alien life, but which
doesn't have an "us-vs-ugly aliens" theme and isn't loaded with special
effects wizardry (though Contact does have some stunning scenes). 
Jodie Foster stars as Ellie Arroway, an astronomer who searches for
extra-terrestrial life by radio signal. She is a brilliant scientist who
turned down a teaching post at Harvard to pursue her obsession, convinced
that there is life out there. We are reminded three times in the film it
would be an awful waste of space if it was just us in the world. After the
funds for her project in Puerto Rico are cut off, she goes to do research
in New Mexico where she is financed by a super-rich recluse.  Ellie's
search for other-world existence is not in vain (of course, since a movie
about an astronomer just sitting in the desert with nothing happening would
be pointless). She hears signals in a code of prime numbers; these aliens
who have let their existence be known also send blue-prints for building a
machine that will take one earthling to meet them. After an initial
disappointment, Ellie becomes the chosen one. For anyone who has not yet
seen the film, it would be a spoiler to reveal the actual contact scene.
Suffice it to say that it's brief, somewhat unexpected (though reminiscent
of the last scene in 2001: A Space Odyssey), and it put a twist on the
debate between science and faith.
The conflict between science and religion is at the core of Contact.
Science and reason are personified by Ellie, who at an early age displayed
her rational mind. Her father died when she was nine years old, and when a
priest tried to comfort her by saying, in effect, that God's ways were
mysterious but it was all meant to be, she replied that if only they had
kept the medicine on the first floor she could have run to it faster and
saved her father. Fate had nothing to do with his death. On the other side,
advocating religion, is Palmer Joss (played by Matthew McConaughey), a
theologian who never became a priest (he apparently had trouble with the
celibacy thing). He and Ellie have a very brief affair in Puerto Rico, and
meet again later after the alien signals have been received. As a member of
the committee to decide the Earth emissary to the alien beings, he refuses
to vote for her. One reason is purely selfish; she would be risking her
life in the endeavor and he wanted her to be with him. The second reason is
because of her disbelief in a Supreme Being. He can't in good conscience
approve of an atheist being the first human to meet an alien species.
Contact shows the fear that many among the religious community have
regarding life on other planets. It's not the fear that aliens will attack
Earth, but rather that the Holy Book is wrong. After thousands of years of
believing that man is the center of the universe and created in God's
image, man would turn out to be just another species. To many people of
faith, the discovery of other beings would be psychologically devastating.
In Contact, Jake Busey plays the crazed leader of a religious cult who
sabotages the first transport machine. Though he is a cardboard character
(as is Richard Rank, the slick, self-righteous leader of a Christian
Coalition-type group, played by Rob Lowe) there is no doubt that if alien
life were discovered, it would drive many people to acts of desperation. 
Overall, Contact is a good, intelligent piece of storytelling, though at 2
1/2 hours it's longer than an average movie. There's some technical jargon
(which, Jodie Foster says, baffled even her), but it doesn't distract from
the story. The question of life on other planets is a fascinating one, and
beings from other planets actually making contact with us is a
mind-boggling prospect.
I couldn't help thinking, though, after I saw the movie, about the Calvin
and Hobbes cartoon, in which Calvin tells Hobbes how he had read that
countless species were being pushed toward extinction by man's destruction
of forests. And he adds, "Sometimes I think the surest sign that that
intelligent life exists elsewhere in the universe is that none of it has
tried to contact us."

Author
Chuck Dowling
Contact (1997) NO STARS out of ***** - Cast: Jodie Foster, Matthew
McConaughey, James Woods, Tom Skerritt, Angela Bassett, John Hurt, Rob Lowe,
David Morse. Written by: James V. Hart and Michael Goldenberg. Based on the
novel by: Carl Sagan. Directed by: Robert Zemeckis. Running Time: 150
minutes.
Hollywood, and specifically Robert Zemeckis, has given me a cure for
insomnia which will never fail to work. "Contact" is just about the most
painfully slow, dull, and lifeless film I have ever had the misfortune to
sit through in a movie theater.
Now, as I have been reading the advance reviews for "Contact" it seems that
my opinion here is going to be in the minority. I've read statements like
"It's one of the best films of the decade" and "Hollywood has finally come
close to perfection". So I feel as though I'll need to over-justify many of
my comments.
First off, I am all for long movies, just as long as it's a good movie. If a
film can maintain it's level of entertainment, it can go on forever as far
as I'm concerned. So when I say that "Contact" is way too long, which it
most certainly is, don't dismiss it as that I just hate long movies.
Second, there doesn't have to be action or mayhem going on in a film for it
to entertainment. I'm not a brainless drooler who's only entertained by
stuff blowed up real good. Some of my favorite films are dramas, with very
little going on in them. But they have a compelling story and characters who
are interesting, unlike "Contact".
"Contact" is all about listening for radio signals from outer space for
signs of intelligent life. Sounds exciting doesn't it? The opening shot of
the film, a very lengthy pullback through the universe, shows us how far our
own radio and television signals are able to reach. But this goes on WAY too
long, and sets the stage for the film's utter boredom.
In the first 45 minutes, not much happens. You'd think that this would the
time where characters are developed, but not so. There just really isn't
anything going on. Astronomer Jodie Foster meets up with hunky Matthew
McConaughey and the two immediately jump into bed together. This is
character development?
Then, a signal is received from outer space. Finally, something interesting.
But amazingly, the scene is so dull, and done with a total lack of energy
that who would care? Foster discovers this signal, and then for ten minutes
babbles nothing but complex scientific jargon about it to her co-scientists
which left me completely lost. What exactly is going on? Take some advanced
science classes and maybe you too can understand.
>From that point on, I was pretty much looking around the theater for
something else to look at. So to go into the details about the remainder of
the film would be impossible to do, since it never got more interesting than
the theater ceiling. I do know that James Woods and David Morse are
completely wasted in very small roles. Robert Zemeckis, please don't follow
the path which you are on. Joel Schumacher awaits you at it's end. [PG]
Visit Chuck's Movie Reviews at http://users.southeast.net/~chuckd21/
Over 1,600 movies rated and/or reviewed!  Movie news, film related links, and reader's reviews.

Author
Randy Turgeon
Summary 
        Eight year old Ellie Arroway (Jena Malone) and her father, Ted (David
Morse), are very close. Her mother died while giving berth to her and her
father never remarried, bringing up Ellie on his own. She is a very
intelligent girl and her hobbies include such things as short wave radio
and telescopes, hobbies she shares closely with her dad. Tragedy strikes
her life when her dad dies that year.
        Flash forward to present time where Ellie (Jodie Foster) has pursued a
scientific career, becoming an astronomer. She listens intently to sounds
emitted by the universe, hoping to make contact with other intelligent
life.  She has a bumpy road ahead as her boss, Dr. Drumlin (Tom Skerritt)
informs her that her department is getting shut down. She refuses to give
up, and successfully interviews for an investor to back her project on her
own.
        Ellie's dreams come true when she eventually hears what she believes is an
intelligent signal from outer space. It is indeed confirmed to be so, and
the signal is decoded to reveal a shocking image. It is video footage of
Hitler giving his speech before the 1936 Olympics. That is not all. It also
appears that the signal contains thousands of pages of text, which turn out
to be blueprints for a machine. What exactly the machine will do is a
mystery, although it appears like it will act as a transport.
        Ellie finds that her troubles have only begun. She now has to deal with
many problems, including 
a brash, unfriendly military advisor (James Woods), her former boss who
returns to stake his claim, her lover (Matthew McConaughey) who questions
her non-religious motives, the overall media frenzy that the machine
causes, and bizarre dealings with the mysterious S.R. Hadden (John Hurt),
the owner of the company backing her project. 
All is not lost for Ellie, as she is eventually chosen to be the sole
person who will "pilot" the machine for its incredible journey into the
unknown, a journey into history.
Commentary
        I read many reviews for this film when it came out last summer and found
that people either loved it or hated it. There was no in between. I can
honestly say I fall in the "in between" category. 
        I liked some of the plot threads, such as the accurate depiction of the
media frenzy and radical religious groups. There are some good
performances, most notably William Fichtner who, I thought, had been
typecast to play psychotic killers, John Hurt as the eccentric millionaire,
and Angela Bassett as the White House Aide. Jodie Foster does her usual
fine job also.
        What I did not care for was the relationship between Foster and
McConaughey. They did not have much chemistry together, and I felt their
relationship was predictable. I could accurately guess every time the
McConaughey character was due to pop up in Ellie's life again, and I knew I
should have bet the farm on whether or not he would betray her at some
critical point during her quest. If anything, I felt Ellie had more
chemistry with John Hurt (of all people), considering both of them were
outcasts and a bit eccentric.
        There has been much talk about the ending to Contact, and this is where
most critics are divided. I felt that the ending was a major letdown.
Without giving away too much, lets just say that I felt that there could
have a been a lot more done with Ellie's destination and who she sees when
she gets there. The special effects are nothing special either.
        I have seen some good films with sub-par endings before ("Swimming With
Sharks" and the alternate ending to "Clerks" come to mind), and some of
them can be forgiven because the overall effect of the movie escapes
unscathed. But because the entire point of Contact relies on its ending,
and that ending is so poorly done, I cannot recommend the film.
Directed by Robert Zemeckis.
Ellie Arroway...................Jodie Foster
Ted Arroway.....................David Morse
Michael Kitz.....................James Woods
Kent Clark.......................William Fichtner
David Drumlin..................Tom Skerritt
Palmer Joss.......................Matthew McConaughey
Rachael Constantine............Angela Bassett

Author
Steve Rhodes
     Blind astro-audio specialist Kent Cullers (William Fichtner)
lampoons, "Dr. Arroway will be spending her precious telescope time
looking for."  "Little green men," says Dr. Eleanor Arroway (Jodie
Foster) completing his sentence.
     CONTACT is director Robert Zemeckis's latest and most ambitious
production ever, tackling nothing less than the question of whether we
are alone in the universe, as well as whether there is a God, and
whether it matters what your opinion is on the subject.
     Robert Zemeckis is known for high concept movies with big name
stars.  Most of his films, like ROMANCING THE STONE, the BACK TO THE
FUTURE trilogy, and FORREST GUMP, have been both critical and financial
successes.  Since he became famous, his only flop has been DEATH
BECOMES HER.
     CONTACT has a galaxy of stars (Jodie Foster, Matthew McConaughey,
James Woods) and many minor, but still luminous celestial bodies
(Angela Bassett,  John Hurt, Tom Skerritt).  Moreover, Michael
Goldenberg's script is based on a novel by our era's most famous
proponent of the cosmos, Carl Sagan, and on a story by Carl Sagan and
Ann Druyan.  In short, the film's credentials are impeccable.
     Few films glorify the unknown and relish ambiguity to the extent
that CONTACT does.  It even dares to pose many more questions that it
ever attempts to answer.  Most audiences, including the one at my press
screening, have applauded at the film's conclusion.  Still, some
viewers will undoubtedly walk out complaining.  More than that I cannot
say about the ending without revealing key aspects of the story's
resolution.
     The film starts with 9-year-old Ellie, played in an incredibly
moving performance by Jena Malone, calling far away on her ham radio as
well as gazing at the stars with her dad, Ted (David Morse).  Her mom
died at childbirth, and in a traumatic scene soon after the film opens,
her dad dies too.  Although rated PG, this cerebral film will probably
bore younger kids for whom it is also inappropriate.  Beside the death
of a parent, for which Ellie thinks herself partially responsible,
there is also a scene where the heroine goes to bed with a guy as soon
as she meets him.
     Jodie Foster, who has given few mediocre performances in her
career, stretches herself with this one.  Foster, who has tough down
pat, usually has trouble looking vulnerable.  Dr. Arroway, a relentless
researcher who searches deep in space for signs of intelligent life, is
made human by Foster.  With her pony tale, glasses, and make-up Ellie
usually looks like a harmless, but attractive nerd.  She rails against
the establishment as personified by the President's National Science
Advisor, David Drumlin (Tom Skerritt).  ("Ellie, still waiting for E.T.
to call?" he chides.) When he cuts her funding, she goes on a frenzied
search for private capital.  Although outwardly resolute, her nerves
speak of an inner fear of losing it all.
     When the inevitable call from space comes, Zemeckis stages it so
that Ellie is away from the command center.  This way he can build the
tension as she races back barking a constant stream of orders on her
cell phone to her fellow researchers.
     Easily, the best part of the show is not the acting but the
science.  How an alien civilization chooses to communicate is certain
to fascinate everyone, especially those of us with backgrounds in the
language chosen -- mathematics.  You will never guess who appears in
the first television transmission from deep space.  Only a highly
imaginative script would dream it up and complement it with a plausible
explanation.
     James Woods, arguably the best villain in the movies today, plays
the President's National Security Advisor, Michael Kitz.  Kitz wants to
militarize the project immediately.  He has seen enough science fiction
movies to know that aliens mean destruction.
     In the past, Matthew McConaughey's skills as an actor have
revolved around his ability to look pretty while delivering his lines
in a haughty manner with a whispery enunciation.  His bland performance
in CONTACT as Palmer Joss, a "man of the cloth without the cloth," is
consistent with the rest of his career.  The writer on issues of
religion and technology pens such words as, "We shop at home, we surf
the Web, at the same time we're emptier."  His character and the whole
pseudo-religious babble of the story should have been eliminated.  The
movie even has Rob Lowe, of all people, show up as a ridiculous
Christian theologian named Richard Rank, an obvious put-down of Ralph
Reed of the Christian Coalition.
     The script has the good sense to include some humor to accompany
the picture's seriousness.  "So there's life on other planets," opines
Jay Leno in his nightly monologue.  "That's sure going to change the
Miss Universe contest!" And near the spot where Dr. Arroway heard the
transmission from space, people encamp Woodstock-style in a scene
straight out of MARS ATTACKS! or INDEPENDENCE DAY.
     The best small role in the film belongs to John Hurt as S.R.
Hadden, a Howard Hughes-style recluse and engineer extraordinaire.
     And the picture's best technological gadget is the contraption
built to whisk away someone to visit the aliens.  Who decides who will
be the lone astronaut is another of the film's conundrums.  In perhaps
its least believable part, the panel includes a theologian.  And in the
piece de resistance, belief in God is made a litmus test for space
travel.
     CONTACT drags frequently and runs too long at 2:30.  It is rated
PG, but kids will probably need to be 9 or 10 to appreciate it.  I
recommend this highly inventive film to you and give it ***.  A version
without the pseudo-religious aspects and without McConaughey would have
earned a higher rating in my book.
Opinions expressed are mine and not meant to reflect my employer's.

Author
Michael Jordan

Contact (PG) **** (out of ****)
        There's a moment late in Robert Zemeckis's Contact where I was
reminded of why I started writing movie reviews in the first place.  We see
a scientist, dressed in a silvery space suit, walking tentatively across a
narrow walkway leading inside a compact, spherical space pod, unaware of
what awaits when the ball literally drops.  Anticipation, excitement,
anxiety, fear--the audience experiences it all the emotional tension right
with the character, nervously, breathlessly eager to see what lies ahead.
It is this sense of discovery, the anticipation of which and its
accompanying exhilaration, that makes this adaptation of the Carl Sagan
novel such magical, captivating entertainment.
        Jodie Foster stars as Dr. Ellie Arroway, a brilliant astronomer who
dedicates her entire life to searching outer space for extraterrestrial
radio signals.  And I mean life--after losing her entire family when she was
young, the only thing occupying Ellie's world is this quest to discover life
beyond this earth.  After dealing with much skepticism on the part of
government officials and wealthy financiers, Ellie receives her vindication
when she stumbles upon an incoming radio transmission from the distant star
Vega, which includes instructions on building an interstellar transport.
        From this synopsis, Contact does not sound too different to most
films about alien contact, but there is a whole lot more to this intelligent
film than the sci-fi hook.  The alien contact angle generates a great amount
of suspense and awe, but perhaps more than anything else, Contact is a
character study of Ellie, whose obsession with empirical, scientific
evidence has erased all belief in a higher power.  The irony is that, while
admitting to having no religious faith, she holds onto her belief in
extraterrestrial life with such passion and conviction that it becomes, in a
sense, a religion in its own right.  It would be easy for scripters James V.
Hart and Michael Goldenberg, in trying to paint a positive image of the
heroine, to champion her scientific beliefs over religious ones, but they
wisely eschew easy answers, giving equal time to both sides, and in so doing
depict Ellie as not completely sane.  In the end, there is no right or
wrong, nor is there one side that comes off more positive in the other, even
slightly so--there are just two very viable points of view, each with their
own merits, each with their own faults.
        The complex role of Ellie is an actress's dream, and Foster, a
virtual shoo-in for yet another Best Actress Oscar nomination next year,
more than rises to the challenge.  She conveys intelligence, determination,
warmth, and, in a gutsy move,  always on edge.  We root for Ellie and feel
for her, but we also feel at times that she goes too far.  Contact is
clearly Foster's vehicle, but others are given their chance to shine in
smaller roles.  Matthew McConaughey, who receives outrageously high billing
for his smallish role, holds his own as the religious counterpoint to Ellie,
spiritual scholar and government adviser Palmer Joss (however, his main
storyline, the tentative Palmer-Ellie romance, is the film's weakest
subplot).  John Hurt is effectively creepy as S.R. Hadden, the wealthy
eccentric who provides Ellie with her research funding.  Angela Bassett
continues to impress in her bit role as White House aide Rachel Constantine.
Most memorable of all, though, are Tom Skerritt and James Woods, who play
rival scientist Dr. David Drumlin and national security adviser Michael
Litz, respectively; both, especially Skerritt, embody these asshole
characters that the audience hissed  just about every single one of their
appearances.
        Zemeckis comes off of his three-year break in top shape.  Always
known as a director of effects-laden extravaganzas, it comes as no surprise
that Contact's visual effects are quite stunning.  The central space journey
is more than a little reminiscent of the close of 2001: A Space Odyssey, but
with more advanced technology at his disposal, Zemeckis's voyage is even
trippier than Stanley Kubrick's yet more wondrously pure.  And Zemeckis
doesn't resist the urge to use the always-interesting
incorporate-actors-into-existing-film-footage effect, which is every bit as
seamless here as it was in Forrest Gump.  Effects, however, are confined to
only a few scenes and clearly take a back seat to the drama, emotion, and
pure wonder, which Zemeckis proved to be quite adept at in Gump.  It says a
lot that, in a summer science fiction film such as this, it's not so much
the effects that stay with you as it is the drama and the issues that are
raised.
        The thought-provoking, two-hour-plus Contact is a much-welcome
change of pace from summer no-brainers, but the fact that it is a smart film
does not mean that it also isn't entertaining.  For all the interesting
questions it asks, the film is still what it's being sold as--"a journey to
the heart of the universe."  And what a fascinating, unforgettable journey
it is.
Michael Dequina
mrbrown@ucla.edu  |  mj23@the18thhole.com
mrbrown23@juno.com  |  mrbrown@iname.com  |  mst3k@digicron.com
mj-23@geocities.com  |  michael_jordan@geocities.com
Visit Mr. Brown's Movie Site at http://members.tripod.com/~MrBrown/
Personal Page: http://members.tripod.com/~MrBrown/home.html
Michael Jordan Sites:
http://members.tripod.com/~mj23/mj.html  &
http://www.geocities.com/Colosseum/Field/2302/
CONGRATULATIONS MICHAEL & THE BULLS!

Author
Ivana Redwine
Produced by: Warner Bros. Directed by Robert Zemeckis, Effects by: Sony
Pictures Imageworks, Cinematography by Don Burgess. Starring: Jodie Foster,
Matthew McConaughey, James Woods, Angela Bassett, John Hurt, Rob Lowe, Tom
Skerritt, William Fichtner, David Morse, Jena Malone. 
In director Robert Zemeckis' screen version of the late Carl Sagan's
bestselling 1985 novel CONTACT, there is a moment of pure movie magic:
After the public learns that a broadcast has been received from intelligent
extraterrestrial life, we see a car moving slowly through the circus-like
atmosphere of a huge crowd that has camped out around a scientific facility
in the New Mexico desert. The crowd, which contains everything from an
evangelist to an Elvis impersonator, is a motley crew of various and sundry
people, most of whom are in the throes of something between a party mood
and a blissed-out state. Inside the car, Dr. Ellie Arroway (Jodie Foster),
the brilliant radio astronomer responsible for detecting the broadcast and
recognizing its meaning, stares through the window in disbelief, dismay,
and horror. Her idealism, honesty, and determination have served her well
in the arena of science, but she is ill-prepared to deal with society's
reaction to her discovery.
Foster's performance is what takes CONTACT far beyond the pale of  the kind
of vacuous entertainment that most moviegoers have to settle for during the
summer, and the actress is again a strong candidate for an Academy Award
nomination. (Foster has previously won Oscars for her acting in THE SILENCE
OF THE LAMBS and THE ACCUSED.) In addition to featuring a great star turn,
CONTACT is a film with intelligence, heart, and some of the most
aesthetically beautiful, dazzling, and well-integrated special effects
sequences I have seen since Kubrick's 2001: A SPACE ODYSSEY.
The film's visually breathtaking opening sequence revolves around radio and
television signals as they speed away from earth into the depths of space,
and through the wizardry of special effects, we follow them on the way out.
Eventually all this manages to dovetail back into the eye of a young girl,
and we are introduced to the film's heroine as a child. Young Ellie (well
played by actress Jena Malone) is a short-wave radio and astronomy buff
whose hobby is trying to contact faraway places via short- wave radio,
marking each success with a thumbtack on a map. Soon her child's
imagination becomes fascinated with the possibility of life on other
planets. Her father, who helps to nurture her interest in astronomy, makes
the point that if intelligent life didn't exist somewhere other than on
earth, it would be "an awful waste of space."
There is a telling scene early in the film that reveals young Ellie's
character and foreshadows the kind of woman she will become. The girl's
beloved father, who suffers from a heart condition, has an attack one day,
and while Ellie runs upstairs to get his medicine, he dies. A priest
attempts to comfort the grief-stricken girl, but Ellie can find no
consolation in the priest's appeal to spirituality and mysticism. Instead,
she channels her energy into a cool, rational analysis of what happened and
reaches the conclusion that she should have kept some of her father's
medicine downstairs so she could have reached it more quickly in an
emergency.
Years later, Ellie Arroway is an adult with an earned Ph.D. who is
conducting research at an observatory in Puerto Rico. There she meets
Palmer Joss (Matthew McConaughey), a writer/theologian who is studying the
effect of technology on the local population. Joss's faith in God is as
strong as Arroway's scientific skepticism, and the contrast between their
belief systems is one of the film's main themes. It is fitting that Joss
turns out to be a former priest who loved the theological aspects of the
priesthood, but whose raging hormones had made him realize he would not be
able to fully honor his vows. One of the functions of the Joss character is
to provide a love interest for Arroway, and the film makes it clear that,
in spite of their dedication to their respective careers, they do not
observe celibacy. Later, he goes on to write a bestselling book that is a
mix of religion and philosophy; due to the book's success, he becomes a
sort of new-age spiritual guru. Although the character as written is little
more than a cardboard cutout, McConaughey is convincing as Palmer Joss: his
kind face and obvious sex appeal give the role more dimension and
credibility than actually seems to be in the script itself.
Ellie is able to enjoy her research at the Puerto Rico observatory for only
a little while before the funding for the project is suddenly cut by her
superior, David Drumlin (Tom Skerritt). Drumlin is a
scientist-administrator with an icily pragmatic approach, which serves as a
counterpoint to Ellie's  passion and idealism. To Drumlin, science seems to
be more of a vehicle for self-aggrandizement than anything else. I liked
what Skerritt did with Drumlin's character--adding just the right touches
of slippery suaveness, ruthless ambition, and shameless opportunism to his
portrayal.
When Drumlin pulls the government appropriations from the Puerto Rico
project, Ellie seeks private funding for her research. After many setbacks,
she finds a strange ally in S.R. Hadden (in a strong performance by John
Hurt, who imparts an eerie spectralness to the character). Hadden is a
brilliant engineer turned entrepreneur, and his wealth allows him to
indulge in an eccentric lifestyle. His idiosyncrasies include the avoidance
of being earthbound: he lives on a plane that rarely lands, and later in
the film takes up residence on a space station. He offers to fund her
project, and she moves her research to New Mexico, where she can use the
Very Large Array of radio telescopes to listen to the skies.
Ellie's intensity and dogged devotion to her work finally pay off, and she
intercepts a broadcast from an extraterrestrial intelligence, but her
narrow focus makes her a little naive about how the media, public, and
political interests are going to react to the news. When a press conference
is held to announce her discovery, Dr. Arroway is busy going over flash
cards in preparation for speaking to the journalists. But before she can
say anything, her old boss David Drumlin takes over the podium and tries to
take credit for her discovery. It is outrageous behavior, especially since
he was the man who cut the funds for her Puerto Rico project, telling her
she was throwing away her career if she stayed in such an unpromising line
of research.
Naturally, the media goes into a feeding frenzy once the news of the alien
broadcast is out. As was done in Zemeckis' FORREST GUMP, CONTACT employs
digitally manipulated images from old newscasts, including footage that
features Bill Clinton in the cameo role of--you guessed it--the President
of the United States. Zemeckis had originally intended that the role of the
President be played by Sidney Poitier, but eventually decided against it.
The inclusion of the modified news footage was done without Clinton's
permission, and according to reports in the press, the President was not
pleased.
An exciting thread in the film concerns plans transmitted by the aliens for
a device that could possibly transport humans deep enough into space to
enable contact with the extraterrestrial intelligence, and an international
consortium joins forces to build this machine. I was really impressed by
the superb production design and deft special effects that went into the
completed device. Its visual aspects have strong Jungian resonance, drawing
on mental models of the untouchably small and the untouchably large. The
machine reminded me of both electrons revolving around a nucleus and
planets revolving around a star, while also resembling a sort of
three-dimensional mandala. Luckily I saw CONTACT at  a theater that has an
excellent sound system, and the crystalline clarity of the vibration-like
noise the device gives off while being powered up gave me goose bumps. It
was a sound that was strangely primal, while at the same time eerily
mechanical and otherworldly.
Another memorable sequence in the film takes place when Ellie is
transported into deep space through a series of wormholes, and the special
effects made it so believable that I felt I was along for the ride. As a
result of her journey through the wormhole, Ellie goes through an
experience that changes her life and subtly alters her perspective on
things. However, the way the film treated what happened at the end of her
journey seemed to me to be a bit of a letdown. Then, however, the movie
recovers much of its earlier momentum, and in an ironic twist, Dr. Arroway
has to try to convince a government panel of something for which the only
evidence appears to be her own incredible eyewitness account. The coolly
rational scientist must ask others to do what she herself had been
previously incapable of doing--take something on faith.
Thanks to the cinematography of Don Burgess and special effects by Sony
Pictures Imageworks, CONTACT is a richly cinematic film. The special
effects are elegant and effective, and although they are often dazzling,
they never overwhelm the story and often enhance the movie's emotional
impact.
I was particularly impressed by the cinematography depicting New Mexico and
the area near the Very Large Array, especially the shots that emphasized
the vastness of the surrounding landscape. To me this functioned as an
earthbound frame of reference that echoed the expanses and aching
loneliness of space. In a similar vein, the shots of handfuls of sand and
dirt, twinkling away like stars, reinforces the same kind of feeling. While
watching this, I could hear in my imagination Carl Sagan's voice saying
"billions and billions"
Although it has many vibrant moments, CONTACT is a little uneven and at
times it is heavy-handed, resembling a TV movie in its unwillingness to
trust the audience to think for itself and to be able to follow the story
without intrusive guideposts and heavy explication. However, viewers like
me who admire the film will be disposed to overlook these flaws. In any
case, I admire Zemeckis' willingness to take chances in films like FORREST
GUMP and CONTACT. These are the kinds of movies that elicit strong
reactions, ranging from ire to admiration. Because CONTACT contrasts the
realms of spirituality and faith against the realms of reason and logic,
some people will never get past their knee-jerk reactions and won't be able
to enjoy the film for what it is--an entertaining mix of science fiction
and a sprinkling of science fact. But the movie doesn't play it completely
safe, and this gives the film quite a bit of power, even though it
eventually loses its nerve and goes for a warm, fuzzy, all-encompassing,
new-age kind of resolution. However, even though Zemeckis pulls his punches
on loaded issues, at least he is willing to address them, which was
something I didn't except to see in a big-budget summer Hollywood
blockbuster.
In my opinion CONTACT is a very good film that unfortunately sometimes
misses its mark because of minor flaws. As good as the movie is, I couldn't
help but think that it had the potential to be even better. During the
first part of the movie, CONTACT dangles tantalizing glimmers of becoming
truly provocative, but in the end it is geared more toward entertainment
than deep critical thought. Nevertheless, it is an emotionally engaging
film that features an outstanding performance by a great actress, Jodie
Foster, and that is enough to give it passages of incandescent power.

Author
Max Scheinin
Black. A moment's hesitation and then we see the word in simple white
lettering:
Real movie buffs will know that I am quoting the third draft of THE
GODFATHER,  except that the title we see isn't CONTACT. In a moment we are
staring into a familiar corner of the earth rather then the face of
Bonasera. We look on for a moment - the theater is utterly silent. You can
almost feel the collective awe. Then we begin to pull back. Still silent.
Galaxies fly past us slowly, spiralling into oblivion. They look less like
galaxies then like big puffy clouds. And then we realize what the movie is
trying to communicate; that the universe is a huge place that streches back
and back ... farther then we can see or even imagine. That we will never
reach into these strange corners, and meet or find those that inhabit it.
It's well communicated. And when we are sure that we can't go back further,
we do. It's an amazing unbroken shot, far more effective then - say the
opening shot of last year's STAR TREK: FIRST CONTACT. But how can the movie
top such a wonderful opening? I wasn't sure myself.  But, it does. And it's
quite a feat. The sublime shot - practically a bliss out - is broken. It
hasn't even happened - it took place in the mind of a young girl, Ellie
Arroway. After a short introduction we cut to Ellie as
an adult. She is everything we want to be - confident, attractive, Jodie
Foster. To be honest, we also suspect that she is a little stupid. Later on
she goes to bed with Palmer Joss ( Matthew McConaughey ) so we think "Yes,
she is stupid. Just a little." But we are wrong. She's smart - we realize
that when she finally contacts aliens ( in a thrilling scene ). Through a
series of beautifully staged events she finds herself in a space ship (
well, sorta ) about to be transported to the star Vega. And she is ... oh
yes, she is. When she arrives there you are struck by the beautiful vision
of a far away planet, in all it's glory. Gentle waves lap on the shore ...
you are awe struck. How can director Robert Zemeckis live up to all of our
excpectations when he finally shows us aliens?  He does. The film is
glorious.
I have now seen Contact twice, and I loved it both times. It's not quite
2001: A Space Oddessey, E.T, or Close Encounters Of The Third Kind. Who
cares? Do we mark it down because of that? Rarely has a film astounded me
on so many rare and diverse levels. Contact is a masterpiece and an
achievement. The last shot tops off everything else and brings the picture
to a wonderful and amazing conclusion. Intelligently scripted ( gasp! )
with characters we ( gasp again! ) identify with, understand and like.
Contact is a most remarkable film. It is also a spectacle - be sure to see
it on the big screen.
The greatest films - The Godfather, Casablanca, Singin' In The Rain,
Vertigo, Citizen Kane, Psycho,
The World Of Apu, - cast spells. But the 90s has been a bit short on films
like the ones I decsribe. Contact breaks the trend. 
I can't say that about Barry Sonenfield's MEN IN BLACK, which is pretty
bad. The first scene is probably the best; the credits sequence is
spectacular and good fun, and the special effects are dazzling. I saw Men
In Black twice, ( an accident - it's not the kind of film you would like to
see more then once. The second time was at a double feature with the
mediocre Julia Roberts comedy, "My Best Friend's Wedding" which has a
review below ) and I found comparing my reactions more interesting then
thinking about the movie. The first time I liked the movie, but was
dissapointed by Danny Elfman's score. The second time I found the movie
stupid and sappy - just barely watchable - made more so by the score which,
this time, I liked. Yet the score is never as overwhelming as it is in his
Tim Burton films ( the best of his scores can be found in Batman, Edward
Scissorhands, and The Nightmare Before Christmas which was not directed by
Burton but was concieved by him. Blah, blah, blah ).         
Sonenfield is, undoubtedly, the wrong choice for director. So if I you are
gonna keep  talking who would YOU elect? My candidate is Tim Burton who
would have made this a masterpiece ( as Steven Spielberg would have made
Contact one of the best films ever. Pity he didn't direct that rather then
The Lost World - which was entertaining and accomplished what it wanted to
). I'm also a bit sorry to say that the sense of humor  this film
celebrates doesn't apeal to me. I would have preffered a spoof of old alien
movies of the 50s with the aliens invisible, yet causing mayhem. 
To be fair, there are two excellent scenes/shots. The first is when Will
Smith is first transformed into Agent K. I won't say how it is done, but I
will say that is a comic moment, and it is truly inspired. The second is
the films last shot, a remarkable pull back that is a fancy -  less magical
and mysterious, but still fun - take on the last shot of Contact. If the
rest of the film had been that good, and had that impact, we would have
been on to something.     
I loved Contact. I disliked Men In Black. I have no feelings towards My
Best Friend's Wedding. It is a Julia Roberts comedy. It is what you would
excpect a Julia Roberts comedy to be, only a little better. It isn't that
bad - it's a bit of fluff. If you are sick of event movies then see it now.
 Julia Roberts is good - very good, - and it begins wonderfully. Then it
degenerates into a formualic mess. It has the best scene of the year,
featuring the dazzling vocal talents of Cameron Diaz. It has another great
scene which involves a musical number that takes place inside of a
resteraunt. Otherwize it's the kind of film that is pleasent and fun. To
snooze through. But, hey - it could have been worse.
It is worth noting that apart from Contact, Hercules is the only other
really good film I have seen this year. It is far more sophisticated then
your average Con Air. Naturally it's doing dismally at the box office.
Frankly, I'm not suprised at all. Just depressed.
I also think that 1997 will be remembered as one of the great years for
movies. Not for new movies but for old ones. Reissue galore! The films
being released are mostly bad, but this is a movie lover's dream! 
Coming soon, reviews of three classics seen on the big screen: The
Neverending Story ( well it SHOULD be a classic ), The Godfather, and
Vertigo.
Also: The greatest American comedy ( not counting Chaplin ), Some Like It
Hot.
Check out Max and Micah's movie page ">http://www.garfieldlib.com/yanews/july97/max/max.html> here.         

Author
Michael J. Legeros
     Reliable Robert Zemeckis (FORREST GUMP) directs this glossy, easy-
to-follow adaptation of Carl Sagan's science-fiction novel, about a
radio astronomer (Jodie Foster) who intercepts the first intergalactic
e-mail addressed to the planet Earth, and then finds herself at the
center of controversies political, religious, and scientific.  (As the
trailer so kindly gives away, the alien-o-gram contains a blueprint for
a transport device.  And you can guess who has a First Class ticket.)
Closer to a character study than an epic sci-fi flick, CONTACT has a
little of something for everyone.  There's action, with people running
around a small lab, shouting technical terms and excitedly staring at
computer screens.  (Who knew that radio astronomy involved so much
adrenaline?)  There's romance, involving a hunky religious scholar
(Matthew McConaughey).  There's intrigue (of the White House variety),
some real suspense (how about those countdown sequences!), a couple of
science lessons (hey, you learn about prime numbers *and* Occam's
Razor!), a surface-level discussion of faith versus proof, and, even,
the occasional hint of hilarity.  (Check out the lunatic fringe that
sets up camp outside Cape Canaveral.  I spotted an Elvis impersonator.)
     And there's so much more:  great photography, exceptional effects,
a ready-made supporting cast (James Woods acting antagonistic, Angela 
Bassett being stern, etc.), loads of convenient dramatic invention (look,
there's someone on the gantry who shouldn't be there!), and cameos by, I
believe, CNN's entire on-air staff.  Everything fits together exactly as
it should and, at times, almost painfully perfunctorily so.  (Is this
the most exciting boring movie of the summer?  Or does that distinction
belong to FACE/OFF?)  Yup, everything fits together very nice and neat,
except for the ending, which, depending upon your sensibilities, is
either a major or minor botch.  (I found it as distracting as Foster's
narration during her magic carpet ride.)  When all is said and done, no
one in the film, including Foster's seemingly smart cookie, thinks to
ask the obvious and most logically scientific response to the hubbub:
"repeat the damn experiment and see if you get the same results."  Sigh.
Well, if nothing else, CONTACT is a summer movie that (a.) makes you
think and (b.) makes you think about the scientific method and, hell,
that's more brain power than you've probably used in the last six weeks.
And you *do* get to see stellar sights, such as the sculpted profiles of
McConaughey and Foster, when they turn away from the camera to kiss.
Have you ever seen such perfect noses?

Author
Stuart Cracraft
'Contact' shows why Jodie Foster is one of our best actresses.
See Contact with your family. It is a movie for all ages.
After a predictable MIT Phillip Morrison powers-of-10 zoom-out start
(which can be surprising to those not familiar with Prof. Morrison's
work), Contact picks up steam, gradually, building, by-the-end, an
irresistable juggernaut and a very good movie that does not as is so
often the case fall out-of-balance in terms of too much pandering to
the technological "geek" side.  By the end, the audience is left with
what good science fiction is supposed to do: evoke a sense of wonder
about the universe and evoke questions in your mind about what's out
there.
This movie does not let technology overshadow characterization and in
this sense it is unusual amongst high-tech movies. However, except for
Jodie Foster (Elie Arroway) and John Hurt (S.R. Hadden), who are both
actors of exceptional caliber, the supporting cast are not especially
impressive.  Hurt certainly has had better roles (Stephen Ward in
Scandal). This one, as the multi-billionare Hadden, does not do his
acting skills justice.
This is clearly a Foster movie by one of the great Hollywood lights of
our generation.  Foster's radiance has never been more strong than in
the scene where she finally meets the Vegans on their terms. Early
scenes take a long, long time to build up to this. The movie's pacing
is very good and subtle. The panoramas of the radio dishes at Arecibo
and CETI in New Mexico and Puerto Rico are beautiful.  The politics of
Foster's character attempting to obtain funding for research at these
places are trite and predictable however.
One of the most entertaining, but very short scenes, is when Foster is
confronted by Rob Lowe, during a cabinet-level presidential meeting to
discuss the alien invitation. There were real sparks in this scene
between Foster and Lowe and it would behoove them to consider other
vehicles in which this dynamism could be explored. It is the only
scene in the movie in which there were tremendous dynamics between two
characters. Everything else was very one-sided (e.g.  Foster).  Lowe
can stand up to Foster and it showed in that scene at the cabinet
table.
The core scene of the movie is set on a surrealistic beach on a
far-away world in the starsystem of Vega. It feels a lot like science
fiction writer John Varley's scenes in his book STEEL BEACH, where the
female protagonists encounters an immensely superior intelligence, in
one case a computer manufactured by mankind itself, and in Foster's
case, an illusion drawn from her memory.  In another sense, this
immensely moving scene evokes Gene Roddenberry's STAR TREK pilot The
Cage, later The Menagerie, when Jeffrey Hunter and Susan Oliver have
their memories manipulated to create new worlds in which they live and
encounter aliens.
The concept is not new, by any sense, in the world of science
fiction. But the beach scene, which is the centerpiece of the film, as
is the whole film, is driven by Foster. Freed from her needs to direct
by director Zemecki, Foster is able to let it all hang out in the
characterization and the lead she provides to her supporting cast. As
the movie gains speed, Foster's acting intensifies and the audience
really does experience it with her. It is certainly Oscar-caliber
acting, unquestionably.
The supporting cast does well and Zemeckis throws in some humor with
some President Clinton cameos, cleverly manipulated, George
Stephanopolus-style, to seem very Forrest Gump. In fact, Zemeckis
et. al. got in trouble for the usage of some of the footage seen in
the movie, vis a vis Clinton. But the audience I attended this movie
with just had some good chuckles at Clinton's walk-ons.
The much-discussed tension between science and religion in this movie
is not particularly insightful to those who have already gone through
this course though it is helpful to those in the audience who have
not. Also, the near-final scene, in a Senate Judiciary Hearing room is
disappointing.
Contact is a fitting memorial to the memory of Carl Sagan, science
popularizer, and sometime pedantic gadfly of the halls of
academe. Perhaps now, Sagan can be said to be with his Dragons of
Eden.

Author
Michael Redman
There are many times during this film that are remarkably stunning and
completely captivating. For the first time in what seems to be eons, that
statement applies to something other than the effects in a big budget science
fiction movie. What a relief it is to be fascinated by a film of this genre
with the plot and characters and where the aliens and explosions take a back
seat to the right stuff.
Ellie Arroway (Jodie Foster) is nine years old when she is fascinated by the
stars and by contacting people in far-away places with her ham radio. As she
grows older, she devotes her life to looking for messages from even more
distant locales and joins the SETI (Search for Extraterrestrial Intelligence)
project. Convinced that there is someone out there, she spends her time
listening to static, hoping for something more.
While waiting for the signal in Puerto Rico, she has time to fall into bed for
a brief affair with religious philosopher Palmer Joss (Matthew McConaughey), a
"man of the cloth without the cloth". The contrast between  the woman of
science and the man of god is the archetype for the film's theme.
When the financial rug is pulled out from under SETI, Arroway searches for
funding wherever she can find it. She strikes gold with eccentric zillionaire
S. R. Hadden (played with gusto by John Hurt). With his money in her back
pocket, she rents time on the Very Large Array radio telescope in New Mexico
and years later finally hears what she has been waiting for.
Of course when she announces her discovery, there is a rush by the government
to militarize the undertaking and take control. Suddenly the scientist finds
herself playing second fiddle to the National Security Advisor (James Woods)
and her former mentor David Drumlin (Tom Skerritt) who had pulled the plug on
SETI in Puerto Rico.
Deciphering the message from Vega reveals a video signal. (I kept waiting for
them to find a new tofu recipe from the Vegans) Piggybacked on the television
waves is a blueprint for a transport device for one person to take the trip to
the source of the communication. The question becomes who will go.
At a congressional hearing, Joss, who has become a White House spiritual
leader, asks the litmus test "Do you believe in God?" Arroway's response is
that she hasn't seen proof.
The film is more about that question of faith than it is about aliens. The
astronomer's obsessive conviction that life exists somewhere else is not much
different from religious certitude. When she has a life-changing experience
that she can't explain and has no substantiation for, it reminds us of Paul's
conversion on the road to Damascus.
        Director Robert Zemeckis ("Forrest Gump") has taken Carl Sagan's novel and
borrowed the motifs from "2001" and "Close Encounters" to create one of the
finest films around. 
He often focuses on media. In one scene Arroway is sending email while talking
on the phone and simultaneously receiving a fax: totally wired. Jay Leno,
Larry King, Bryant Gumbel and half the CNN crew play themselves on television
screens throughout the film. This technique creates the feel that you are
watching events as they are actually happening. Unfortunately the couple of
morphed-in Bill Clinton scenes pull you out of the story with an "Oh yeah,
this is a trick".
Jodie Foster has matured into an accomplished actress. Her superb performance
captures the astronomer's emotions with subtle notes. The catch in her voice
and breathing flutters when she is frightened are fine touches.
The movie's ending is a bit frightening. There is a strong possibility that
Zemeckis will blow it with a sugary sweet scene and it looks like he will.
Then there is the relief that he hasn't and all is back on track.
The film is long at two hours and 20 minutes, but surprisingly doesn't feel
strained and could have even taken more time to explore all the implications.
Leaving the theater, the audience was talking about the questions posed: a
good sign.
As Carl Sagan said about the possibility of life out there, "If it's just us,
that seems like an awful waste of space."
(Michael Redman has written this column for over 21 years and has spent about
twice that long looking up and waiting.)
[This appeared in the 7/10/97 "Bloomington Voice", Bloomington, Indiana.
Michael Redman can be reached at mredman@bvoice.com ]

Author
Chuck Dowling
Contact (1997) ** out of ***** - Cast: Jodie Foster, Matthew McConaughey,
James Woods, Tom Skerritt, Angela Bassett, John Hurt, Rob Lowe, David Morse.
Written by: James V. Hart and Michael Goldenberg. Based on the novel by:
Carl Sagan. Directed by: Robert Zemeckis. Running Time: 150 minutes.
"Contact" was one of the movies I was looking forward to the most this
summer. I even made arrangements to see it over a week before its release.
At this point I've seen it twice. The first time I saw it, I felt that it
was just about the most painfully slow, dull, and lifeless film I had ever
had the misfortune to sit through in a movie theater. And after the second
time? Well, I still don't feel like I've seen a good movie, and it's still
awfully dull. But for the most part, it's just extremely disappointing.
Now I'm not extremely disappointed because the film's not another
"Independence Day". Most people seem to think that if you don't like
"Contact", then you're just a brainless drooler who's only entertained by
stuff blowed up real good. Yet there's more explosions in "Contact" than
there are in films such as "Sling Blade", "Carried Away", and "Ulee's Gold",
all films I've seen recently which are more entertaining that this one. As a
matter of fact, there's not a split second of action in any of those films.
Fans of this film have been raving about how intelligent it is. You'd be
surprised how many of these "intelligent" fans have sent such childish
responses to my opinons of the film, even going as far as saying I should be
killed and I should burn in hell because I didn't like it. Is "Contact"
intelligent? Sure it is. The basis of the entire film relies heavily on
science, math and religion. But does intelligence mean that it will
certainly be entertaining? No. Are all the people who dislike the film
therefore unintelligent? Absolutely not.
The opening shot of the film, a very lengthy pullback through the entire
universe, starts out showing us just how far our own radio and television
signals have been able to travel. But it's point is to really give the
audience an idea of how vast the universe is. It's a great special effect,
both from a sound and a visual aspect.
We then meet astronomer Jodie Foster, who works with SETI, Search for
Extra-Terrestial Intelligence. For years and years she works incredibly hard
and endures many setbacks in her job of listening for radio signals from the
heavens, until one day her lifelong dream is realized... a message from
outer space is received.
This discovery sets the world into a frenzy. Well, I suppose it does anyway,
since instead of ever seeing a regular average citizen and how it may effect
his/her life, we see countless montages of someone channel surfing through
what seems like ten different channels of CNN. In their place, I would have
much rather seen what effect this would have had on an everyday family,
instead of just what all the scientists, politicians, and journalists had to
say about it.
Related to that problem by not showing us the reactions of any normal
people, many of the film's actual characters aren't developed well enough
for my liking. For example, Jodie Foster's team consists of a black guy, a
blind guy, a nerdy guy (and they only way you know that is because he always
wears a shirt displaying the periodic table of the elements), a young guy
who smokes a pipe, and a biker looking guy. Surely there's something these
guys could do to give them just a little depth. One of them could have a
family and we could find out how they felt about the film's events.
Then there's the "relationship" which develops between Foster and
McConaughey thanks to a couple of hours of conversation, the sharing of a
Cracker Jack prize, and a quick hop in the sack. That whole thing feels
phony and forced, as if the studio demanded that there had to be a love
interest subplot somewhere in there just to appease a certain demographic.
Then, over four years then go by without either one having contact with the
other, but yet when they do reunite, feelings continue to blossom. I would
have felt much better if these characters had just met, shared some
conversation and debate, then met up again four years later to participate
together in a project, and continued their exploration of each other's
beliefs.
But the main problem I have with "Contact" is it's length, or really the
amount of time spent on the more boring aspects of the story. Now I'm not
one of those people who automatically won't like or won't even see it just
based on it's running time. My problem with it's length is the same problem
I had with the length of 1995's "Heat". That problem is that there's too
much needless footage for a great many scenes which have already established
their point.
For example, while Foster and McConaughey are in bed together, he asks about
her father. She lets him know that he died when she was nine. Fine. But
then, moments later she has a lengthy flashback to that event. David Morse
(who give his usual excellent performance in yet another miniscule part) has
already been well established as her father. What purpose does this serve?
Let's just keep going with the story here.
Also, there's just scene after scene of debating the whole "religion vs.
science" issue, something which isn't resolved in the film because the
argument just can't be resolved in real life either. Obviously scientists
usually don't believe in God (not in the traditional sense anyway), and
religious people can't fully accept science as an explanation for why things
are. It just keeps going on and on, and it's dull.
Then, there are many moments which present very intriguing ideas and
situations, but are then immediately dismissed. Or I just feel that certain
ideas could have been executed much better. When the signal is received from
outer space, it's incredibly frustrating to the viewer. The three characters
who discover it all keep talking at the same time, making it impossible to
know what anyone is saying. Yes, I understand they're excited, but I want to
hear what they are saying, I was interested to find out the details, and
disappointed when I couldn't make out what any one character was saying.
After decoding the signal it is discovered that a video signal was also
sent. It too is decoded, and revealed to be footage of Adolf Hitler. The
scene is played great, the music swells and the characters react to it as
the most bizarre and intriguing thing yet, which it most certainly is. Then,
two seconds later, it's immediately brushed off. Don't play an idea that
interesting up like that if you don't plan on using it for anything. After
that brush off we are then treated to a "Forrest Gump"-ish type scene
involving Bill Clinton, a horrible concept which not only grinds the film to
a screeching halt (it was almost there anyway) but unfortunately dates the
movie. Using Clinton, who couldn't be more vague on whatever topic he's
really discussing in the clips used, is just unimportant to the film's
events. It's not a personal bias on my part mind you, but it's another
needless waste of film, which is then repeated several times later.
But the biggest disappointment is the film's final scenes (and no, not
because bug eyed monsters don't show up). After the main events of the final
scenes, it's thankfully revealed that this whole thing could have been
nothing more than an elaborate hoax played on the world by an eccentric
billionaire (John Hurt) who had nothing to lose and seemingly plenty of
motive and opportunity. When this is exposed, so much now made sense. There
were clues to this for the whole movie, and I really felt satisfied now that
most of what had just happened twenty minutes earlier may not have happened
at all. Unfortunately, a scene then follows which indicates that those
events really did occur. The other explanation was much more interesting. I
would have rather explored the ramifications of the hoax angle.
Is "Contact" awful? No, but it's not anything special. It's story just
doesn't go in directions that are the slightest bit interesting to me.
Conceptually it's a good idea, and it's technically well made, the effects
are good and the score is nice. But nothing can substitute for a good solid
story, and that's where "Contact" is sorely lacking. [PG]
Visit Chuck's Movie Reviews at http://users.southeast.net/~chuckd21/
Over 1,600 movies rated and/or reviewed!  Movie news, film related links, and reader's reviews.

Author
Victor Salva
  
It is so rare that a big scale film that is predicated on
something as fantastic as alien life would take the first twenty minutes of
the film to build its characters rather than rush us into sensory overload,
that at first I thought this movie was going to be a classic miscaculation
on the part of the filmmakers. Filmmakers in the "instant gratification, I
have a very short attention-span, give me something big and easy and give
it to me now" culture that we have become.
But once I adjusted to the fact that this film was really
going to be about a person and not a pheonomenon, I sat back and watched
one of the truly greatest experiences of the summer. CONTACT is an
exciting, intelligent and incredibly moving experience about the unknown.
It proves that a woman, if talented and interesting enough, can pick up an
adventure film and carry it as well as any of the fellahs.
Jody Foster has some truly beautiful and transporting
moments in this film and my hat is off to her for sharing so much. At the
heart of every really strong performance there is sharing and she doesn't
hold back. 
I think I have now seen Zemeckis' finest work. Certainly a
far cry from the silly, feeble stuff of Gump. The moments of Contact in
this film would certainly make Stanley Kubrick proud, though the filmmakers
decide to take an infinitely more personal and intimate road vereing from
their 2001 style journey that may seen derivative but it is demanded by
this story and really unavoidable.  Where we end up is quite a different
take than the Arthur C. Clarke version of such a journey and depending on
your cup of tea, you will either love or vehemently dislike the choice the
film makes.
It has one or two false notes in its epic running time.
But it is amazing how negligible false notes are in a film where you are
enjoying the ride. A little less talk from the actual CONTACT sequence
would've been great. But there is really no way to pay off this incredible
premise and make everyone happy.  I thought ultimately it was a wonderful
way to spend an evening.
If more films were as smart as this one and as brave, I
shudder to think where the movies might be headed.  Its been a long time
since a film got me so excited about the human race...
For that, I'm moved and grateful.  Hats off to the filmmakers!

Author
Chris Webb
        Robert Zemeckis could easily separate himself from Forrest Gump.  
After all, that movie is three years in the past.  By now, he should 
realize that not every movie he touches needs to have the same elements.  
Unfortunately, he doesn't.  
        The technical wonder that was Gump invades some scenes of 
Contact, and they are unwelcome.  Unwelcome to the eye and apparently to 
the man in those scenes, Bill Clinton.  What we have here is similar to 
Gumps meeting with President Kennedy, where characters are superimposed 
onscreen during a presidential speech that makes the archived footage 
seem to be a part of the movie.  Here we find two mistakes: one in 
motive, one in the technical uses of the President.  By now, we are 
aware that Zemeckis can do this sort of thing, and it has swerved into an 
annoying pattern.  Also, we can tell that the President did not make his 
speech indoors as sunlight glistens off his gray hair.
        My other complaint with Zemeckis' handling of this film is the 
gooey sentimentality to which we are subjected early on.  We discover how 
the main character, Ellie Arroway (Foster), has become the way she is 
through a series of flashbacks.  Groans were apparent during these scenes 
and should have been handled differently.   Nonetheless, Contact survives 
the heavy hand of Robert Zemeckis, and succeeds.
        The story has been in the making for seventeen years, the 
brainchild of super-astronomer Carl Sagan, who died last year of cancer.  
Pushed by a fascination with the prospects of alien life, Sagan turned 
Contact into a novel as production hit snags endlessly.  Translated to 
film, the effort is seamless.
        Ellie is a scientist who feels that there is someone out there 
trying to communicate.  Like the efforts to make the movie, Ellie 
hits bumps in her search for intelligent life as funding keeps 
disappearing from her projects.  Behind the sabotages is David Drumlin 
(Skerritt), a good old boy who has paid his dues and seeks the fame for 
himself.  However, just as the sheet is pulled from beneath her, Ellie 
finds a way to keep listening for signals, and one evening one appears 
from the star cluster of Vega, and it packs a punch.
        In a series of wrenching scenes, we watch as Drumlin successfully 
pulls the project away from Ellie.  The project consists of building an 
aptly named "machine" to launch someone to Vega to meeet the aliens.     
Soon enough the government takes over, led by skeptical Michael Kitz (Woods).  
Woods is once again brilliant as the sarcastic wit who has no reason to believe
that anything here is sensible.  These, however, are the mere bones of the 
film.
        Palmer Joss (McConaughey) is a Christian leader who plants the 
issue of God into the minds of the viewers and actors.  The science 
versus religion debate emerges and erupts.  As the machine is being 
built, religious and science fanatics line up along NASAs property to 
protest or support the mission.  Meanwhile, Drumlin and Arroway vie for 
the job to meet the Vegans.  Drumlin plays dirty to attain the position, 
while Arroway speaks from her heart during sessions.
        However, after a tragedy strikes, Ellie is allowed to run the 
mission.  She is guided by the Carl Sagan-as-billionaire, S.R. Hadden 
(Hurt), who helps her reach her goal, the stars.  Amazing are the 
wormhole effects of her entering different atmospheres and galaxies, as 
well as the Vegan land itself.  While on Vega, her meeting must remain a 
surprise.  Zemeckis does have a tocuh of flare with these scenes, and 
could have used more of them.
        Angela Bassett deserved more scenes, and comes up as the wasted 
talent.  Casting Rob Lowe as the conservative and Jake Busey as a lunatic 
were smart decisions.
        I believe that Face/Off is the best film we've been given this summer, 
but Contact is Academy-friendly.  It is almost assured that Foster will 
gain a nomination, and Skerritt, in his icy and calculating performance, 
deserves consideration.  Zemeckis almost blows it, but with the 
fascination behind Contact, even he could reap the benefits of an overall 
good movie.

Author
Jerry Saravia
What is this I hear about summer movies in general? They are all brainless and
plotless? Excuse me, people, but don't forget that the smaller films are
usually the smarter ones. It's true that Hollywood rarely delivers anything
beyond the dumb and dumber set during the summer (or the year, for that
matter). The summer of 1997 had not been as horrendous as most, and one of the
smartest and most thought-provoking films of that summer was "Contact." 
Jodie Foster stars as Dr. Ellie Arroway, a serious-minded scientist who studies
extraterrestrial life. She believes life exists in some distant galaxy, and
studies chiefly with the world's largest radio telescope located in Arecibo,
Puerto Rico hoping to establish some alien contact. When her research project
is terminated, she persuades the government to fund a project to investigate
the possibility of extraterrestrial life. Ellie ends up in Socorro, New Mexico
where they have a field of 27 huge disc-shaped radio telescopes where she might
get some signal. And she does, and the whole world, including the government,
the CIA, the FBI, and the National Security counsel, is eager to know what it
is about. At first, Ellie hears deep vibrating signals. Then she receives an
alien signal in the form of the first televised image - Hitler's appearance at
the 1936 Olympic Games. Then she gets another visual signal that may be
instructions to build a ship.
"Contact" is based on the 1985 novel by the late Carl Sagan, and the film
doesn't betray Sagan's beliefs or his ambiguity. There are no green-eyed
Martians, no Men in Black with big guns, no laser shows, and no mother ships.
"Contact" presents us with the possibility of intelligent life in other
galaxies or stars namely Vega - Ellie makes contact with the signals but not
with the life forms (unless the ending of the movie suggests otherwise). When
the ship is built, there's controversy as to who should be sent aboard - a
believer in God, or a non-believer like Ellie? If the universe reveals God
doesn't exist, then where does civilization stand? If God does exist, should
Ellie be the one to go for the 2001 ride through the cosmos? 
"Contact" lumbers a bit with two needless subplots: the introduction of Matthew
McConaughey as a religious scholar who has a brief affair with Ellie, and a
bald Timothy Leary-like scientist (John Hurt) who has been supporting every
move she makes. McConaughey appears and disappears too soon before he reappears
in the last half of the film - his function is to let Ellie know that if she
stands by her beliefs, she should not be travelling in space. However, I was
struck by Ellie's decision in the first half not to speak to him after their
affair - it seems McConaughey forgot they ever had one. The Hurt character also
has little function except to imply he may have created all the mumbo jumbo
about alien ship designs to Ellie just to get the ship built. Hurt's
performance is too over-the-top for this film and he seems to have drifted in
from "Even Cowgirls Get The Blues" minus the long fingernails.         
Nevertheless, "Contact" works quite well for two reasons: Jodie Foster's
strong, fully realized performance, and the credible, well-written script.
Foster makes Ellie into an independent, vulnerable, tough-minded, no-nonsense
heroine still harboring deep feelings for her father (David Morse) who passed
away when she was young. Ellie's emotional clinging to her father is questioned
by McConaughey at one point when she wants proof of God's existence: 
The screenplay by James V. Hart and Michael Goldenberg huffs and puffs
frequently, providing as much information as possible. It is quite ambitious
covering Ellie's place as a scientist and as an atheist, and her relationship
with her father; the government and the rest of the free world's involvement in
what may be a revolutionary moment in science or mere hocus pocus; the
religious cults who try to take action against building an alien ship; and the
final trip itself that may leave you thinking for days as to what is truth and
where are the boundaries between time and space. The script is certainly well
devised and constructed but as aforementioned, there are too many subplots that
distract from Ellie's ascension or descent as an important scientist. I could
live without director Robert Zemeckis's "Gump"-ist attitudes by digitally
showing Bill Clinton's opinion of this alien contact. There also too many
scenes of real-life CNN anchors commenting on the action - one or two would
have been sufficient, but the whole staff? Ellie's hard-working staff is not
given much screen time making it seem as if she's doing all the hard work
alone. 
"Contact" is clunky but it is still fine entertainment and briskly directed by
Robert Zemeckis ("Forrest Gump"). The opening sequence pulls back from earth
through the galaxies, the stars and other planets hinting that something else
might be out there while we hear various pop songs and then utter silence. It
is eye-opening and breathtaking, including the last twenty minutes where Ellie
makes her rickety voyage into space in an alien pod that will take her to,
presumably, the alien designers. The film benefits greatly from the astounding
supporting cast including Tom Skerritt as David Drumlin, a scientist who wants
to go in the pod mission; James Woods as an edgy (what else?) National Security
Advisor; and Angela Bassett as a straight-arrow debate official. It is really
Jodie Foster who makes the movie her own - ambitious, stubborn, scrupulous,
skeptical. Carl Sagan should be proud.
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at
http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/
E-mail me with any questions, concerns or general comments at
faustus_08520@yahoo.com or at Faust667@aol.com

Author
Steve Kong
When you look up in the sky late at night, do you ever have the feeling
that another being is doing the same thing light years away? How could
there be so many stars and no other life than just us? It would be a
terrible waste of space wouldn't it?
Contact looks at these questions and more. Based on the Carl Sagan book by
the same name, Contact follows the story of a radio astronomer, Ellie
Arroway (Jodie Foster). Since she was a kid, she has been interested in
radio, and using the radio to find other people, or peoples. Arroway starts
her professional career at the Arecibo Observatory in Puerto Rico, it is
here where she meets Joss (Matthew McConaughey), a biblical man, who does
not believe in technology. Arroway is working on the SETI (Search for
ExtraTerrestrial Intelligence) project. And, thew work is long and dry.
Long and dry enough for the head of the National Science Foundation, Dr.
Drumlin (Tom Skerritt), to cut their funding.
Arroway then, with the help of her coworkers, get private funding to do
research in New Mexico. The funding comes from an eccentric rich man,
Hadden (John Hurt). And after two years of searching, they have yet to turn
something up. So, yet again, Drumlin steps in and wants the project to be
shutdown, because the radio telescopes could be used for more "practical"
projects. But, before the project is cancelled, Arroway and team get The
Message from a star named Vega.
All of that build up takes place in the slow introductory forty minutes.
>From there, director, Robert Zemeckis (Forrest Gump, Back to the Future
series), tries to explore the effect The Message has on science and
religion. And how the two are in conflict with each other. It is here that
the movie picks up the pace, but only by a little. We see Arroway go
through letdown after letdown. The payoff for all of these letdowns, slow
intro, and religious/science exploration, is good but not as satisfying as
can be.
The opening sequence sets the pace for the movie, and has to be seen it's
an incredible sequence.
Worth mentioning is John Hurt as the eccentric man, Hadden. Hurt gives a,
short, but brilliant performance. His character is, for me, one of the most
memorable characters in the movies of summer 1997. Jodie Foster gives a
solid performance, as usual. The special effects, although never
overshadowing the characters and story, are incredible. The opening
sequence, close to the end sequence, and machine are unbeatable. I've not
finished reading the book, but so far the movie sticks pretty much to the
book. And this could be accounted for because of Sagan and his wife
producing the film.
I have only a few complaints. The movie is just a bit on the long side,
running around two and half-hours. Zemeckis uses the same sort of T.V. type
inserts as Forrest Gump, but there seems to be an over use of it in
Contact. Sometimes it seems that he used T.V. footage just to give the
movie a documentary feel. The score from Alan Silvestri is easily forgettable.
Though I have some complaints, Contact is a wonderful movie. It is by far
one of the best sci-fi films to be released lately. And being the summer
film season, it is a film unlike most other summer films, intelligent. I
highly recommend Contact.

Author
Harald Spyra [de]
"Contact" ist eigentlich kein Science-fiction - Film. Es geht kaum um
"Science", und von "Fiktion" kann gleich gar nicht die Rede sein.
"Contact" ist auch kein Actionbrueller, der alle dreissig Sekunden
einen Lacher und alle drei Minuten eine nukleare Explosion bietet.
"Contact: Weckt mich, wenn was passiert" hiess ein langer Thread in
einer englischsprachigen Newsgruppe. Dennoch (oder vielleicht sogar
deshalb) ist "Contact" einer der besten Filme des Jahres 1997.
Wie reagiert eine Welt, die ploetzlich erfahren muss, dass sie nicht
die einzig Leben spendende im Universum ist? Wir wissen aus
Geschichtsbuechern, welche Verwerfungen die wissenschaftlichen
Revolutionen der Vergangenheit durch Kopernikus, Galilei, Darwin und
Einstein ausgeloest haben. Und heute? "Contact" zeigt die Verwurstung
eines epochemachenden Ereignisses durch die Medienmaschinerie der
Gegenwart: Schrille Schlagzeilen, wichtelnde TV-Reporter, fade Late
Night - Witzchen, hohles Politikergeschwaetz, Massenhysterie,
Kommerzialisierung. Muehelos gelingt es, das wichtigste Ereignis der
Menschheitsgeschichte auf alltaegliches Normalmass zurechtzustutzen.
Fuer die Medien ist der Kontakt zur Wega zuerst ein Quotenrenner. (Es
erscheint passend, wenn CNN einer der Hauptdarsteller des Films
geworden ist.) Die Politiker denken reflexhaft an die Auswirkungen auf
ihre Wiederwahl. Die Profis in den Hinterzimmern managen die Situation
so routiniert und effizient wie eine beliebige Krise auf dem
Aktienmarkt oder im Schlafzimmer des Praesidenten. Und auch die
Wissenschaftler sind heute im Showbusiness taetig, springen behende
auf die neuste durchs Dorf gejagte Sau, auf der Jagd nach
Foerdermitteln und persoenlichem Ruhm. Realistisch und bissig zeichnet
"Contact" ein Bild dieser unserer Welt, in der eine besessene junge
Wissenschaftlerin und ein spleeniger Multimilliardaer die einzigen
normalen Menschen zu sein scheinen.
"Contact" ist die Verfilmung eines Romans des verstorbenen
Wissenschaftlers Carl Sagan, der in den 70er Jahren zu den beredtesten
Propheten eines universellen Weltbildes gehoerte. Er war das Vorbild
zu jener Figur in Spielbergs "Close Encounters", die von dem
franzoesischen Regisseur Francois Truffaut gespielt wurde. Sagan
vermittelte seinen Fans das kindliche Staunen, das er beim Blick ins
All empfand. Dieses Staunen versucht auch der Film bei uns
auszuloesen, eine schwierige Aufgabe in einer Zeit, in der die
Kinogaenger an brennende Galaxien und Warp-faehige Raumgleiter gewohnt
sind. Jodie Foster ist eine Wissenschaftlerin, die im All nach sich
selbst sucht, nach der Wahrheit, nach dem Sinn des Lebens.
Altmodischer Kram, von dem wir uns heute meist erfolgreich abzulenken
wissen. Und gelegentlich kann man hoeren, dass diese Wahrheitssuche
eigentlich die Suche nach Gott ist. So ist Jodie Fosters junge
Astronomin auch eine der wenigen spirituellen Gestalten des Films,
obwohl ihr Atheismus und die ehrliche Antwort auf die Gretchenfrage
sie beinahe die Erfuellung der Kindheitstraeume kosten. Die
verwirklichen sich schliesslich in den Weiten des Alls. Doch die Reise
der Menschheit ist damit noch keineswegs zu Ende. Es ergeben sich mehr
Fragen als Antworten, und am Ende ist wieder alles eine Sache des
Glaubens geworden. Denn der Film bietet keine jener beliebten
Hollywood-Loesungen, die doch kaum bis vor die Tuer des Kinos tragen.
Diesen schwierigen Stoff in einen spannenden Film verwandelt zu haben,
ist keine geringe Leistung. "Contact" ist ehrgeizig und meist
erfolgreich. Die Schwaechen des Films werden bei weitem von seinen
Staerken aufgewogen. "Contact" muss Kompromisse schliessen, zwischen
jenen, die gerne noch etwas mehr in die komplexe Thematik eingestiegen
waeren und jenen, die vor allem kurzweilig unterhalten sein wollen. So
sind Brueche in der Handlung unvermeidbar und obwohl die Realitaet ihr
haessliches Haupt sehr deutlich erheben darf, ist der Film im Detail
nicht realistischer als "Independence Day". Robert Zemeckis ist auch
nicht der Regisseur, der billigen Effekten aengstlich  aus dem Weg
gehen wuerde. Aber er beweist in "Contact" doch wieder seine
Faehigkeiten im Umgang mit Schauspielern. Zumindest laesst er ihnen
mehr Platz als Saurier, Schaben und wildgewordene Kreuzfahrtschiffe.
"Contact" ist ein Jodie Foster - Film. Das intellektuelle Wunderkind
des amerikanischen Films loeste erst kuerzlich wieder Neid und
Sarkasmus bei den Landsleuten aus. Zuerst weigerte sie sich strikt,
einen Kommentar zum Tod der Lady Di abzugeben - und sagte dann doch
etwas, was der hechelnden Oeffentlichkeit wie eine Ohrfeige erschien.
Dann wurde ruchbar, sie habe in perfektem Franzoesisch ein
TV-Interview in Europa gegeben. So eine kann keine wirkliche
Amerikanerin sein. Dafuer ist sie sehr wahrscheinlich die groesste
Schauspielerin, die Hollywood momentan zu bieten hat. Keine andere
Darstellerin der letzten zehn Jahre hat eine Multimillionenproduktion
derart dominieren duerfen. Wenige andere waeren dazu in der Lage
gewesen. Fosters nuancenreiche Charakterstudie ist brillant und laesst
doch Raum fuer einige weitere hervorragende Leistungen: John Hurts
herrliche Ueberzeichnung des verrueckten (?) Milliardaers Howard
Hughes, Tom Skerrits Darstellung des opportunistischen
Wissenschaftlers und Rivalen Fosters, Angela Bassett als knochenharte
Stabschefin des US-Praesidenten und James Woods in einer Paraderolle
als schmieriger Politkarrierist. Wer sie fuer Klischeefiguren haelt,
ist noch nie einem von der Sorte begegnet. Matthew McConaughey ist
wenig mehr als huebsche Staffage, er spielt den Part, der sonst den
weiblichen "Hauptrollen" zugedacht wird (und den Sandra Bullock in "A
Time to Kill" an Matthews Seite spielen musste).
Auch Bill Clinton wirkt unfreiwillig mit in diesem Film. Seine
Ansprachen sind real, also ohne Substanz, und so passen sie problemlos
zu jeder denkbaren Krise. Das ist eines der huebschesten und
entlarvendsten Details des Films.

Author
Laurie D. T. Mann
Contact - a solid 8 on the IMDB scale - is one of the few
intelligently written and acted SF movies I've seen recently.
SF movies tend to be either complete logical blowouts
(Independence Day/Jurassic Park/Fifth Element) or
farcical (Men in Black). While Contact has some problems
with time (a multi-national project costing hundreds
of billions of dollars completed in under three years
based on schematics from out of this world?),
it's mostly right on target.
What made this movie particularly good is the time
Roboert Zemeckis took with his direction.  Many SF movies are
audio/visual assaults on the senses.  There's an awful lot
of quiet against a panorama of some of the finest special
effects ever created.  The first two minutes of
the movie set the tone and style for what's to come.
When there is a visual assault late in the movie, it's
a brief interlude  comparable to the climax of 2001.
The performances are pretty good - Rob Lowe is so smarmy as
the Ralph Reedish-character you want to slap him - and
Zemeckis wisely doesn't let the special effects overshadow
the characters.  People complained about the insertion of
Bill Clinton video in this movie, but I thought it mostly
worked.  I would like to have seen a little more of John
Hurt as the mysterious billionaire, but I suppose it added
to his mystery.

Author
Seth Bookey
Seen with Andrea at the Loews Astor on 18 July 1997 for $8.75.
Have you ever been to a movie that evokes a wide spectrum of emotions all
within the first twenty minutes or so? Laughter, tears, excitement, and
yes, even a lurid thought or two. It is indeed rare that a movie does all
this so quickly. Contact is one of those movies. It features Matthew
McConaughey with his shirt off within a half hour. Mmmmm... Every time he
entered the screen I felt like Marge Simpson fantasizing about Lee Majors. 
But seriously folks... Contact is all that and more, even if Mmmmmmatthew
was not cast. It is one of those rare movies that evokes a wide array of
feeling. It combines "what if"; with a lot of current issues and timeless
questions.
Two major elements hold this movie together: The prospect of very
intelligent life beyond our atmosphere, and Jodie Foster's impassioned
portrayal of Dr. Eleanor Arroway, a physicist who has been listening to
extraterrestrial radio waves and charting the skies. As a child, her
father (David Morse) taught her how to use a ham radio and they charted
how far her voice carried. Her fascination with covering distances
eventually leads to a major discovery--loud systematic thumping from the
star known to us as Vega. 
Contact is full of some wonderful cinematography. The opening sequence is
absolutely stunning, free of distracting music. The entire audience was
awestruck and quiet throughout the opener. One incredible shot early on to
watch for: Young Ellie running to the bathroom medicine cabinet. The
special effects in Contact are really marvelous, so seamless that it is
hard to believe that you are not actually watching events unfold.
Contact benefits from a great cast. All the expected "types" are there: 
the project director who steals the spotlight and the credit (Tom
Skerritt); the paranoid military man (James Woods), the officious
Presidential aide (Angela Bassett), the weird billionaire industrialist
(John Hurt). Even some of the minor roles are well cast--Jake Busey as the
religious cult leader, and Rob Lowe as Richard Rank, the Ralph Reed-like
head of the "Conservative Coalition." The only person who is not all that
terrific is, well, Mmmatthew McConnaughy, as he mumbles a lot and is not
always comprehensible. He plays the man of faith who questions Eleanor's
completely scientific stance. He always carried a book around with him. 
It's hard to know whether or not it is a Bible, his own book, or a
Franklin planner. Who cares? He's gorgeous and the romantic lead--that's
what he's there for and he does it well. 
Much like a Hitchcock movie (there I go again), it is an enjoyable ride
that dangles a major red herring. I am sure that most people will find it
odd that I would compare what happens in Contact to Pauline at the Beach
and Rashomon, but they are all of the same ilk. It's compelling and
thoughtful film that stays with you long after the lights have come back
on. I know I was not the only one who felt this way: More than few people
lingered afterward, reluctant to leave the theater. Plus, it was a nice
apology and antidote to Independence Day. 
Based on a story by Ann Druyen and Carl Sagan.
The official homepage  for Contact at http://www.contact-themovie.com is
rather interesting, especially if your browser supports sound.
Other movie reviews by Seth Bookey are available at
http://www.geocities.com/Athens/2679/kino.html
Copyright (c) 1997 Seth J. Bookey, New York, NY 10021 USA,
sethbook@panix.com

Author
Homer Yen
CONTACT: Some Signs of Intelligent Life
Jodie Foster plays Ellie Arroway, a prominent scientist and radio   
astronomer for the SETI (Search for Extra-Terrestrial Intelligence)   
program.  Like many scientists, she is an analytical person whose beliefs   
are entrenched in empirical evidence and testing.  For her, science shows   
us what is and what is not.  For example, she doesn't believe in God,   
because he can not be proven to exist.  Dr. Arroway is particularly   
isolated from the world around her.  She is consumed with one interest,   
which is the possibility of finding intelligent life on another planet.   
 Her academic mentors and colleagues belittle her.  Grant money to   
continue her research is increasingly hard to come by.
Yet she persists in her obsession, listening and monitoring and hoping   
until one day the payoff comes.   Working first at Puerto Rico's Arecibo   
observatory, budget cuts force her to relocate to the Very Large Array   
(VLA) of radio telescopes in the remote desert of New Mexico.  It is   
there, along with an ad-hoc team of devoted colleagues, that she detects   
a signal from the Vega system, some 26 light years away, that was clearly   
transmitted by an alien intelligence.  With the backing of the enigmatic   
industrialist, S.R. Hadden (John Hurt), she will begin a quest that   
culminates in the construction of a mysterious machine based on alien   
blueprints, and embark on a one-woman journey that will have the most   
profound scientific and spiritual implications for all humankind and   
especially for her.
Adapted from Carl Sagan's 1985 novel, this piece of science-pseudo   
fiction concerns itself with the discovery of extraterrestrial   
intelligence, but its focus subsequently becomes a debate between   
sanctity and science and Ellie's pursuit of her own brand of truth and   
her trip down the path of enlightenment.
Her quest is hampered by two major obstacles, though. She is faced with a   
lack of scientific thinking from politicians, who are wary of national   
security issues.  Confronted by a paranoid National Security Advisor   
(James Woods), Arroway's glory-hogging scientific rival (Tom Skerritt),   
and a cynical Presidential Advisor (Angela Bassett), Dr. Arroway fights   
hard to maintain her presence on this  the most important project of her   
career.  The story also sets Dr. Arroway in philosophical opposition to   
famous spiritual leader and advisor (and pseudo-romantic interest),   
Palmer Joss (Matthew McConaughey).  He tries to be her spiritual guide   
and warns her of the implications of making possible contact with a new   
race when she does not embody the precepts of God and His scriptures.  If   
there's life out there, way out there, does it come thanks to Science or   
Him?  It's an interesting question, but if  philosophers, scientists and   
theologians have been debating this question over the past 1000 years and   
are still unclear, a movie that attempts to look at the same question   
will suffer from ambiguity.
Despite a generally poignant look at Foster's journey into space and   
herself, I can't say that I liked this movie, but I didn't dislike it   
either.  Contact, results in a sobering look at a debate as partisan as   
abortion or the death penalty.  The space ride is just to appease the   
summer audience who demand to see special effects.  The entire movie   
seems like it could have been 20 minutes shorter if not for all of the   
flashbacks and the multitude of shots where Dr. Arroway is pondering and   
staring and pondering and then staring some more.  But, I did admire the   
genuine acting ability of Foster, who shows amazing depth and   
intelligence. Contact taps into her capacity to show both strength and   
vulnerability, pensive maturity and doe-eyed girlishness.  Time and   
again, the camera captures Foster face striking subtle emotions as she   
ponders all of the ramifications of her discovery and her subsequent   
actions.  There is probably no one better for this kind of high-minded,   
emotional drama than Foster.  I also admired the director's attempt   
(Robert Zemeckis) to blend purposeful storytelling with the movie's lofty   
goals (but his attempt to digitally meld Clinton into scenes a la Forrest   
Gump seemed patchwork).  Are science and religion equally purposeful   
methods of seeking reason and truth in a chaotic world?  This is a tough   
question to answer, but is bravely explored in this tale.  And, her path   
towards her particular enlightenment came to a satisfying conclusion.
Contact really puts the 'science' in science-fiction.  It is a big,   
ambitious movie that spans the heavens and debates God and hard science   
in the same breath.  Certainly, this movie will not appeal to everyone   
but to those who enjoy their movies with a pinch of philosophy, you'll   
find lots to think about.  It didn't necessarily appeal to me , but it   
did make me go , "Hmmmm"

Author
Alexadnre Tylski
If we see Zemeckis' s career, we can say that this is a director quite
interested in the themes of past and youth. In Forrest Gump or in the Back
to the Future trilogy, those themes are explored in every way possible.
With Contact, Zemeckis shows us again how essential is our knowledge of
history and our ability to dream.
Contact is a high budget movie and what is quite surprising, is that it is
an interesting film! Indeed, its secret aims have nothing to do with
business, but with ideas. To serve some interesting reflections on
religion, death or life, Zemeckis has hired a spectacular cast: Jodie
Foster, Mathew McConaughey, James Woods, Tom Skeritt or Angela Bassett.
Thus, the film is entertaining and can be appreciated by any kind of
persons - even those who do not like science-fiction movies since that
Contact is not really a movie dealing with extra-terrestrials or the
discovery of space, but rather a (re)discovery of human kind, its history
(references to Hitler notably) and its emotions. This is not only a
spectacular film, it is an intimate one, an inner journey. Besides, it can
be said that all the films Jodie Foster is used to playing in are kind of
inner journeys. In this film, she really shines, as usual, and she succeeds
in exploring her own emotions very deeply and those of the audience at the
same time. Will she receive another Academy Award? She deserves it again
anyway.
In Contact, the special effects are not there because it is up to date to
make movies with special effects, but they really serve the aim of the
film: searching for human basic feelings. It is even the paradox of the
whole film: new technologies do not really transform us into machines, but
make our reactions more human actually! When the E.T. signal is heard for
the first time in the movie, the characters (and the audience) feel more
human paradoxically, all excited like kids.
The word "kid" is obviously a key-word for describing Contact. Just like
Forrest, Foster's character is still a child, fragile but passionate. When
we see Contact, we feel the same emotions we had when very young. That is
all the magic and the interest of this movie. The film is a homage to the
power of imagination. Besides, it has a magical and onirical atmosphere as
if the whole movie was like a child dream. And as dreams always reveal who
we are, Contact talks to all of us very deeply.

Author
James Berardinelli
Cast: Jodie Foster, Matthew McConaughey, James Woods, Tom Skerritt, 
      William Fichtner, Angela Bassett, John Hurt, Rob Lowe, 
      David Morse, Jena Malone 
Director: Robert Zemeckis
Producers: Doug Mitchell, Steve Starkey, and Robert Zemeckis
Screenplay: James V. Hart and Michael Goldenberg based on a story by 
      Carl Sagan and Ann Druyan, based on the novel by Carl Sagan
Cinematography: Don Burgess
Music: Alan Silvestri
U.S. Distributor: Warner Brothers
     CONTACT is likely to change a lot of perceptions -- not only about 
the role of humankind in the universe, but about what special effects 
can do for a movie when they're used in the service of a story, rather 
than the other way around.  CONTACT is that rare big-budget motion 
picture that places ideas, characters, and plot above everything else.  
The film takes the richness of astronomer Carl Sagan's bestselling 1985 
novel and re-invents it for the screen, retaining all the power and 
fascination of the book while adding a visual aspect that will not 
disappoint devoted fans.  CONTACT is as close as recent Hollywood 
productions have come to a perfect example of cinema.  All the elements 
are not only in place, but effectively realized.  This is the kind of 
motion picture that restores one's faith in what can be produced when a 
large budget is used wisely.
     The participation of a superlative cast and crew doesn't always 
guarantee success, but, in this case, the high expectations have been 
met.  On the acting side, CONTACT stars two-time Oscar winner Jodie 
Foster alongside rising star Matthew McConaughey and veterans James 
Woods and Tom Skerritt.  The film is directed and co-produced by Robert 
Zemeckis, whose last effort was 1994's box office smash, FORREST GUMP.  
And, until his death in December 1996, Sagan served as a story 
consultant and scientific advisor.  
     As an on-again/off-again amateur astronomer, one of the first 
things I noticed about the film was its technical accuracy.  This is 
undoubtedly the result of Sagan's influence.  All the details are 
correct (at least as far as I was able to determine); there are none of 
the movie cop-outs that film makers occasionally resort to in order to 
lower the intelligence level of the script.  CONTACT is believable in 
part because it doesn't replace true science with vague terms and 
gobbledygook.  In his novel, Sagan was careful to make everything, even 
the most farfetched parts, theoretically feasible.  Although the movie 
changes and condenses significant aspects of the original material, it 
remains true to this vision.
     CONTACT opens with an unforgettable sequence that takes the viewer 
on a tour of the universe.  It starts out in a familiar corner of space, 
with Earth filling the screen.  Then, constantly accelerating, we pull 
back.  The moon passes, then Mars.  We zip through the asteroid belt, 
then speed past Jupiter, through the rings of Saturn, and out into 
places beyond.  Once the Oort cloud is behind us, we careen past stars 
and galaxies, proceeding ever farther away from our home solar system.  
It's an amazing trip that only takes several minutes, but presages the 
wonders that CONTACT's final half-hour holds for the viewer.
     After this eye-popping trek, we return to Earth during the early 
1970s, where we meet 9-year old Ellie Arroway (Jena Malone), a budding 
scientist with a fascination for short wave radio (she likes hearing 
messages from far away) and astronomy.  Her father, Ted (David Morse), 
is an English teacher, and has schooled Ellie in the beauty of the 
stars.  Following his sudden death, an event that leaves Ellie orphaned, 
she decides to devote her entire life to pursuing the mysteries that her 
father opened her eyes to.
     When we next encounter Ellie (now played by Jodie Foster), she's a 
promising researcher for the SETI (Search for Extraterrestrial 
Intelligence) Institute, working on a giant radio telescope in Puerto 
Rico.  Ellie's obsession is to find evidence of life on another planet.  
Despite the scorn of her colleagues, she spends hours on end listening 
for that proof.  While in Puerto Rico, she becomes involved with a 
religious scholar, Palmer Joss (Matthew McConaughey).  The two have a 
short, passionate affair that ends when Ellie's former mentor (and the 
President's national science advisor), David Drumlin (Tom Skerritt), 
pulls the plug on the SETI project in Puerto Rico.  To maintain her 
work, Ellie is forced to seek private funding, which she receives from a 
multi-billionaire eccentric named S.R. Hadden (John Hurt).  Armed with 
as much money as she needs, Ellie rents time on New Mexico's VLA (very 
large array) radio telescope range, and, while there, discovers a 
message from the star Vega that indicates intelligent life.  Once the 
signal is confirmed, the VLA becomes the center of a media blitz, and, 
along with the reporters, National Security Advisor Michael Kitz (James 
Woods) arrives, ready to militarize the project and push Ellie out.
     Although CONTACT is rightfully being billed as the story of 
humanity's first encounter with an extraterrestrial life form, at its 
heart, it's really more about Ellie and her quest for meaning in life.  
In her own words:  "For as long as I can remember, I've been searching 
for some reason why we're here -- what we're doing here, who are we?"  
Ellie's trajectory places her on a collision course with answers to 
those questions, and it's the development of her character, and the 
resolution of this particular aspect of the story, that makes for a 
satisfying conclusion.  In the end, the science fiction elements become 
subordinate to the personal ones.
     In its own unique way, CONTACT offers a little bit of almost 
everything:  drama, romance, suspense, and science fiction.  It touches 
the emotions and the intellect.  There are glorious special effects, 
wonderful acting, and a couple of impressive pyrotechnic displays.  The 
plot contains the most believable approach to this subject matter ever 
presented in a movie.  In addition to the scientific aspect, there's the 
media feeding frenzy, the fierce in-fighting to gain control of the 
project, the international ramifications of the U.S. taking charge, and 
the religious implications of life on another planet.  One of the key, 
recurring struggles presented in CONTACT is that of science versus 
religion, and how the conflict between these two seemingly-divergent 
disciplines reveals the importance of both faith and facts to human 
well-being.
     As he did in FORREST GUMP, Robert Zemeckis makes excellent use of 
special effects.  The standout sequences are those that take place in 
deep space and give us an awe-inspiring perception of how incredibly 
vast the universe is.  But digital trickery, both subtle and obvious, is 
used on other occasions, as well.  In fact, Zemeckis returns to one of 
his most talked-about GUMP gimmicks as he puts words into the mouth of 
President Clinton.  By carefully editing clips of Clinton speeches and 
using a little creative dubbing, Zemeckis makes it seem like the 
President is directly addressing the specific situations that arise 
during the course of CONTACT.
     The cast is strong.  Tom Skerritt and James Woods take what could 
have been one-dimensional characters and develop them into something 
more.  We don't exactly sympathize with them, but we understand their 
viewpoints.  Matthew McConaughey's performance is nicely-understated; 
it's easy to accept him as a charismatic, sincere, New Age religious 
leader.  But the star of the film is Jodie Foster, who brings all of her 
considerable ability to the part of Ellie, and infuses the character 
with passion, intelligence, and courage.  Foster deserves another Oscar 
nomination for her work here.
     In its approach and discernment, CONTACT couldn't be farther from a 
number of recent "first contact" motion pictures (including, but not 
limited to, INDEPENDENCE DAY, STAR TREK: FIRST CONTACT, and THE 
ARRIVAL).  Instead, in different ways, this movie recalls some of the 
best science fiction films.  It has a measure of the awe and spectacle 
of 2001: A SPACE ODYSSEY, and an element of the mystery and hope offered 
by CLOSE ENCOUNTERS OF THE THIRD KIND.  In fact, CONTACT can stand on 
the same level as these and many other classics, and that is one 
definition of a great movie.  If CONTACT falls short in any area, it's 
an inability to fully develop all of its many subplots, but, given the 
time limitations of the medium (the running length is already 2:30), 
that's understandable.  This is one of 1997's finest motion pictures, 
and is a forceful reminder that Hollywood is still capable of making 
magic.
- James Berardinelli
e-mail: berardin@bc.cybernex.net
ReelViews web site: http://www.cybernex.net/~berardin 
"As far as the filmmaking process is concerned, stars are essentially
worthless - and absolutely essential."
-- William Goldman

Author
Phil Brady
Summer science fiction movies are a fairly well defined commodity. We
expect a special effects offering of space ships, lasers, aliens,
explosions, and what the hell, maybe even a script. The spectacle is the
star, so there's little sense spending big money on actors who will only
be upstaged. Most films like Independence Day have such a pedigree, and
it works just fine. ID4's boggling ticket sales testify that people are
willing to suspend disbelief and enjoy the ride, maybe a few times. Carl
Sagan wanted to spin a different type of yarn. Instead of the tail
wagging the dog, how about starting with a real situation and examining
how fantastic events could come about? With the same elegance of his
Cosmos series, Carl has brought the realism of astronomy to the classic
First Contact theme.
Jody Foster plays Ellie Arroway, a driven astronomer in the SETI
project. (That's `Search for Extra-Terrestrial Intelligence' for the
rest of us. )  Scraping for grants and fighting discouragement from
other scientists, Ellie finally hits it big - a strong signal from
space. This is the jumping-off point for many films, such as ID4 and The
Arrival, but this movie sticks with her chimera. The signal is rich with
complexity, and it includes what appear to be blueprints for a transport
device. An invitation? Do we dare build it? Who gets to go? Who funds
it? As in the real world, these questions draw flies from the scientific
establishment, the White House, religious factions, and most certainly
the media. Ellie becomes helpless as these groups wrest away her prize
for their own football game.
Contact has a great cast, and no one is wasted. Perennial good guy Tom
Skerrit plays a rat - a politically powerful scientist whos does
everything to discourage Ellie's snipe hunt. Once the signal comes in,
he tries to shoulder her out, positioning himself as the spokesman and
scientific coordinator with the White House. James Woods plays a vulpine
national security adviser wanting to comandeer the project, fearing an
`invasion.' Angela Basset plays a harried presidential aide, capably
herding all the factions (not a `black' role..congrats, Angela). I
almost didn't recognize John Hurt as a bald-headed Howard Hughes-type
magnate who becomes Ellie's fairy godmother. Matthew McConoughy plays a
love interest, who is also part of the religious faction and the
astronaut selection comittee. Ellie's views are agnostic at best, and
this brings about a conflict not only with him, but with the committee
as well.
As a good scientist, Ellie knows that `no data' forces only one
conclusion. She feels that people have a need to believe, hence they do.
But the movie (gently) makes it clear that her need to believe in ET
intelligence and its benevolence is just another flavor of the same
thing. People nervous about examining the theological implications
should be comfortable with the resolution.
Well, as the coming attractions show you, Ellie does get to go, but
there's no point in  divulging any more. The real trip is her struggle
with people clambering all over her project. A certain sweetness is
added by memories of her departed father (good job by David Morse), who
was so supportive of her early curiosity. I found that these scenes
stayed with me as much as the special effects. And high marks to
director Bob Zemeckis for using the effects to aid in telling the
story,  instead of competing with it. And special praise to Jody Foster
for yet another brilliant performance. All through the film, I was
watching Ellie Arroway, feeling what she felt - I didn't catch myself
seeing Jody Foster acting. Try that in a Tom Cruise movie. When she won
her two Oscars, I agreed with the choice, but I think it took this film
to make me realize that maybe it isn't just the great roles she's
had..she really is one of  the best.

Author
Dave Cowen
CONTACT and CHACUN CHERCHE SON CHAT couldn't have come from more different 
places: CHACUN CHERCHE SON CHAT being a low-budget French film and CONTACT a
big-budget Hollywood picture full of CGI special effects.  However, they both 
derive their themes from the same part of human life; overcoming a sense of 
loneliness, and making contact with the world around one's self.  
I had heard of CONTACT's opening scene before ever stepping foot in the 
theater: friends and posters were shocked by it's "silent" opening.  Hardly 
was the opening silent, however: I was surrounded (literally) with radio 
broadcasts.  Considering the nature of the film, and the emphasis on radio 
throughout Contact's opening sequence and early scenes, I had hoped to find 
that Robert Zemeckis (director of Forrest Gump), had found a counterpoint to 
his prior, feel-good hit: instead of a simple man finding others through his 
simplicity, a smart woman would discover the loneliness that is tantamount to 
(and a natural part of) life in the universe -- a loneliness that can be 
especially strong for a nonbeliever in an ever-present spiritual force, a God. 
As the camera pulled back and the sounds traveled back in time to silence... 
brought back to a scene of young Ellie (Jena Malone, later played by Jodie
Foster) DXing with her transmitter, attempting to make contact across the 
country... I had thought that the movie would be able to express such a thing.
There is possibly no more lonely experience in life than working with a radio 
transmitter to find broadcasts from far off.  One is likely to find nothing 
but static, strange impulses of electricity and natural elements manifest as 
sound -- or, if one is lucky, one may be able to listen to a broadcast in a 
foreign language, the mechanical drones of a "numbers station" (information 
broadcast in numerical code, most likely by spies, that is typically jammed by 
metallic droning noises) or a data transmission, personified by its bleeping 
carrier tone.  Most often, however, one will find the person on the other 
end a preacher, haranguing the unseen masses (of whom the lone DXer may be the 
only audience) about the interpretation of a bible passage.  Ellie finds a 
fellow DXer in Pensacola, Florida, however... of whom she asks about the 
weather. 
Working with a shortwave radio late at night suffuses the DXer with an 
impenetrable sense of eeriness: knowing that there are signals literally 
surrounding one's own body, but often not being able to find a broadcast of 
pertinence... or worse, finding one that is incomprehensible.  Such must have 
been the motivations of writer Carl Sagan's when developing the original story 
of CONTACT... the dream of coming into contact with extraterrestrial life 
filtered through both the unlikeliness of establishing that contact, and the 
type of contact that could be made.  So how can it be, then, that Zemeckis 
encodes his film with the much more common, banal message of those late-
night radio preachers?
The character of Palmer Joss provides the answer.  Giving the role to Matthew 
McConaughey, Zemeckis attempts to balance Ellie's sterile, scientific lack of 
belief with a sexy preacher man, one who would be a man of a cloth if it 
weren't for that darn celibacy requirement.  Throughout the film, Palmer and 
Ellie quarrel about the existence of God and the importance of that argument 
to one's life, the two bound by a furtive sexual encounter at the beginning of 
the film... until finally, in the closing scenes, Ellie finds her faith: 
through science, she has reached contact with an alien being, and finds 
herself comforted by the knowledge that there is life beyond that of 
Earth...not at all unlike the comfort that Palmer finds in his belief in God.  
The audience leaves the theaters affirmed that no matter which path they take, 
they can always find solace in the knowledge that there is something greater 
which is there to protect them, something that has been there for millions of 
years.
This is an unfairly stacked deck, however -- Ellie's emotions are being 
filtered through an alien encounter that is as maudlin as it is absurd.  
Zemeckis isn't content having Ellie come into contact with another form of 
life, but a form of life that takes its form as her lost father.  
This dumbing-down of the loneliness of the human condition, amplified by a 
plot device as crude as the drug-smugglers of a standard action film or best 
friend gone bad of your average thriller is a great insult to the audience's 
intelligence.  When Ellie finds the alien, all the alien can tell her is that 
the weather's just fine on Vega... a pitiful and bathetic ending to what could 
have been an incisive commentary of the complexities of communication between 
not only different forms of life, but also between other cultures or between 
human beings of the same background.  To the movie's credit, the script brings 
up some fascinating issues, and Jodie Foster gets bonus points for playing
an atheist... but the answer to the problem of loneliness, whether existential 
or practical, isn't talking about the weather -- and it's an insult to the 
insights and extraterrestrial longings of Carl Sagan for the movie to put such 
a feel-good gloss on that questions that the film raises.
CHACUN CHERCHE SON CHAT (given the much less alliterative title WHEN THE CAT'S 
AWAY in the United States) has a much similar solution to the problem of 
loneliness, but is ultimately much more honest in its end.  Chloe (Garance 
Clavel), a makeup artist working in the Bastille sector of modern Paris, lives 
with her male roommate and his latest flames.  Other than doing touch-up jobs 
on pouting primadonnas and laying on the couch with her cat Gris-gris, Chloe 
doesn't have much of her life.  
Chloe leaves Gris-gris with Madame Renee, a semi-professional cat-watcher 
(played by Madame Renee, a real-life semi-professional cat-watcher) in the 
neighborhood while she goes on vacation (which takes up a genuinely hilarious 
10 seconds of screen time) only to find Gris-gris missing when she returns.  
The search for her cat forces her to leave the apartment to find her cat, 
finding a network of old ladies, a sweet Arab named Djamel (Zinedine Soualem) 
who helps her find her cat, the individual who provides many of the movie's 
scenes with a wonderfully inappropriate backbeat (Romain Duris) and pretty 
much the rest of the neighborhood.  
The standout scenes in CHACUN CHERCHE SON CHAT are the ones which succinctly 
but hilariously outline the slow banality of Chloe's life.  In one sequence, 
she and a friend (Flo, played by Estelle Larrivaz) look frantically around 
themselves while seated on chairs in the modeling studio, segueing directly 
into a shot of Chloe at the Laundromat, looking sadly beyond the camera while 
pounding rave music plays in the background.  In another, she shares a 
wonderfully boring breakfast with her roommate's new boyfriend which concludes 
with her roommate's boyfriend asking her, longingly, if she'll be back later.  
In CHACUN CHERCHE SON CHAT, Paris is fraught with minor dangers: Chloe 
puts on a nice dress to attract a suitor and is accosted by creepy men, the 
local barmaid hits on her, a lovely old building is demolished while the 
Bastille's residents look on with confusion, an old lady nonchalantly talks to 
her husband's ashes to Chloe's astonishment, a sexual encounter is aborted by 
a phone call.  Chloe seems to recess into her shell more and more with each 
encounter.
In the end, Chloe finds her happiness in life... but it is one based on a lie, 
and one much to the chagrin of Djamel, who one suspects could truly put an end 
to Chloe's loneliness.  In the end, with the film's most talked-about shot,
the audience is led to believe that Chloe has found herself... but the truth 
is, she was never truly lost.
The banality of the images earlier in the film reveal a certain beauty, not 
unlike the vast silent pullback of CONTACT's opening shot... the images of 
inaction and loneliness hold a sense of wonder curiously lacking from the 
relatively obvious and traditional conclusions of both films. As such, both 
films have beautiful and promising beginnings that belie their tepid 
resolutions.  Djamel's last words, as he sits in a local bar surrounded by 
people but close to no-one -- and not for lack of trying -- end up being the 
most true of anything said in either film.  
Dave Cowen (esch@fische.com)
Eschatfische. --------------------------------------------------------------

Author
Chad Polenz
Contact
Chad'z rating: *** (out of 4 = good)
1997, PG, 150 minutes [2 hours, 30 minutes]
[science fiction/drama]
starring: Jodie Foster (Dr. Ellie Arroway), Matthew McConaughey (Palmer
Joss), Tom Skerrit (Dr. David Drumlin), James Woods (Michael Kitz), written
by Carl Sagan, Ann Druyan, James V. Hart, Michael Goldenberg, produced by
Steve Starkey, Robert Zemeckis, directed by Robert Zemeckis, based on the
novel by Carl Sagan.
There's so much going for, going against, and going on in "Contact" it's
difficult to begin critiquing it, let alone describing it. It's a grand scale
Hollywood film that tries to please everyone  with its "neutral" stance on
humanity, and theology versus science. In fact, it tries so hard to be a work
of genius philosophy it nearly collapses under its own weight. What makes it
good is the breezy, easy-to-swallow storytelling, outstanding effects and
production, and a solid array of acting. 
Zemeckis's last feature, "Forrest Gump," took the world by storm with its
story of a simple man in a complex world. Here, he uses almost the exact
opposite formula for similar themes. Our main character is Dr. Ellie Arroway
(Foster), a smart astronomer who is surrounded by high technology and the
precision of science. Her parents died when she was a child, but told her
science is the language and problem-solver of the universe and she applies
this to her own life in many ways. Most thematically, she is an atheist
because she doesn't see any scientific evidence for the existence of God.
What you believe in personally is irrelevant because Ellie's character is
developed so well you understand her rationale. 
Although the entire film is not a debate over theism, its significance is
evident and often becomes so blatant you expect to see labels on every
character and their specific dialogue. Not that this is automatically a flaw,
but wrong because it tries to present itself in such a "neutral" manner. 
Representing the perspective of theism is part-time Christian
preacher/part-time secular philosopher and author Palmer Joss (McConaughey).
The two meet early on at a government SETI where Ellie is searching for
extra-terrestrial life, but Palmer is there collecting data for a book about
how technology exploits the helpless and has caused man to become so confused
spiritually. Unlike Ellie's character, we don't get to know Palmer well
enough to sympathize with his religious convictions as its obvious his
dialogue and character are being written and directed by people who probably
don't believe what he stands for. Thankfully, he is not portrayed as a
right-wing nut.
What brings these characters and their significance together is the main
plot of the story involving an intelligent transmission from space.
Basically, aliens thought we were hot and gave us their beeper number and
directions to where the party's at - cool! But here's where the film also
starts to slip in a few ways. 1) This information is made known to the public
and the entire world freaks out and everyone suddenly belongs to a group of
one extreme or another (I doubt this would happen in reality). 2) A
mysterious character suddenly appears who answers all of the mysterious
questions such as how to decode the message and the significance of every
little detail. The film had not been so "sci-fi movie convenient" before, so
why the [first of many] cop-out[s]?
Not much happens throughout the film in terms of general plot, so what we
get is a serious of several sub-plots overlapping each other. Many supporting
characters are introduced and the script works well enough to give them all
significance within the story, even though some are clearly plugged-in for
theme. 
The film also uses modern technology to create for an almost frighteningly
realistic mood. Much like "Independence Day," "Mission: Impossible," and
"Ransom," there is a sense of technological trendiness here. Use of the
Internet and laptop computers are exaggerated to create this mood, but
sometimes the movie machine takes over and we get technological conspiracies
that really aren't plausible, let alone necessary.
The entire point of the film is the end because we know Ellie will somehow
make the trip to "the other side," but is the final payoff worth it? I didn't
find it to be as powerful as it intends to be because there isn't enough
mystery to it. Everything comes together in the ultimate ending and I guess
you might say the characters, and especially their symbolism are dealt with
poetic justice. Maybe you could see it as following the film's logical
conclusion. Or maybe it's really about free will.
"Contact" is probably one of the most enigmatic films I've ever seen. Even
if the thematic elements don't do much for you, it's still interesting to
watch because the story is told through a fluid script and an atmosphere of
total modernism. 
Please visit Chad'z Movie Page @ http://members.aol.com/ChadPolenz - over 140
new and old films reviewed in depth, not just blind ratings and quick
capsules. Also, check out The FIRST Shay Astar Web Page @
http://members.aol.com/ChadPolenz/ShayAstar.html

Author
Eugene Xia
This is a 3 star film. I am beginning to
feel the power of Hollywood and understand why its
films are so successful around the world.  Much of
it is formula writing, yet it all works so well.
When Arroway first heard the pining (very loud in
the background) of the signal from Vega, the film's tempo
went into high gears and I really felt the excitement.
While my heart was pounding rapidly and cheering her on,
a very distant and annoying part of my brain kept
telling me: Here comes Hollywood "adrenaline formula 22".
Then there is also the Spielberg "magic wonder ET formula"
complete with sappy tear jerking yet completely
harmless music.  Foster did a very good job and
so did the girl who played the young Arroway, but
the rest are stereotypical--the paranoid government
fonctionaires, your typical run of the mill villains who
get their just dessert and the Raph Reed character
carefully balanced by the spiritual boyfriend (but would
you want to buy a used car from this guy?).
Sometimes this sort of formula writing can be quite
vicious.  I remember the first time I watched Kieslowski's
Blue.  When Julie locked herself out at night, my automatic
reaction was, "Oh oh, she is going to get attacked by
the hoodlums".  When that didn't happen, I realized
that in the real world, most people don't get attacked
when they are locked out of their apartments.  That was
when I realized that I had watched too many Hollywood films.
At the same time, in my opinion, the most effective 
sequence is the one when Arroway stood in the control 
room watching the on going test process completely 
helpless and useless being reduced to a mere decoration.
Much of the dialogue about science and religion offers
no more insight than the endless and tiresome debates
that have been going on among college freshmen
and the film would have been better off without it.  
When one strips away all this juvenile nonsense,
one is left with a story of a woman obsessed with her 
childhood grief and refuses to grow up.  Sort of like an 
adult version of Ponette.
The ending is definitely a religious one (Hollywood can't
really afford to alienate 90% of the population).  After
delivering a speech of faith, Arroway walks out of the
Capital and found herself the next messiah or at least
the next great prophet.
Despite my somewhat harsh critique above, I highly recommend
the film.  Contrary to what you have heard, it is not
a thinking person's movie although I will stop short of
telling you to check your brain at the door.  It offers you
great entertainment while you are in the theater, but isn't
terribly deep upon reflexion.

Author
Brad Aisa
       *Contact* (or: *Close Encounters of the Hegelian Kind*)
There is a scene about half way through the movie *Contact* in which the 
identity of many of the atheists in the audience becomes manifest: they 
erupt into cheers and applause (or at least did on the night I saw the 
movie, being myself amongst the loudest of the cheering applauders). The 
eruption comes in response to a swaggering and bold line uttered by Ellie 
Arroway, the astronomer played by Jodie Foster in the movie.
Ellie is a scientist, and is an atheist for the right reason: the lack of 
evidence for any alleged supreme being. But while Ellie does not believe in 
God, she is nevertheless still a Believer after a fashion, only her belief 
is that other sentient beings exist, and that evidence of their existence 
might be found by monitoring the radio signals impinging on Earth from the 
furthest reaches of the Universe. So monitor she does, at first in Puerto 
Rico (until her director cuts off her funding), then later, at an American 
installation (funded by a wealthy reclusive zillionaire.)
For the first two thirds of the movie, the theme seems straightforward 
enough: reason vs. faith. Ellie is the stalwart defender of reason; her 
nemesis, apart from modern Western civilization in general, is an 
anti-technology cleric/writer played by Matthew McConaughey. (He wanted to 
be a priest, but failed Celibacy 101, as he soon proceeds to demonstrate 
with Arroway...). The two soon part, to be later reunited under completely 
new circumstances: Ellie has discovered a transmission of intelligent 
extraterrestrial origin, and McConaughey is now an advisor to the 
President.
Who is the President? Here we get to the first of the film's several 
serious esthetic flaws. Robert Zemeckis, the film's director, also directed 
Forrest Gump, which employed digital image editing to implant Gump into 
historical scenes involving real presidents and public figures. Zemeckis 
uses this device in *Contact* to cast.... Bill Clinton as the President. To 
this jarring device (you could literally feel the audience squirm) is added 
the now commonplace practice of featuring bevies of real life figures, such 
as Bernard Shaw and Larry King of CNN. This invalid technique is intended 
to achieve a sense of realism, but achieves the opposite. What actually 
happens, is that the introduction of real life journalistic and 
"documentary" elements -- as opposed to an artistic fictional rendition of 
the elements -- serves, by destroying the "fourth wall", to spotlight the 
fictional nature of the film, and shatter the illusion of the narrative. 
The choice of "casting" Clinton also detracted from several scenes in the 
movie, in which, dramatically, the president would be expected to be 
shown, but which we assume was not possible, due to the limited screen time 
and contexts that could be devoted to this device. The technology used here 
is so good, I thought during the film, that Bill Clinton had actually 
participated in the production, playing himself in his scenes. It was 
only later that I came to realize, from reading a commentary on the film in 
Entertainment Weekly (July 18, 1997), that the scenes with the President 
were merely assembled from public footage, not via his cooperation. (This 
itself is highly improper, since it expropriates the President's visage.)
The message received by interstellar fax contains the blueprint for 
building a giant machine, that seems designed to transport its single 
occupant ... to??? ... how??? The interstellar fax apparently didn't come 
with the sender's address. Nevertheless, over the objections of the 
cliche-paranoid National Security Advisor (played by James Woods), an 
international consortium is convened to build the machine, and a committee 
established to select the occupant.
Several plot twist and turns ensue, but through it all, up to the launch, 
we remain convinced that the theme ("message" might be more apt) is reason 
vs. faith, or better: reason vs. whacked out American-style New Age 
mysticism and fanaticism, as depicted both chillingly and hilariously, in a 
garish New Age campout around the radio telescope site, comprising every 
conceivable fringe or whacked out subgroup in America; a similar spectacle 
is enacted in Washington. Arroway drives through this, and we acutely feel 
her pain at witnessing the spectacle -- her most triumphant achievement has 
been reduced to the level of Elvis worshippers (apparently anticipating his 
resurrection), fundamentalist doomsday sects, and crazy alien worshippers.
(It shouldn't be giving away too much to let the reader guess who finally 
gets to make the voyage...) The voyage at last takes place, and the 
occupant returns. And it is not only the occupant of the craft who 
gets to take a voyage, by the way: the audience itself gets transported 
back almost 30 years, as well, made to endure the nearly identical sequence 
from 2001: A Space Odyssey -- but I digress.
It is this sequence, and the scenes which ensue as a consequence, that 
leads one to realize that the movie *Contact* is a supreme fraud -- a kind 
of cheap, third rate philosophic Trojan Horse, in which a philosophically 
illiterate and particularly offensive "message" is delivered that purports 
to unify and transcend the prior thematic conflict of reason vs. faith.
"Reason and faith are just two aspects of the same thing." "Those who 
believe in God have as much justification as those who believe in 
science." "Belief in science is just a matter of faith." Ad nauseum.
It all happens so suddenly, the rational viewer will be a bit taken aback, 
but if he or she rewinds somewhat, the setup and intention becomes clear. 
What one sees, is a plot constructed with such artifice, such implausible 
(nay, impossible) premises, and designed with such specificity to lead to 
such an absurd conclusion, that it is *not* reason and logic and facts and 
evidence and every other hallmark of the scientific method and rational 
mode of existence, which the filmmakers are trying to express.
What we have here, is nothing short of Hegel as E.T.: friendly 
cosmic aliens who would eschew the label "God", but who nevertheless 
consider it important to send their only begotten visitor to return 
to earth and resolve and unite the antagonists of the ages. 
     Faith is the proper means of accepting knowledge; a belief in God
     and an immortal soul is the proper world view for man.
     Reason is the proper means of deriving knowledge; a scientific
     world view is the one proper to man.
     Reason is faith; God and Science are one; a scientist and a 
     religious prophet are equivalent. Act accordingly.
I have to confess, that it has been a long time since I was as offended at 
the movies, as in the scene in which, by very clear parallel to an earlier 
scene, we are expected to accept that the crazed religious mob, who are now 
worshipping Ellie as a kind of New Age Messiah, are to be *accepted* for 
doing so on nothing more than faith. This is obscene. Also offensive, is 
the staged ambiguity of the disposition of a crucial fact near the end of 
the story, and an epilogue, in which the newly reconstructed Ellie feeds 
the final Synthetic message to a cadre of happy little school kiddies.
I will give the movie credit for its virtues. First, Jodie Foster, always 
eminently watchable, is engaging and touching as the driven, but somewhat 
naive scientist Ellie. Ellie is at home with the machinery of science, and 
fellow scientists, but seems to lose her confidence and some of her 
certitude when she has to deal with less rational individuals.
The production design, directing, and cinematography are all excellent, 
making the movie, on its own terms, enjoyable to watch. And apart from some 
logical flaws that only a reviewer might fault, it does manage to present 
science and its accoutrements as exciting, and comprehensible. I especially 
liked the design and technology of the Machine. The loopy 2001-style 
journey, however, and ridiculous ensuing encounter left me cold. If the 
writers/producers had not been so intent on delivering their Hegelian 
Sermon From the Camera Mount, they might have presented some original, 
memorable, and even controversial encounter/discovery. (What would have 
been wrong with, "Religion? Nah -- we abandoned that three hundred and 
forty-thousand years ago -- tell everyone there is no God, and to get a 
life.") As presented, it is a hokey amalgam of Star Trek's Holodeck, and a 
sentimental attempt at closure of the movie's earlier childhood scenes with 
Ellie and her father.
I must give credit where due, though. Despite all my complaints and 
rantings, I still recommend that you see *Contact*, because it deals with 
*ideas*, and this is such a rare feat in a Hollywood movie, that one 
relishes the fact, even if one is intellectually ballyhooing some of the 
actual content. And *Contact* does not seem to be malicious or evil -- like 
many people, institutions and cultures today, it is just highly confused, 
and trying to find its way in a big, boisterous, sometimes puzzling world.
Copyright (c) 1997 by Brad Aisa. All rights reserved, apart from customary 
transmission and downloading from an authorized submission to Usenet.
--
Brad Aisa     web archive: http://www.interlog.com/~baisa/
email (anti-spam encoded): baisa"AT SYMBOL"interlog.com
"The highest responsibility of philosophers is to serve as the
guardians and integrators of human knowledge."   -- Ayn Rand

Author
Tim Voon
Making contact with an alien race doesn't come as easily as "E.T. phone
home" anymore. This reflective movie directed by Robert Zemeckis and
starring Jodie Foster and Matthew McConaughey, prods the human skull
with a radar dish full of science and religion. Ever looked up at the
night sky and wondered to yourself, quote "What a great waste of space"?
Well it is, and this movie attempts to give some meaning to those
pondering whether man is truly alone in the universe.
Behind every motive lies an underlying reason, which drives a heroine to
become great. In the case of the Scientist (Foster), the search for the
meaning of her existence is the same as her quest to find her dead
parents. The orphan, whose fascination with the universe begins with a
low frequency radio and telescope, sets out to reach the furthest stars,
in the furthest galaxies, to confirm what man has always feared or
fantasised. She listens and watches from dusk till dawn, for a sign, a
message that carries with it the same vain hope of a child wishing her
parents would return from the grave. Patience is a product of time, not
relativity, and the patient Scientist is rewarded with a signal from
Vega.
To every action there must be an equal and opposite reaction - not so.
For every agnostic scientist there lies in wait a thousand religious
gnostics. Representing the unbalanced proportion of this equation of
beliefs, is the Reverend (McConaughey). Can God and Science coexist?
Does placing faith in one necessarily rule out the existence of the
other? There are two sides to this search for the truth, but enough room
for both sides to come out smiling. After all, the universe is a big,
big place.
E=MC2. Extra-terrestrial = making contact twice. If you receive a
message from an alien, it is only polite to reply. Close to a trillion
dollars is spent on an amusing looking gadget reminiscent of the nucleus
of an atom. Drop a small pod in the centre of revolving twirling rings,
and leave the rest to speculation and imagination. I had a good laugh
when I first saw the contraption. "That thing is not taking anyone
anywhere", I said aloud, but perhaps to a hospital bed with a fracture
or two.
The Quest to make first contact, gets as political as politicians on
heat. The Scientist stands by her belief that there is no God, in front
of an international selection committee. Her application to be earth's
messenger to the stars is rejected. However, the right hand of religion
which strikes her cheek, also carries a fanatical left, which ironically
allows her to journey where no man has gone before.
The Scientist returns without an incredulous story of space and time
travel. She has only a sense of wonder, and feelings of a glorious
encounter of the millennium kind to share with others. An international
enquiry is assembled to judge her story, but brushes aside the truth as
a mere figment of her imagination. At this moment, the Scientist
realises that she is asking others to believe her words on faith alone,
a concept which is as foreign as believing in God; and those who have no
qualms about believing in a supreme being, are unable to believe the
tale of her miraculous journey.
So in this meeting place, Science asks Religion to Believe, but
ironically Religion turns her face. So my longwinded after thought is
that perhaps if the Science had more faith in God, and Religion had more
faith in Science, there may be harmony on the third rock from the Sun.
Exceptionally thought-provoking material, splendidly directed, and
visually sensational. Well done.

Author
James Sanford
        ``Contact'' is certain to inspire dozens of questions, but one
immediately springs to mind: Why can't director Robert Zemeckis
release a film every July? His mid-summer movies have long been a
welcome vacation from what's traditionally the season of
brainlessness. Five years ago this month his deliciously bitter
``Death Becomes Her'' debuted, and in 1994 his ``Forrest Gump'' turned
a worthless book into a Best Picture winner.
  Both of those films relied heavily on gimmicks: In
``Death,'' Oscar-winning special-effects put a gaping hole through
Goldie Hawn, while ``Gump'' employed computer imagery to put Tom Hanks
at the scene of practically every major event in recent American
history except the Moon landing. Despite its otherworldly set-up,
``Contact'' looks unflashy by comparison.
  Somewhat freely adapted from astronomer Carl Sagan's best
seller, the film uses the search for intelligent extraterrestial life
as the springboard for a thought-provoking exploration of the age-old
conflict of religion versus science, and faith vs. physical evidence.
  On one side is radio astronomer Ellie Arroway (Jodie
Foster), who's spent years listening to space static, waiting for some
sort of signal to emerge.  Her obsessiveness has made her something of
a laughingstock: Even her boss asks her if she's ``still waiting for
E.T to call.''
  Representing the other side of the argument is Palmer Joss
(Matthew McConaughey), referred to in some circles as ``God's
diplomat'' and a high-level spiritual leader who advises even the
president. In a move unusual for Hollywood, Joss is not written as a
holier-than-thou hypocrite or a God-fearing bumpkin, but as a
science-savvy intellectual who knows how to argue. A creepy zealot,
who's a dead ringer for '70s rocker Edgar Winter, represents the more
extreme end of the spectrum.
  The build-up of the film is exceptionally well written, as
``Contact'' gives us two attractive adults who actually discuss issues
and concepts instead of trading coy double entendres.
  Even potential cliches such as the paranoid national
security adviser (a taut James Woods) and a billionaire recluse
(played as a sly enigma by John Hurt) take on some resonance, thanks
to the stylishness of the script.
  Though she initially seems a none-too-balanced flake, Ellie
evolves into a brave woman, desperate to bridge the galactic gap, and
Foster is just about without peer when it comes to portraying earthy
idealists.
  McConaughey, in a part that's smaller than his billing would
indicate, invests Palmer with charm and a certain degree of
credibility. There's an intriguing friction between Palmer and Ellie
that both McConaughey and Foster are obviously in tune with, and they
make philosophical debate seem mighty sexy.
  Despite the best cinematic lightshow since ``2001: A Space
Odyssey,'' the crucial encounter proves to be dramatically
unfulfilling, the only part of the picture that doesn't deliver. But
screenwriters James V. Hart and Michael Goldenberg rebound with a
crowd-pleasing final twist perfectly suited to the movie's generally
understated tone.

Author
C.T.Nadovich
Note, the following contains spoilers and strong opinion about the
movie "Contact". You may want to see the film and form your own opinions
first.
Well, I never liked Carl Sagan's stuff.
I always thought he cream and sugared the science too much in an effort
to make it go down layman's throats.  To me, that ruins the flavor of
the science itself and distorts its message.  I've always preferred my
science black --- expresso black --- but there are things you can add to
science to make an interesting, more accessable combination without
overloading it with sweetness and light.  A shot of bourbon, for
instance, as I've been known to enjoy in the works of Gould, Thomas,
Dawkins, etc... 
"Contact" is a mocha latte with rum.  Worse than that, it uses the best
columbian coffee, finest Puerto Rican rum, fresh cream, and a whole
can of Hersey's chocolate syrup.
I say this so often about films: "It coulda' been so good!".  "Contact"
merits this same summary more so than any film in recent memory.  All
the best ingredients were there: profound scientific and philosophical
questions, world class actors, breathtaking scientific venues for
settings, big budget high tech special effects, a good variation on the
first-contact plot... 
But NO! They had to go and screw it up.  Oh, how I felt I had been
cheated! Worse yet, they had Jodie Foster do the wimp out --- yes, the
same Jodie Foster that had gone toe-to-toe with Hannibal Lechter without
blinking.  Why did they cast her?  Why couldn't they cast Jane Fonda?
That would have bothered me FAR less. 
Or maybe I missed the point.  Maybe her failure to stick to her
scientific and philosophic guns in the climactic scene of the film was
intended to get the audience to rally to her aid, to shout: "Aristotle!
Aristotle! Quick! Set 'em up with Aristotle.  Then BANG! Hume! Hume!
Give 'em a left with Hume! and then a right cross with Kant! Kick 'em in
the groin with Goedel!".
Or maybe we are assumed to already know the truth, survive the attack by
science-as-religion mumbo jumbo, and maturely accept the fact that the
good guy, vastly outnumbered, just didn't win in this story, being wiser
for the experience. 
But no. By Occam's Razor it was more likely that the film wanted to show how
Science and Religion can be a big happy mutually supporting mocha latte
family. 
It was awful.  The film made the point that Jodie Foster's character was
somehow embarrased and weakened by her atheism and scientific
rationalism.  That she was an athesist because her parents died young
and she was angry at God.  It wasn't possible that (gasp) she didn't
believe in God because there wasn't one! It reminded me of the
stereotypical view of homosexuality as a bad moral choice. 
After the climactic scene, the emphasized idea is that science is sort
of a revealed, mystical religion of its own.  Only individual scientists
understand scientific fact.  Scientific proof is ultimately based on
mystical revelation.  Science is no different than revealed faith
in God. 
In a brief, passing conversation after the climax thre was a ray of
hope.  We learn that there actually was a shred of objective empirical
evedence for the mystical revelation that the atheist and rationalist
scientist is forced to accept.  It could have been a Cinderella ending. 
Alas, the film dropped this point there.  No one went seeking the foot
that matched this glass slipper, so this objective evedence is portrayed
more like Santa's cane in "A Miracle on 34'th Street" --- we all believe
that Santa is real, and that's all that really matters, but hey, isn't
it neat that some bit of objective evedence fits in with our beliefs ---
not that we need any facts to justify our beliefs. 

Author
Joseph Toscano
After being tortured endlessly with the "explosive summer films" which
contain special effects and nothing more, and some other cheesy wannabe
dramas, along comes a truly satisfying and thoroughly enjoyable experience.
An experience called "CONTACT."
You've read other reviews probably. And most state what a good movie
CONTACT was. But it was more than good. It was actually a relaxing,
cleansing, refreshing type of "good" because it really showed that the
movies still can be movies, not just a show of special effects wizardry or
a tiring piece of unimaginative drivel, even despite some raging stinkers
that have come along, such as "MR. NANNY" and "8 HEADS IN A DUFFEL BAG."
Now the film, many say, was too long. I don't view it as being too long. I
view it as being masterfully stretched out. I loved watching it and taking
in every little tiny detail -- not to confuse and boggle the mind (much
like MISSION:IMPOSSIBLE did... aye...) but to just make the experience much
more enjoyable.
But when it actually comes to scenes in the film, they couldn't have been
done better. The very first scene is a majestic trip through our galaxy and
beyond -- just to show how small we are in comparison to this great
vastness that has been created.
The word creation has meaning in the story, too. When people think of what
kind of movie CONTACT was, they usually say it was Sci-fi. And yes it
definitely is dealing with science, but it is also a drama of science and
religion actually conflicting. This isn't just a movie made for special
effects, like I said before, much like Independence Day, it's a move meant
to either make you think, or make you more secure in what you believe in.
But just because the movie wasn't made specifically to show off special
effects, that doesn't mean that the few special effects contained in the
movie weren't spectacular. Though only boasted for a short while, the
special effects are perhaps the most amazing effects I have ever seen. They
don't simply please the eye, they stir the mind in a fascinating, dark way.
When Ellie's face is "blurred" out, during her descent in the worm hole,
speaks, and then later you hear her speak the same exact thing, chills run
up your spine. Yes the effects are amazing, but what makes them even more
amazing is the fact that they are enclosed in an excellent film.
But, of course, no film is entirely "perfect." There are definitely some
things that could have been improved upon. One thing that I personally felt
could really use some work is the whole ordeal involving S.R. Hadden. It
just didn't make sense when you first saw the man. I mean, I thought he was
going to be some evil sadistic character when I first saw him on the
screen. But of course the outcome was different. The Palmer Joss character
played by McConaughey really needed a little more effort. The characters in
some cases were flat and 2-dimensional. But I think the wonder and
excellence of the movie cancels out the imperfections.
When it comes to the ending of the movie, I really was satisfied. I've
heard that many people were disappointed because of what occurred in the
hearing. Yes it was disappointing. But once I heard the comment made by
Angela Bassett's character, Rachel, "It recorded 18 hours of static..." I
knew that seeing this movie was not a disappointment after all. I was truly
satisfied.
Yes, CONTACT is satisfying. It's wonderful. It leaves you with things to
think about, and a sense of closure... many other things that just make a
movie great. Really, I've never heard such a quiet theater, such thunderous
applause, or so many gasps when the "For Carl" screen was shown.
So go see CONTACT, and treat yourself to a good time. ;)
-- Joseph Toscano (July 18, 1997) ShumJT@aol.com

Author
Ben Hoffman
The opening scene of CONTACT is the most awesome (in the sense of
"fantastic") several minutes of great special effects as we are
hurtled away from Earth at a huge speed.   Our planet becomes a
globe, getting smaller and smaller as we speed by the other planets
of our solar system.  Earth becomes a mere dot as we continue the
speeding away from our solar system, past the Milky Way and on and
on.  Simply stunning.   That alone is just about worth the price
of admission.
CONTACT could not have chosen a better time for its theatrical
release.  While through the ages people have wondered about the
stars and many have begun to wonder if there were possibly some
kind of life in some distant solar system, the soft landing of our
space probe on Mars must certainly have revived new speculation and
interest.
While Carl Sagan, on whose book CONTACT is based, when asked if he
believed in some highly-evolved life elsewhere in the infinitely
vast universe, replied "The key word in that question is 'believe.'
And in my view, you believe only on the basis of compelling
evidence."   In short, that evidence was never forthcoming to him.
Perhaps more important, however, was how he and his wife, Ann
Druyan,  felt about how such an event if it ever did happen would
affect the inhabitants of our planet.  That is what his book is
about.   What happens to religious belief if it turns out that
"there is someone out there" when according to the Bible, God
placed Man on Earth; that the stars and sun and moon are there only
to give us light. Sagan also wanted us to realize the incredible,
just about incomprehensible, vastness of the universe.
What happens to those who see aliens from another planet as
potential enemies.  In the film, Michael Kitz, (James Woods) is the
head of government security, reacting to the news that we are
getting a message form outer space as a time for increased
security.    Never mind that it is pointed out to him that it is
more probably that "anyone" capable of contacting us must have a
superior intelligence and would be unlikely to be warlike as we
stupid Earthlings are.
Ever since Ellie Arroway (Jodie Foster) was a little child, she was
interested in stars and space.  Many were the hours she spent
listening to her short wave radio hoping to hear something other
than static from outer space.   While still young, her father died.
Ellie continued her studies and went on to become a respected
scientist in the field of radio.  Pretty nearly the whole
scientific community looked upon her obsession as being on the kook
side but her persistence got her some time to use the satellite
antennas to search the heavens.
Hour after hour, day after day, Ellie listened until one day she
heard something odd, something she had never heard before, and it
had a pattern.   It was coming from a distant star, Vega.  Getting
her fellow scientists to monitor the sounds, they discover that the
noises (sounding like grunts from a Jurassic Park dinosaur) were in
fact spaced to coincide with prime numbers.   That was proof this
was not some strange static.   Idiots such as Michael Kitz wanted
to know how come the messages were not in English.  Ellie had to
explain to him that English is not likely to be spoken in other
solar systems but mathematics would be a universal language.
Quickly, all the nations begin to ponder the significance while the
hucksters get busy with Vega fairs and people come flocking to them
as if to a picnic . . . or looking at the antennas as they would
when they believe a picture of Jesus is weeping.   In short, the
world is in a turmoil and so are their leaders.   President Clinton
gives some reassuring words on TV.
The story has many facets, all of interest.  Jodie Foster give her
usual wonderful performance.  Palmer Joss (Matthew McConaughey), is
a respected religious scholar and high up in the government
hierarchy.   He and Ellie are in love . . . more or less.
S R Hadden (John Hurt), is an eccentric billionaire who takes an
interest in Ellie's behalf to help her combat those who would thwart
her.  For instance, the first trip to VEGA is not given to Ellie
who is most deserving, but to some other prominent scientist, David
Drumlin (Tom Skerritt).   Rachel Constantine (Angela Bassett) is
the President's press secretary.
CONTACT is one terrific film.  The sets, which include a space ship
readied to visit Vega, are perfect.  Many are the questions that
are raised as various events unfold.   These are answered in a most
satisfying conclusion.   There was one point where I thought there
was a cop-out; I could not believe Sagan would have opted for that.
However it turned out to be logical, not at all the cop-out I had
feared and I sighed with relief.  I wanted nothing to spoil this
most entertaining, exciting and informative movie that will give you
pause to ponder some of the questions it raised.
Directed by Robert Zemeckis who gave us FORREST GUMP.

Author
Monika Huebner
Director: Robert Zemeckis
Starring Jodie Foster, Matthew McConaughey, Tom Skerrit, Angela
Basset, John Hurt, James Woods
Even as a child Ellie Arroway (Jodie Foster) shows a strong affinity
for natural sciences fostered by her father until his untimely death.
She has a particular predilection for astronomy and the search for
intelligent life on other planets. After obtaining her doctorate at
MIT she gets a job at the SETI institute in New Mexico. When after
years of unavailing research the money for further projects is denied
to her, the most incredible thing happens: she receives signals
originating on a star named Vega 26 light years away. Having grappled
with the initially alarming nature of the message (a TV coverage of
the 1936 Olympic Games' inauguration at Berlin), they discover coded
information containing the construction manual for a mysterious
machine. The United States decide to build it, turning a blind eye to
opponents who suspect a diabolical instrument for the elimination of
mankind. In fact, the first test run ends in a catastrophe, albeit in
a somewhat different way than most people had feared. The project
seems to be finished, but Ellie is still in for a surprise. 
CONTACT presents Jodie Foster in one of her best parts ever, namely an
ambitious scientist called Dr. Ellie Arroway who has to stand her
ground in a field traditionally belonging to the men's world. The only
trouble is that she does it because of a childhood trauma  she never
managed to overcome the loss of her beloved father. Quite obviously,
Hollywood still hasn't grappled with the dilemma of accepting a strong
female character simply behaving in a normal' way as it would be
naturally expected of a man. This can also be seen from the fact that
previous to a press conference at which to report her research results
to the public Ellie, who otherwise seems to have rather little
interest in secular things, is preoccupied with only one thought:
where to get a particularly attractive and extravagant dress. In a
film such as CONTACT, which contrasts agreeably with science fiction
films commonly produced in tinsel town, this detail is especially
conspicuous. 
Robert Zemeckis' film is a strikingly close adaptation of Carl Sagan's
novel and consequently encompasses the faith versus science' issue
repeatedly touched on by Sagan. For example, the construction of the
machine' attracts a phalanx of religious fanatics preaching the end
of the world. In many individuals the impending turn of the century
evokes the angst of the Judgement Day, equally well known to our
modern society as to medieval Europe 1000 years ago. Another matter of
great human concern is the question about the existence of God, or
whether it is right to send scientists to a remote star although they
don't believe in God. The church is embodied by Father' Palmer Joss
(Matthew McConaughey), a former priest who appears as a confirmed
representative of the Catholic faith although for personal reasons he
did not finish the seminary. The love story, which seems to be
compulsory in Hollywood, starts to blossom between him and Ellie; in
this film however, it is a drawback rather than an asset because it is
virtually redundant and does not promote the action.
Having said that, CONTACT is one of the films most worthy to view this
year with its placid yet not boring narrative and a flood of fantastic
pictures especially captivating. The special effects do not simply
function in their own right, but because they are elements required by
the plot. They provide the film with an aesthetic quality rarely to be
found in this genre. Right at the beginning for example the audience
is taken on a ride through the solar system to the centre of the Milky
Way, the significance of which is only revealed in the course of the
film.
Some may think that with a 2˝ hours' run CONTACT is unreasonably long,
but that way the story has time enough to develop. The main cast is
perfect and several cameos of American TV celebrities render the
scenario even more realistic. So if an action spectacle featuring many
explosions, shoot-outs, spaceships and chases is something you can
very well do without, you should not miss out on this one. 
Homepage: Book and movie reviews
http://sites.inka.de/sites/darwin
